This set of files contains a script of canonical text, chapter by chapter,
for the purpose of reading to make an audio recording.
All footnotes, introductions, and verse numbers have been stripped out.

﻿Pwa Pishaʼakhɔ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Matio fɨ̄ʼɨ nɛ.
1.
Yei pa ndaaŋoŋ Jishɔ *Krishto mbɔ muuŋ *Devi ŋa a ni mbɔ muuŋ Abrahaŋ nɛ. 
Abrahaŋ ni mbɔ tǎa Aiji, Aiji pɔ tǎa Jakɔ, Jakɔ pɔ tǎa Juda pugu pa lǐŋ pi. 
Juda pɔ tǎa Pɛrɛ pugu Shera, mǔuŋ vugu ni mbɔ Tama, Pɛrɛ pɔ tǎa Hɛshroŋ, Hɛshroŋ pɔ tǎa Raŋ. 
Raŋ pɔ tǎa Aminada, Aminada pɔ tǎa Nashoŋ, Nashoŋ pɔ tǎa Shalmoŋ. 
Shalmoŋ pɔ tǎa Boa, mǔuŋ vi ni mbɔ Raha, Boa pɔ tǎa Obɛ, mǔuŋ vi ni mbɔ Ru, Obɛ pɔ tǎa Jeshe. 
Jeshe pɔ tǎa Fùoŋ Devi. Devi pɔ tǎa Sholomu, ni mbhi vi pi pugu miŋgwɛ yɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋgwɛ Yuria nɛ. 
Sholomu pɔ tǎa Rehoboaŋ, Rehoboaŋ pɔ tǎa Abija, Abija pɔ tǎa Asha. 
Asha pɔ tǎa Jehoshafa, Jehoshafa pɔ tǎa Joraŋ, Joraŋ pɔ tǎa Ujia. 
Ujia pɔ tǎa Jotaŋ, Jotaŋ pɔ tǎa Aha, Aha pɔ tǎa Hɛjɛkaya. 
Hɛjɛkaya pɔ tǎa Manashɛ, Manashɛ pɔ tǎa Amo, Amo pɔ tǎa Joshaya. 
Joshaya pɔ tǎa Jɛkonia pugu pa lǐŋ pi. Yei ni mbɔ pɨɨ ndɨɨ yɛ ŋa ŋgwa Babiloŋ ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ puoŋ laʼataoŋ Ishrae ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ghɔ laʼataoŋ pugu nɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa puoŋ Ishrae ni ŋguʼɔ mbɔ Babiloŋ nɛ, Jɛkonia ni mbɔ tǎa Shɛatie, Shɛatie pɔ tǎa Shɛrubabɛ. 
Shɛrubabɛ pɔ tǎa Abihu, Abihu pɔ tǎa Eliakiŋ, Eliakiŋ pɔ tǎa Asho. 
Asho pɔ tǎa Shadɔ, Shadɔ pɔ tǎa Akiŋ, Akiŋ pɔ tǎa Eliu. 
Eliu pɔ tǎa Eliasha, Eliasha pɔ tǎa Mataŋ, Mataŋ pɔ tǎa Jakɔ. 
Jakɔ pɔ tǎa Joshɛ mbɔ ndaoŋ Meri ŋa a ni mbhi Jishɔ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ŋa Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ ŋguoŋ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ llɔ thɔ Abrahaŋ ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ mbɨŋ Devi ni mbɔ khwɛnchrɔ, llɔ thɔ Devi ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa pi ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ puoŋ Ishrae ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ Babiloŋ nɛ pɔ khwɛnchrɔ, llɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pi ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ puoŋ Ishrae ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ Babiloŋ nɛ, ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa pi ni mbhi Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, pɔ khwɛnchrɔ. 
Yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ nnu phi Jishɔ Krishto ni ntɔgɔ nɛ. Pi ni ŋga nōoŋ Meri mǔuŋ vi ni Joshɛ nɔ ŋgwɛ vi, ŋkaoŋ pugu yu maa nchwīe láŋ ti nji noŋ, a kwo thi pi ni shūu ntɔgɔ pi ŋkuoŋ ghrɨ́ Jijwɛ Minnwi. 
Joshɛ ndaoŋ vi ni mbɔ ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ ki lɔ ntāʼa nu māʼaŋ lrithɔ thɔ yu, nnɛ a lɔ̄gɔ nthí mi nɔ shāaŋ nu pugu yu pi njiŋnjiŋ. 
A ni ŋga ŋguʼɔ nthɔ mbīʼi nnu yei njùʼɔ yu, ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, *ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi ghɔ moŋ njə̀ɨŋ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Joshɛ, muuŋ Devi, kiʼi mbɔgɔ nɔ lɔ̄gɔ nu Meri nɔ ŋgwɛ ghɔ, nthɛ ŋa muuŋ ŋa a shūu nɛ tɔgɔ pi moŋ ghrɨ́ Jijwɛ Minnwi. 
A shi mbhi muuŋ mimbia, ɔ chhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Jishɔ nthɛ ŋa a shi ŋkwe ŋgwa pi moŋ phɨ yugu.” 
Ŋguoŋ nnu pei ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa Taathɔ ni nchhu ntɔgɔ mbɨŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ yi nɛ pɔ nnu shini ŋa: 
“Līi njəɨ, Miŋgwɛ haʼaŋ a shi yaʼa ji mimbia nɛ shi nshūu mbhi muuŋ mimbia Pi chhɔ̄ ligi yi ŋa Emanue, njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, ‘Minnwi pɔ pia pugu kaʼa.’ ” 
Joshɛ ni ŋga ŋgūʼu lɔgɔ, nchwīe nɔ haʼaŋ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ ghɔ chhu nɛ, ndɔ̄gɔ ŋgwɛ vi. 
Ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nji vi nɔ ŋgwɛ vi ti a nuʼuŋ mbhi muuŋ mimbia, Joshɛ chhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Jishɔ. 
﻿Matio.
2.
Ndɨɨ ŋa pi ni ŋkwo phi Jishɔ Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ moŋ Judia nɛ, moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ŋa Hɛrɔ ni mbɔ fùoŋ nɛ, ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, ghaŋ shiethɔ llɔ ŋgei shaʼa minaoŋ thɔ Jerushalɛiŋ. 
Mbie ŋa, “Ju vɛ ŋa pi phi vi mbɔ fùoŋ pa Juu nɛ hɨŋ? Nthɛ ŋa pigi ni njəɨ fɨ́nəɨ ŋa a nōoŋ ŋa pi phi vi nɛ ndɨɨ ŋa a ni ŋkuʼɔ ŋgei shaʼa minaoŋ nɛ, nthɔ lɨʼɨ ghaʼo vi.” 
Fùoŋ Hɛrɔ ni ŋga njaʼo yei, nnu ghɔ ghana vi pugu pa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa Jerushalɛiŋ. 
A mɛ̄iŋ ŋguoŋ pa *thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi, mbie vugu ni lɨʼɨ ŋa pi ni mfāʼo nɔ phi nu Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ. 
Pugu ni ŋkhwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ moŋ Judia nthɛ ŋa yei yaoŋ ŋa *njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni nāʼaŋ nɛ: 
‘Ndɔ gɔ̀ ma Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ shhɛ Juda, ɔ lɔ njiʼi ŋkɨgəɨ shɨna pa ŋguoŋ mmɛ laʼataoŋ moŋ Juda, nthɛ ŋa yichəɨ nthishɨ ŋgwa shi ntaoŋ laʼa ghɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi ŋgwa paŋ puoŋ Ishrae.’ ” 
Nɛnnɛ Hɛrɔ mɛ̄iŋ pa ghaŋ shiethɔ pighɔ njiŋnjiŋ ntou vugu ti nji ndɨɨ ŋa fɨ́nəɨ ghɔ ni ŋkuʼɔ nɛ. 
Ntaoŋ vugu Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ, nchhu nu ŋa, “P̂əɨ ghə̄ɨ ntāʼa muuŋ ghɔ pɔpɔrɔ, ŋga njəɨ vi, pəɨ chwīe ǹji. Nnɛ ŋa mmu ŋkaa mu nthɛ ŋ̀gə̄ɨ ŋgaʼo vi.” 
Pugu ni ŋga njaʼo ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa fùoŋ Hɛrɔ ni nchhu nɛ, ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ndaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ. Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, fɨ́nəɨ yɛ ŋa pugu ni njəɨ ŋgei laʼataoŋ shaʼa minaoŋ nɛ ghə̄ɨ nu shhɨ pugu ti nuʼuŋ ŋgə̄ɨ ntithi nɔ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ muuŋ ghɔ ni mbɔ nɛ. 
Pugu ni ŋga njəɨ fɨ́nəɨ ghɔ tithi, njùʼɔ yugu pwa ti ŋgaʼa. 
Pugu ni ŋga nii nda ghɔ, njəɨ muuŋ ghɔ pugu Meri mǔuŋ vi, ntuʼu noŋ yugu ŋgɨnɔ vi, mfuʼu pa maoŋ tɨnɨnchuoŋ pìɛŋ pugu, mbɔ pa laoŋgo, ni yichəɨ ŋkwaŋ lěi pi mɛ̄iŋ ni fraŋkishɛŋ, ni laminda ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni məə nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Minnwi ni ŋkwo shūu tə́nə yugu moŋ njə̀ɨŋ ŋa kiʼi pugu nuʼuŋ ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ Fùoŋ Hɛrɔ nɛ, pugu tɔgɔ ndaoŋ nduoŋ mbɨnɨ laʼa pugu. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ghaŋ shiethɔ pighɔ ni ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ, Joshɛ gha njəɨ nu nɛ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi ghɔ moŋ njə̀ɨŋ, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Lɔllɔ tɔthɨ ndɔ̄gɔ muuŋ vei pugu mǔuŋ vi ntei pəɨ pugu ghə̄ɨ Ijipti, ŋkɨna fɔ ti ǹshi nuʼuŋ nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ kwəɨ pəɨ maa ŋkwəɨ. Nthɛ ŋa Hɛrɔ shi ntāʼa muuŋ ghɔ nɔ jwi nu vi.” 
A lɔllɔ tɔthɨ, ndɔ̄gɔ muuŋ ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ vi ni tuʼu pugu tei ŋgə̄ɨ Ijipti. 
Ŋkɨna fɔ ti Hɛrɔ nuʼuŋ ŋkhu. Yei ni mbɔ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa Taathɔ ni nchhu ntɔgɔ pi mbɨŋ njəɨlɨʼɨ yi nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ, a ni nchhu ŋa, “Mi ni mɛ̄iŋ Muuŋ a, a taoŋ Ijipti.” 
Hɛrɔ ni ŋga ndugwi nji ŋa ghaŋ shiethɔ pighɔ chwīe a gū na nɛ, a lɨnaoŋ ni pɨgɨtua, mfɛ gɨ́ pa shoogɛ pi taoŋ njwi ŋguoŋ puoŋ pimbia ŋa pugu pɔ jɛ̄ moŋ paa ŋgaʼo mbɨnɨ nu njiŋ nɛ, moŋ Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ pugu pa ŋguoŋ lɨʼɨ ghɔ ghao. A ni nchwīe yei pi llɔ ŋkuoŋ nnu ŋa a ni njaʼo mbhɔ ghaŋ shiethɔ nɔ ndɨɨ ŋa fɨ́nəɨ ghɔ ni mfǔoŋ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ. 
Yei nnu ni nchwīe nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi Jɛrimaya ni nchhu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. Njəɨ lɨʼɨ Minnwi ghɔ mbɔ Jɛrimaya ni nchhu ŋa: 
“Pi yaʼo ŋggì kuʼɔ nu Rama mbɔ ŋggì lwillwi kə̄ɨ nu, Rashe thɔ ŋkə̄ɨ puoŋ pi ndɔ ndāa ŋa kiʼi pi māʼaŋ njùʼɔ yi nthɛ ŋa pugu lɔ nuʼuŋ mbiʼi.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Hɛrɔ ni ŋkhu nɛ, ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi ni Joshɛ moŋ laʼataoŋ Ijipti. 
Nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Yrɛi shhɛ, ndɔ̄gɔ muuŋ vinɛ pugu mǔuŋ vi mbɨnɨ moŋ laʼataoŋ Ishrae nthɛ ŋa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ntāʼa nu njwi muuŋ ghɔ nɛ khu.” 
A lɔllɔ ndɔ̄gɔ muuŋ ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ vi mbɨnɨ laʼataoŋ Ishrae. 
A ni ŋga njaʼo ŋa a jɨ Akɛlao njɨ nda Hɛrɔ tǎa vi nɔ fùoŋ Judia, a pɔgɔ nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu fɔ. Nthɛ ŋa pi ni ŋkwo shūu tə́nə yi moŋ njə̀ɨŋ nɛ, a pɨ̄nɨ moŋ krao ŋgei Galili. 
A ni ŋgə̄ɨ ndaʼa moŋ laʼataoŋ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Nasharɛ nɛ, nnɛ nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni nchhu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ: “Pi lɛ mɛ̄iŋ vi ni ŋoŋ Nasharɛ.” 
﻿Matio.
3.
Moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ghɔ, Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ni nthɔ, nchhɔ nchīi chrà Minnwi moŋ ŋkǔnu njó moŋ Judia, 
“P̂əɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Po kwo para.” 
Jouŋ ni mbɔ ŋoŋ ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Ishaya ni nchhu nthɛ vi ndɨɨ ŋa a ni nchhu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ chəɨ thɔ mfɛ gɛ̀ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó, nchhu nu ŋa: ‘Pīri shɛndaoŋ Taathɔ, chwīe pa lɨʼɨ tɔgɔ yi pɔ yi tithi.’ ” 
Jouŋ ni māʼaŋ ndhwí ŋa pi chwīe pi ni ŋgì yichəɨ ŋkwaŋ minyieŋ pi mɛ̄iŋ ni kamela, ni ŋkandaŋ ŋgrào minyieŋ nɔ ntuʼu yi. Maoŋ jɨ pi ni mbɔ ŋgwíŋ pugu pa llɔ̌ ŋkǔnu. 
Ŋgwa Jerushalɛiŋ pugu pa ŋgwa llɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ Judia pugu pa ŋguoŋ laʼataoŋ ŋkɨŋ Jodaŋ taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ mbara vi, 
a kwe vugu ni ŋkhǐ moŋ nɨnəɨ Jodaŋ pugu yūa phɨ yugu. 
Ndɔ a ni ŋga njəɨ ntou pa ŋgwa *Farashi pugu pa ŋgwa *Shadushi thɔ nu ŋa a kwe vugu ni ŋkhǐ nɛ, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pa Mbhɛ mitwɛʼi! A shūu gɔ̌ tə́nə yəɨ ŋa pəɨ tei pɨgɨtua Minnwi ŋa a thɔ nu nɛ? 
P̂əɨ chwīe nnu pɛ ŋa a shi nōoŋ ŋa pəɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni pəɨ nɛ. 
Kiʼi pəɨ nuʼuŋ nyīeŋ mbiʼi nu ŋa pəɨ shi ndūgu nthɛ ŋa pəɨ chhu nu ŋa, ‘Abrahaŋ tǎa vigi.’ Ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa mimfɛ Minnwi pɨʼɨ ŋgùʼɔ pei nchwīe puoŋ nɔ ghɔ mfɛ ni Abrahaŋ. 
Pi kwo pīri njiɛŋ nɔ kəʼɨ nu thɨ nɔ ghɔ llɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋǐeŋ yi, nthɛ yie ghɔ sheshe thɨ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi njuŋ ntíɛŋ shiʼi nɛ, pi shi ŋkəʼɨ māʼaŋ moŋ móŋoŋ.” 
“Ŋ̀guʼɔ ŋkwe vəɨ ni ŋkhǐ pi moŋ ŋkhǐ nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa pəɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ. Ndɔ yichəɨ ŋoŋ thɔ nu ŋa a chaa a, ǹdɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo fɨʼɨ ŋoŋ ŋa a nthɛ ǹtiɛŋ tra yi nɛ. A shi ŋkwe vəɨ ni ŋkhǐ moŋ Jijwɛ Minnwi pugu pa móŋoŋ. 
A tuo yaoŋ fɨgəɨ reshi mbhɔ yu, mfɨgəɨ mfuʼu ŋkiɛŋ reshi moŋ ŋkuʼu maoŋ nūʼɔŋ shaoŋ yu, ntūoŋ ŋkuʼu maoŋ ghɔ moŋ móŋoŋ ki phɛ.” 
Ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ chəɨŋ ŋkɨŋ nɨnəɨ Jodaŋ llɔ Galili. Nthɔ njəɨ Jouŋ ŋa a kwe vi ni ŋkhǐ. 
Jouŋ paʼo nɔ lāa nu, nchhu nu ŋa, “A kāʼo ŋa a kwe gɔ̀ ŋkwe a ni ŋkhǐ, ɔ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nthɔ nu njəɨ pi mmu ŋa ŋ̀kwe ghɔ ni ŋkhǐ?” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Mieŋ a pɔ nɛnnɛ ndwɛ, nthɛ ŋa yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pia shi nchwīe ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa Minnwi tāʼa nu nɛ.” Nɛnnɛ Jouŋ piŋ kiʼɛ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ŋkwe ŋkhǐ, ntaoŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ chomilaoŋ ghɔ. Ŋga njəɨ po ŋaʼaŋ, a yəɨ Jijwɛ Minnwi taoŋ po nɔ mintuʼɔlibuŋ ndia mbɨŋ yu. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, yichəɨ ŋggì chhu po ŋa, “Yei muuŋ a ŋa ŋ̀khwā ǹja mfāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ vi.” 
﻿Matio.
4.
Nɛnnɛ Jijwɛ Minnwi lɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju moŋ ŋkǔnu njó ŋa devɨ mōoŋ vi fɔ. 
A ni ŋga njī ŋkhǐ nɔ khwɛ wuŋ naoŋchɨ pugu pa khwɛ wuŋ tuʼu, njì yia vi. 
Nnɛ devɨ, mbɔ ŋgaŋ mōoŋ ŋoŋ thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ̈ mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi nɛ, ɔ fɛ nɛ gɨ́ pa ŋgùʼɔ pei kara ŋgū brɛi pia.” 
Ndɔ a khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Ŋoŋmishua shiʼa ŋguʼɔ njru pi ŋkuoŋ brɛi təʼɨ vi, ndɔ a ghà mbɨnɨ njru ŋkuoŋ ŋguoŋ chrà ŋa a taoŋ nchò Minnwi nɛ.’ ” 
Nnɛ devɨ lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ pugu yu Jerushalɛiŋ, mbɔ mmɛ laʼataoŋ taoŋtaoŋ, ntigi vi ŋkuoŋ nchwɛrɛ *Nda Minnwi, 
nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ̈ mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi, ɔ thi nɛ hɛiŋ ndhi nchəɨŋ shhɛ nthɛ ŋa pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Minnwi shi mfɛ gɨ́ ni pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi nthɛ ghɔ, pugu jā ghɔ tɔthɨ ni mbhɔ, nnɛ ŋa kiʼi ɔ chhwi kwò yɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋgùʼɔ.’ ” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pi pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Kiʼi ma njwɛʼi Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yɔ.’ ” 
Devɨ lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋkamuʼɔŋ ŋkuʼɔ ni ju ŋkuoŋ thɔ ŋkiɛŋ ntaaŋ mbra, nōoŋ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi ghɔ pugu pa ndighaʼo yugu, 
nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹshi mfɛ ŋguoŋ yi vɛ ghao nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ̈ ŋgū shhɛ ŋgaʼo a.” 
Nnɛ Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Lɔllɔ shhɨ a, ma Shata! Nthɛ ŋa pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Ghaʼo Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yɔ, ŋguʼɔ mfāʼa pi mbhɔ yu təʼɨ vi.’ ” 
Nɛnnɛ devɨ mieŋ vi ŋgə̄ɨ, ŋga njəɨ nu, pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi thɔ māʼaŋ ghrɨ́ yi. 
Ndwɛ Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo ŋa pi kwo wɛ̄iŋ Jouŋ, a pɨ̄nɨ njiŋ nii Galili. 
A ni ndhɔ moŋ laʼataoŋ Nasharɛ, ŋgə̄ɨ nthɔ nchhɔ nu Kapanuŋ, mbɔ laʼataoŋ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ, ŋgei laʼataoŋ Shɛbuluŋ pugu Naftali, 
nɛnnɛ ŋa nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, mbɔ Ishaya, ni nāʼaŋ nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ: 
“Laʼataoŋ Shɛbuluŋ pugu laʼataoŋ Naftali, shɛndaoŋ ghə̄ɨ nu cho mmɛ ŋkhǐ, mfərə Jodaŋ, ŋgwa ŋa pugu laʼa nu krao ŋgei Galili ŋa ŋgwa taoŋ nduoŋ ni mbɔ fɔ nɛ. 
Ŋgwa ŋa pugu chhɔ nu moŋ njiŋ nɛ yəɨ mmɛ líʼɛ. Ni ŋgwa ŋa pugu chhɔ pi moŋ miliʼi gu nɛ, líʼɛ kwo thɛ mbɨŋ pugu.” 
Jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ghɔ, Jishɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ nchīi chrà Minnwi ŋa, “P̂əɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ, nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Po kwo para.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nyīeŋ nu ŋkɨŋ mmɛ ŋkhǐ Galili, njəɨ paa pimbia mbɔ pa lǐŋ. Shemu, ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ni Pita nɛ, pugu Andru ndǐŋ vi, pugu thɔ māʼaŋ ndáŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ pi ghaŋ ŋgunu. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ yōu njiŋ a, ǹchwīe pəɨ pɔ ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ ŋgwamishua.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pugu mieŋ ndáŋ pugu njōu njiŋ yi. 
A gha ndɔllɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu, mbɨnɨ njəɨ pichəɨ paa pa lǐŋ, Jɛiŋ mbɔ muuŋ Shebedi pugu Jouŋ ndǐŋ vi moŋ kikuoŋ pugu pa Shebedi tǎa vugu, pugu chhɔ ntaʼa pa ndáŋ yugu. A gɛ̄ vugu. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pugu mieŋ kikuoŋ yugu pugu pa tǎa vugu njōu njiŋ yi. 
Jishɔ nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ Galili ghao, nthɔ njɛʼi ŋgwa moŋ pa *nda luoŋ Minnwi, nthɔ nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ mbɔ yi Shaʼafuoŋ, nthɔ njɨ̄gɨ ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pugu pa chəɨchəɨ mbɨŋ ŋgwa. 
Nnɛ ndighaʼo yi ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ Shiria. Pi thɔ ni ŋguoŋ ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ, pa ghaŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ ŋkwaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pugu pɔ yúʼɔ pɔ mbɨŋ pugu nɛ, pa ŋgwa ŋa miŋwɛiŋ ni mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pugu, ghaŋ guthɔ, pa ŋgwa ŋa pichəɨ lɨʼɨ noŋ yugu khu nɛ, a yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋguoŋ yugu ghao. 
Ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yú ŋgwa yōu njiŋ yi llɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ Galili pugu pa moŋ Dekapoli pugu pa moŋ Jerushalɛiŋ ni Judia ti ŋgə̄ɨ ti mfərə nɨnəɨ Jodaŋ. 
﻿Matio.
5.
Jishɔ ni ŋga njəɨ ntou yú ŋgwa, ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra ŋga nchɔchhɔ shhɛ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ mbara vi. 
A ŋaʼaŋ nchò yi njɛʼi vugu, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Mbɔrɔ yi ghaŋ pou moŋ jijwɛ, nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ pi yugu. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ ni tuʼuthɔ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa Minnwi shi māʼaŋ njùʼɔ yugu. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ juju nɛ, nthɛ ŋa ŋkuoŋ shhɛ lɛ mbɔ yugu. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu fāʼo njì pugu pa yaoŋ njùʼɔ nthɛ nnu ndɨndɨ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pi shi nchwīe pugu yru. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ghaŋ kwoshɨnɨ, nthɛ ŋa pi shi nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ ni pugu. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa njùʼɔ yugu yi taoŋtaoŋ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pugu shi njəɨ Minnwi. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ghaŋ chwīe taʼaŋggi, nthɛ ŋa pi shi mɛ̄iŋ vugu ni pa puoŋ Minnwi. 
Mbɔrɔ yi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi fɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pugu nthɛ nnu ndɨndɨ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Po shi mbɔ yugu. 
“Mbɔrɔ yəɨ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgwa wɛʼi vəɨ, mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pəɨ, ndɔ ndɛʼi ŋgiɛŋ nchhu ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ nnu pɨphɨ thɔ pəɨ nthɛ a nɛ. 
P̂əɨ tɛnɛ ndɔ mfāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ ŋa ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ kɨ̀nɛiŋ pɔ ni pəɨ po, nthɛ ŋa a wuʼɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ŋa pugu ni mfǔoŋ nthɔ shhɨ pəɨ nɛ. 
“Pəɨ pa khí ŋkuoŋ shhɛ, ndɔ ti khí mbhɛ̌ ghrɨ́ yi nɔ chwīe nu yaoŋ pwa, ɔ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkwəɨ ni ghrɨ́ yi ghɔ pi nɛiŋ? A lɔ nuʼuŋ mfāʼo ghɛ̀rɛ nɔ sheshe yaoŋ, ŋkiɛŋ ŋa pi mīʼaŋ vi ŋgwamishua nɨ̄ɨ ni kwò yugu. 
“Pəɨ pɔ nɔ líʼɛ ni ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋkuoŋ mbhi. Mmɛ laʼataoŋ ŋa pi krao ŋkuoŋ mbra nɛ shiʼa njiʼi ndə̄ɨŋ noŋ yi. 
Ŋoŋ shiʼa nchuʼu truka niʼiŋ laʼo mikuo, pi ghà ntigi pi ŋkuoŋ lɨʼɨ tigi truka, a fɛ líʼɛ ni ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɔ moŋ nda nɛ. 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, a pie ŋa líʼɛ yəɨ thɛ shhɨ ŋgwamishua, nnɛ ŋa a nthɛ pugu yəɨ pa fàʼa pəɨ pi shiʼi, ŋgaʼo Tǎa vəɨ ŋa a pɔ po nɛ. 
“Kiʼi pəɨ pīʼi ŋa ǹthɔ pi nɔ lāa nu gɨ́ ki pa nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi yɛʼi nɛ, ǹshini ndɔ nthɔ pi nɔ lāa nu, ŋki thɔ pi nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa pugu yɛʼi nu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shishini ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa, nɔ haʼaŋ po pugu shhɛ wuʼɔ mbɔ nɛ, mbaʼa taʼa muuŋ mi ligi yaoŋ, ki taʼa pra ligi yaoŋ yiʼi ntɔgɔ ghagha moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ gɨ́ ki lɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ pi wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pi nāʼaŋ nɛ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a pəʼɨ taʼa muuŋ mi kɨ̀na shɨna pa kɨ̀na pei, ndɔ njɛʼi ŋgwa nduoŋ nɔ chwīe nu nɛnnɛ ŋkaa pugu nɛ, pi shi ma mɛ̄iŋ vi ni ndugwi muuŋ mi ŋoŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po, ndɔ ti shesheŋoŋ ŋa a nūʼɔŋ gɨ́ pighɔ ndɔ njɛʼi ŋgwa nduoŋ ŋa pugu nūʼɔŋ nɛ, pi shi ma mɛ̄iŋ vi ni ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa n̈dɨndɨ yəɨ mieŋ ki lɔ nchaa yi pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi, paʼa pəɨ lɔ nii moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. 
“Pəɨ yaʼo ŋa pi ni nchhu ni ŋgwa llɛshhɨ ŋa, ‘Kiʼi pəɨ ma njwi ŋoŋ, ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a jwi ŋoŋ nɛ shi nthi sháʼa.’ 
Ndɔ ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a pɨgɨtua ni ndǐŋ vi nɛ shi nthi sháʼa, ɔ̈ nchhu ni ndǐŋ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ŋoŋ ghagha yei,’ kaŋ pi shi ŋgə̄ɨ ni gɔ nda nchaʼo, ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chhu ni ndǐŋ vi ŋa, ‘Ɔ na,’ minthɛ a pɔ moŋ lwilwiʼi nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ. 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ɔ̈ nthɔ nu lɨʼɨ mfɛ yaoŋ fɛ́ yɔ ŋkuoŋ *lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ŋkwiŋ fɔ ŋa ndǐŋ ghɔ fāʼo nnu njùʼɔ yu nthɛ ghɔ, 
ɔ̂ mieŋ yaoŋ fɛ́ yɔ fɔ shhɨ lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ mfǔoŋ mbɨnɨ ŋgə̄ɨ ndugwi, nchīni ŋggì pəɨ ndǐŋ ghɔ, nnɛ mbɨnɨ kiʼɛ mfɛ yaoŋ fɛ́ yɔ. 
“Ŋ̈oŋ nchhu nnu thɔ ghɔ pəɨ yu fāʼo nɔ thi nu sháʼa ndashaʼa, kə̄nə pəɨ yu lūgwi ŋkaoŋ maa nchəɨŋ ndashaʼa, kaŋ a shi nchaʼa ghɔ nɛ mfɛ ni brushi pi niʼiŋ ghɔ chə́ɨŋ. 
Shishini, ǹshwei ghɔ, mbaʼa ɔ ma ntaoŋ ki lɔ naa mbe ŋguoŋ njɔ́ yɔ ghao. 
“Pəɨ yaʼo ŋa pi ni nchhu ŋa, ‘Kiʼi ŋgaŋ láŋ kwoshuoŋ.’ 
Ndɔ ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, sheshe mimbia ŋa a pɛʼi miŋgwɛ nshɔ̄rɔ nūaŋ nu pugu yu nɛ, kwo nūaŋ pugu yu moŋ njùʼɔ yu. 
Nɛnnɛ, ŋ̈gei ligi yɔ yi jɨ nchwīe ŋa ɔ gū moŋ phɨ, ɔ̂ fīʼa mfuʼu mīʼaŋ nthɛ ŋa a pwa ŋa a phɛ taʼa ghrà noŋ yɔ nchaa ŋa ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ ghə̄ɨ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ. 
Ti ŋgei mbhɔ yɔ yi jɨ nchwīe ŋa ɔ chwīe phɨ, ɔ̂ yaʼa mīʼaŋ, a pwa ŋa a phɛ taʼa ghrà noŋ yɔ nchaa ŋa ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ ghə̄ɨ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ. 
“Pi ni mbɨnɨ nchhu ŋa, ‘Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi nɛ, a pie ŋa a fɛ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ shāaŋ láŋ ghɔ.’ 
Ndɔ ndwɛ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi nthɛ sheshe nnu ŋkiɛŋ pi nnu shúoŋ nɛ, ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋgushaʼa nɔ chwīe nu miŋgwɛ ghɔ kwo shúoŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a mbɨnɨ ndaŋ, ndɔ mimbia ŋa a laŋ miŋgwɛ ŋa a taoŋ láŋ nɛ kwo shúoŋ ŋkaa yu. 
“Pəɨ ni mbɨnɨ njaʼo ŋa pi ni nchhu ni pa ŋgwa llɛshhɨ ŋa, ‘Kiʼi ma shwrɛ̄i nnu ni mbe, ndɔ chwīe nnu ŋa ɔ shwrɛ̄i ni Taathɔ ŋa ɔ shi nchwīe nɛ.’ 
Ndɔ ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa kiʼi nshwrɛ̄i nnu kaŋ shɨgɛi, kiʼi nshwrɛ̄i po nthɛ ŋa a faaŋ Minnwi, 
ki shhɛ, nthɛ ŋa a krɨ́ tigi kwò Minnwi, ki Jerushalɛiŋ, nthɛ ŋa a laʼataoŋ Fùoŋ ndiɛŋ. 
Kiʼi njiʼi ndɔ nshwrɛ̄i pi thɔ yɔ nthɛ ŋa minthɛ paʼa ɔ lɔ nchwīe taʼa ŋgiithɔ a pɔ pi yi fhu ki yi shhi. 
Ndɔ a pie ŋa, ‘Ooŋ’ yəɨ pɔ ‘Ooŋ’ ki ‘Ŋga’ yəɨ pɔ ‘Ŋga.’ Sheshe nnu nduoŋ ntɔgɔ yei llɔ pi mbhɔ ŋoŋ mbɨmbhɨ. 
“Pəɨ ni njaʼo ŋa pi chhu ŋa, ‘Ŋ̈oŋ mfuʼu taʼa ligi ŋoŋ pi fuʼu ji, ti ŋoŋ nchuʼɔ taʼa shua ŋoŋ pi chuʼɔ ji.’ 
Ndɔ ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa kiʼi nduʼu phɨ ŋoŋ ni phɨ. Ŋ̈oŋ ŋgwie ŋgei ghə̀ʼɨ yɔ yi jɨ, ɔ kara ŋgei mbhɔ ŋkwrɛi a wie ŋkaa yu. 
Ŋ̈oŋ mburu ghɔ ŋkwe muuŋ ndhwí yɔ, ɔ̂ mieŋ a kwe mmɛ ndhwí yɔ ŋkaa yu. 
Ŋ̈oŋ ŋɨ ghɔ ŋa ɔ nyīeŋ taʼa ŋkaŋ ni tiɛŋ ŋkɨɨ kwò, ɔ̂ ghə̄ɨ trɛi ŋkaŋ kwò pəɨ yu. 
Ŋ̈oŋ nduoŋ yaoŋ mbhɔ ghɔ, ɔ̂ fɛ ghɔ, ŋ̈oŋ mfōo yaoŋ mbhɔ ghɔ, kiʼi ɔ lāa fɛ nu ghɔ. 
“Pəɨ ni njaʼo ŋa pi chhu ŋa, ‘Ɔ khwā taakuo yɔ, mbɨ̄na mbɨ̌na yɔ.’ 
Ndɔ ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, P̂əɨ khwā pa mbɨ̌na pəɨ, nduoŋ Minnwi mfɛ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu fɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pəɨ nɛ, 
nnɛ ŋa pinthɛ pəɨ pɔ puoŋ Tǎa vəɨ ŋa a pɔ po nɛ, nthɛ ŋa a ghà nchwīe minaoŋ yi thɛ mbɨŋ pa ŋgwa pɨphɨ pugu pa ŋgwa shiʼi, mfɛ mbɨ̀ ni ŋgwa ndɨndɨ pugu pa ŋgwa təɨtəɨ. 
Minnwi shi ŋkɨnɛiŋ ghɔ nthɛ pi khɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ̈ ŋguʼɔ ŋkhwā pi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu khwā ghɔ nɛ? Njiʼi nthɛ pi pa ŋgwɛ̄iŋ taashi ghà ŋguʼɔ nchwīe pi nnɛ. 
Ti p̈əɨ ŋguʼɔ nthɔ nchrā pi ni lǐŋ pəɨ, nnu ghaghaʼa fɔ pɔ pi khɔ? Njiʼi nthɛ pi ghaŋ ki piŋ Minnwi shiʼa nchwīe nɛnnɛ? 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, p̂əɨ pɔ ŋgwa tithi nɔ haʼaŋ Tǎa vəɨ po ŋoŋ tithi nɛ. 
﻿Matio.
6.
“Pəɨ lɨna nu nɔ fāʼa nu fàʼa ndɨndɨ yəɨ shhɨ ŋgwa pi ŋa pugu yəɨ vəɨ, nthɛ ŋa p̈əɨ nchwīe nɛnnɛ, paʼa pəɨ lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo kɨ̀nɛiŋ mbhɔ Tǎa vəɨ ŋa a pɔ po nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ, ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ fɛ yaoŋ ni ghaŋ pou nɛ, kiʼi ɔ tua ntàŋ nɔ chwīe nu ŋgwa ji nɔ haʼaŋ ghaŋ mifɨɨ ghà nchwīe moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi pugu pa taʼandaoŋ, nnɛ ŋa pa ŋgwamishua piŋ vugu. Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, pugu kwo fāʼo kɨ̀nɛiŋ yugu ti a kāʼo. 
Ndɔ ti ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ fɛ yaoŋ ni ghaŋ pou nɛ, kiʼi nchwīe ŋgei mbhɔ yɔ yi ŋkwrɛi yəɨ yaoŋ ŋa ŋgei mbhɔ yɔ yi jɨ chwīe nu nɛ, 
nnɛ ŋa fɛ́ yɔ pɔ yi lə̄ɨŋ, Tǎa ghɔ ŋa a ghà njəɨ nnu ŋa pi chwīe lə̄ɨŋ nɛ shi ŋkɨnɛiŋ ghɔ. 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ luoŋ Minnwi nɛ, kiʼi pəɨ pɔ nɔ ghaŋ mifɨɨ, nthɛ ŋa pugu khwā nɔ thi nu nduoŋ Minnwi moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi pugu pa ŋkɨŋ ndaoŋ, nnɛ ŋa ŋgwa yəɨ vugu. Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, pugu kwo fāʼo kɨ̀nɛiŋ yugu. 
Ndɔ ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ luoŋ Minnwi nɛ, ghə̄ɨ moŋ njiɛŋ nda yɔ, nchri chonda nduoŋ ni Tǎa ghɔ ŋa a pɔ lɨʼɨ lə̄ɨŋ nnɛ kaŋ Tǎa ghɔ ŋa a ghà njəɨ nnu ŋa pi chwīe lə̄ɨŋ nɛ shi ŋkɨnɛiŋ ghɔ. 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ luoŋ Minnwi nɛ, kiʼi nthɔ nchrā mbiʼi pa nnu ghagha ŋa a lɔ mfāʼo njiŋ yi ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pa ghaŋ ki piŋ Minnwi ghà nchwīe nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pugu pīʼi ŋa Minnwi shi ŋkhwɛ̄ luoŋ yugu nthɛ pi ntou chrà pighɔ. 
Nɛnnɛ, kiʼi mbɔ nɔ pugu nthɛ ŋa Tǎa vəɨ ji yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ pou nu nɛ ŋkaoŋ pəɨ maa ndɔ mbie vi nɔ ghɔ. 
Yei kiʼɛ, ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pəɨ shi nduoŋ nɛ: Tǎa vigi ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ, ghaʼo nu pɔ ni ligi yɔ. 
Shaʼafuoŋ yɔ thɔ, nnu ŋa ɔ tāʼa nu nɛ pɔ, ŋkuoŋ shhɛ nɔ haʼaŋ a pɔ po nɛ. 
Fɛ maoŋ ŋa a pie ŋa pigi yru ŋkuoŋ ghɔ shiʼa nɛ ni pigi. 
Ndɔ ndīʼɛ phɨ yigi, nɔ haʼaŋ pigi ŋkaa pigi ghà ndīʼɛ phɨ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu fāaŋ mbɨŋ pigi nɛ. 
Kiʼi nchwīe pigi nii moŋ tɨtɨnɨ mōoŋ nu ndɔ kwe vigi mbhɔ ŋoŋ mbɨmbhɨ. 
“Nthɛ ŋa p̈əɨ ndīʼɛ phɨ ŋa ŋgwa nduoŋ chwīe mbɨŋ pəɨ nɛ, kaŋ Tǎa vəɨ ŋa a pɔ po nɛ shi ndīʼɛ yəɨ. 
Ndɔ ti p̈əɨ mieŋ ki līʼɛ phɨ ŋa ŋgwa nduoŋ chwīe mbɨŋ pəɨ nɛ, kaŋ mbaʼa Tǎa vəɨ po yiʼi ndīʼɛ yəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ. 
“Sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ jī ŋkhǐ nɛ, kiʼi pəɨ chwīe ligi yəɨ kūo nɔ pa ghaŋ mifɨɨ, nthɛ ŋa pugu ghà nchwīe ligi yugu fūŋ nnɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ji ŋa pugu jī ŋkhǐ. Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, pugu kwo fāʼo kɨ̀nɛiŋ yugu. 
Ndɔ gɔ̀, ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ jī ŋkhǐ nɛ, shiri thɔ yɔ ni wru, nshɨ̄gao ligi yɔ, 
nnɛ ŋa kiʼi ŋgwa yəɨ ŋa ɔ thɔ njī ŋkhǐ, ndɔ a wuʼɔ njəɨ Tǎa ghɔ ŋa a pɔ moŋ lɨʼɨ lə̄ɨŋ nɛ, nnɛ Tǎa ghɔ ŋa a ghà njəɨ nnu ŋa ɔ chwīe nu lə̄ɨŋ nɛ shi ŋkɨnɛiŋ ghɔ. 
“Kiʼi pəɨ lə̄ɨŋ pa fāʼo ni noŋ pəɨ ŋkuoŋ shhɛ hɛiŋ lɨʼɨ ŋa shə́ʼɨ pugu pa wrukiɛŋ shi mbɨrɨ nɛ, lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ pa ŋgɨna shi mbəʼɨ nii njōo nɛ. 
Ndɔ pəɨ lə̄ɨŋ pa fāʼo ni noŋ pəɨ pi po, mbɔ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ mbaʼa shə́ʼɨ, ki wrukiɛŋ yiʼi mbɨrɨ nɛ, ndɔ mbɔ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ mbaʼa pa ŋgɨna pəʼɨ nii njōo. 
Nthɛ ŋa lɨʼɨ ŋa fāʼo yɔ pɔ nɛ, a lɨʼɨ ŋa njùʼɔ yɔ shi mbɔ ŋkaa yu nɛ. 
“Ligi yɔ pɔ pi laŋ noŋ yɔ, nɛnnɛ l̈igi yɔ mbɔ shiʼi, mbɔ ŋa mbhɔ yɔ ghà ntaoŋ, ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ lɨnaoŋ ni líʼɛ. 
Ndɔ l̈igi yɔ mieŋ ki pɔ shiʼi, mbɔ ŋa ɔ ŋgaŋ ghìʼɛ, ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ lɨnaoŋ ni njiŋnjiŋ. Ä mbɔ ŋa líʼɛ ŋa ɔ pīʼi ŋa ɔ fāʼo nɛ pɔ pi njiŋnjiŋ, kaŋ njiŋnjiŋ ghɔ ghaʼo pi ŋkwaŋ nɛiŋ! 
“Mbaʼa taʼa ŋoŋ pɔ muuŋ fàʼa mbhɔ paa masha, nthɛ ŋa a shi mbɨ̄na taʼa yi ŋkhwā vichəɨ, ki nɛ, a fɛ noŋ yi ni taʼa yi nchɨ̄ʼə vichəɨ. Mbaʼa pəɨ fāʼa mbhɔ Minnwi pugu mbɨŋ. 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo ghana njùʼɔ nthɛ chɔmbhi yəɨ ŋa pəɨ shi njɨ pi khɔ ki nnu khɔ, ki nthɛ ŋgrào noŋ yəɨ ŋa pəɨ shi māʼaŋ pi khɔ? Chɔmbhi lɔ nchaa maoŋ jɨ, noŋ yəɨ chaa ndhwí? 
Pɛʼi pa mishi ŋa pugu ghà njei tɔthɨ njəɨ, pugu shiʼa mbhi maoŋ, ki kwōo, ki nūʼɔŋ maoŋ shaoŋ, ndɔ Tǎa vəɨ po ghà ŋkugwi vugu ghao. Pəɨ lɔ ŋgāʼo nchaa pa mishi? 
Minthɛ shesheŋoŋ vəɨ pɨnɨ mbīgi chɔmbhi yi wuʼɔ shɨgɛi nthɛ ŋa a wie noŋ yi? 
“Ti pəɨ fāʼo ghana njùʼɔ nthɛ ndhwí pi nɔ khɔ? Pīʼi mbɨŋ pa frawa moŋ trǔ, pugu shiʼa mfaʼa ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ntuŋ ndhwí, 
ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa njiʼi nthɛ pi Sholomu moŋ ŋguoŋ ndighaʼo yi ghao shini ndɔ mbwa ti nchəɨŋ nɔ taʼa frawa. 
Ti M̈innwi māʼaŋ fɨʼɨ ndìpwa yei mbɨŋ pa trǔ ŋa a yi maoŋ shiʼa, yua gha mbɔ nu a kwo yaoŋ ti pi tūoŋ nɛ, pəɨ pīʼi ŋa a shi ndɨna ni pəɨ pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Ŋgwa piŋ kikɛʼi pei? 
“Kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo ghana njùʼɔ, nthɔ nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Ti pigi shi njɨ pi khɔ, ki pigi shi nnu pi khɔ, ki pigi shi māʼaŋ pi khɔ?’ 
Nthɛ ŋa pa ghaŋ ki piŋ Minnwi thɔ ntei pi njiŋ pa maoŋ pei, Tǎa vəɨ po ji ŋa a pie ŋa pəɨ fāʼo maoŋ pei. 
Pəɨ ka shigi pi Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pugu pa ndɨndɨ yi, kaŋ Minnwi shi mfɛ ŋguoŋ maoŋ pei ghao ni pəɨ. 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, kiʼi njùʼɔ yɔ ghana nthɛ llɛmbhi yua, nthɛ ŋa llɛmbhi yua fāʼo ji pa nnu nɔ ghana nu nɔ ghɔ. Sheshe llɛ́ fāʼo pa ji ghaghaʼa. 
﻿Matio.
7.
“Kiʼi pəɨ shaʼa pa ŋgwa nduoŋ nnɛ ŋa kiʼi pi shaʼa vəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ shaʼa ŋgwa nduoŋ nɛ, a ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pi shi nshaʼa vəɨ nɛ, nthɨŋkwo haʼaŋ pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ nɔ shaʼa nu ŋgwa nɔ nɛ, pi shi nshaʼa vəɨ pi wuʼɔ ni fɨʼɨ nthɨŋkwo ghɔ. 
“A chwīe khɔ ɔ yəɨ muuŋ ŋkuʼu thɨ ŋa a pɔ ligi ndǐŋ ghɔ, ndɔ ki lɔ mfāʼo ndɨɨ ni mmɛ mbɨɨ ŋkwɛiŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ jɔ ligi nɛ? 
Ki minthɛ ɔ kie nɛiŋ nchhu ni ndǐŋ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Naʼaŋ mfuʼu ŋkuʼu thɨ ligi ghɔ,’ ndɔ mmɛ mbɨɨ ŋkwɛiŋ lɔ mbɔ nɔ jɔ ligi? 
Ŋgaŋ mifɨɨ vei, fǔoŋ mfuʼu mmɛ mbɨɨ ŋkwɛiŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ jɔ ligi nɛ ŋkaoŋ, kaŋ ɔ shi njəɨlɨʼɨ shishiʼi nɔ fuʼu nu muuŋ ŋkuʼu thɨ ŋa a pɔ ligi ndǐŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
“Kiʼi mfɛ yaoŋ ŋa a yi taoŋtaoŋ nɛ ni pa miŋgu, kaŋ pugu shi ŋkara nshāa ghɔ paapaa, ndɔ kiʼi pəɨ māʼaŋ pa ŋgùʼɔ tɨnɨnchuoŋ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni pəə nɛ shhɨ pa miŋkunyaŋ, kaŋ pugu shi nɛ nɨ̄ɨ ni kwò. 
“P̂əɨ pie, kaŋ Minnwi shi mfɛ ni pəɨ, p̂əɨ taʼa, kaŋ Minnwi shi nchwīe pəɨ yəɨ, p̂əɨ kwēi kaŋ Minnwi shi nchuʼɔ chonda ni pəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a pie nɛ, ghà mfāʼo, ŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nɛ yəɨ, ni ŋoŋ ŋa a kwēi nɛ, pi shi nchuʼɔ chonda ghɔ. 
“Ki a gɔ̌ ŋoŋ shɨna pəɨ ŋa m̈uuŋ vi mbie kəɨŋ brɛi mbhɔ yu, a fɛ pi kəɨŋ ŋguʼɔ ghɔ, 
ki mbie vi ni shhu, a fɛ pi mitwɛʼi ghɔ? 
Ti pəɨ kiʼɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà nchwīe phɨ nɛ nji fɛ nu maoŋ shiʼi ni puoŋ pəɨ, ti Tǎa vəɨ ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ shi mfɛ pa ŋkiɛŋ maoŋ ni ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu pie nɛ pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, moŋ ŋguoŋ pa nnu ghao, chwīe mbɨŋ ŋgwa nduoŋ wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ khwā ŋa pi chwīe mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa yei nnu ŋa gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi chhu nu nɛ. 
“Tɔgɔ pi choŋkaʼa kikɛʼi nii, nthɛ ŋa choŋkaʼa ŋa a tɔgɔ nii moŋ móŋoŋ ŋguʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ nɛ ghaʼo ndɔ njiʼɛ, ntou ŋgwa tɔgɔ nu fɔ nii nu. 
Nthɛ ŋa choŋkaʼa pugu pa ndaoŋ ŋa a tɔgɔ nii moŋ chɔmbhi nɛ yi kikɛʼi, ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu yəɨ ntɔgɔ fɔ nɛ pɔ shɨgɛi. 
“P̂əɨ chhɔ ndɨna pa njəɨlɨʼɨ mifɨɨ ŋa pugu thɔ ni pəɨ moŋ ŋgrào pa minjɨɨ ndɔ moŋ ghɔ pugu pɔ pa miŋaŋieŋ pɨgɛi lɨʼɨ. 
Pəɨ shi nji vugu ŋkuoŋ ntíɛŋ yugu. Pi shiʼa ndɨ̄ga ŋguuŋ laʼo shǐe ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋka chìa ŋkuoŋ mbiembie. 
Nɛnnɛ sheshe thɨ ŋa a lɔ mfāʼo ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ ghà njuŋ ntíɛŋ shiʼi, ndɔ thɨ ŋa a fāʼo ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ yuŋ ntíɛŋ pɨphɨ. 
Mbaʼa thɨ ŋa a lɔ mfāʼo ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ yuŋ ntíɛŋ pɨphɨ, ki thɨ ŋa a fāʼo ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ yuŋ ntíɛŋ shiʼi. 
Sheshe thɨ ŋa a lɔ njuŋ ntíɛŋ shiʼi, pi shi ŋkəʼɨ māʼaŋ shhɛ ndɔ māʼaŋ moŋ móŋoŋ. 
Nɛnnɛ, ɔ shi nji vugu ŋkuoŋ ntíɛŋ yugu. 
“A lɔ mbɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a mɛ̄iŋ a ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, Taathɔ,’ nɛ ŋa a lɛ ma nii moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po, a wuʼɔ ŋoŋ yɛ ŋa a ghà nchwīe nnu ŋa Tǎa a po tāʼa nu nɛ ŋa a shi nii. 
Llɛmbhi ghɔ, ntou pa ŋgwa ma nchhu vəɨ ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, Taathɔ, pigi shini ndɔ njəɨ pa nnu chhu nɔ ligi yɔ, mfuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ nɔ ligi yɔ, mfāʼa pa mɛmmɛ tɨtɨnɨ fàʼa nɔ ligi yɔ?’ 
Ǹchhu kiʼɛ ni pugu ŋa, ‘Ǹshini ndɔ nji vəɨ, pəɨ lɔllɔ, pa ŋgūo nnu mbɨmbhɨ pei.’ 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a yaʼo pa chrà paŋ pei ndɔ nchwīe nɛ pɔ nɔ ŋgaŋ shiethɔ ŋa a ni ŋkrao nda yi ŋkuoŋ ŋkiɛŋ ŋgùʼɔ, 
mbɨ̀ ghà ndhɔ, ŋkhǐ shwiʼi, fɨfrəɨ thɔ ntuŋ nda ghɔ, paʼa a lɔ ŋgū nthɛ ŋa pi ni krao pi ŋkuoŋ ŋkiɛŋ ŋgùʼɔ. 
Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a yaʼo chrà a yei ki lɔ nchwīe nɛ, shi mbɔ nɔ nàna ŋa a ni ŋkrao nda yi pi ŋkuoŋ shíshhɛ. 
Mbɨ̀ ni ŋga ndhɔ, ŋkhǐ shwiʼi, fɨfrəɨ thɔ ntuŋ ŋkuoŋ nda ghɔ, a gū nwīʼiŋ ghao.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ chhu nu nnu pei, pa yú ŋgwa pighɔ fɔ nɛ ghrāo ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ, 
nthɛ ŋa a ni nthɔ njɛʼi vugu pi nɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo ghrɨ́, ki lɔ mbɔ pi nɔ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi. 
﻿Matio.
8.
Jishɔ ni ŋga nshwiʼi ŋkuoŋ mbra, yú ŋgwa yōu njiŋ yi. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, ŋgaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ chəɨ thɔ njəɨ vi, ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ yu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Taathɔ, ɔ̈ ntāʼa nu, ɔ chwīe m̀bɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ.” 
Jishɔ fɛ mbhɔ yi ŋkāoŋ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ǹtāʼa nu, pɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ.” Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, ghɨnɔmbaluŋ mmɛ mbɨŋ yu. 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nshwei shesheŋoŋ, ndɔ ghə̄ɨ nōoŋ noŋ yɔ ni *ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi, a līi ghɔ nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa Minnwi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ. Fɛ yaoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɔ haʼaŋ gɨ́ Mushi chhu nɛ.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni nii Kapanuŋ nɛ, yichəɨ nthishɨ pa taʼa ŋkɨɨ shoogɛ thɔ njəɨ vi ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa, 
“Taathɔ, muuŋ fàʼa a nūaŋ kúoŋ, taʼa ŋgei noŋ yi khu, a thɔ njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ ŋkiɛŋ yie ghɔ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹshi nthɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yi.” 
Ndɔ nthishɨ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Taathɔ, ǹdɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo fɨʼɨ ŋoŋ ŋa minthɛ ɔ nii nda mu nɛ, wuʼɔ fɛ pi gɨ́ ghɨ̌nɔ muuŋ fàʼa a tɔgɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa mmu nduthɔ a, ŋ̀ga mfāʼa mbhɔ ŋgwa ndɔ nthɔ nshaʼa pa shoogɛ ŋkaa mu. Ŋ̀ga mfɛ gɨ́ ni taʼa yi ŋa, ‘Ghə̄ɨ,’ a ghə̄ɨ, mfɛ gɨ́ ni yichəɨ ŋa, ‘Thɔ,’ a thɔ. Mfɛ gɨ́ ni muuŋ fàʼa a ŋa chwīe yei, a chwīe.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei ŋgrāo, nchhu ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthɔ njōu njiŋ yi nɛ ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, ǹdɔ naa njəɨ ŋoŋ ni fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ piŋ yei moŋ laʼataoŋ Ishrae. 
Ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa ntou ŋgwa shi ndhɔ ŋgei laʼataoŋ shaʼa minaoŋ ni ŋgei nii minaoŋ nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi pugu pa Abrahaŋ ni Aiji ni Jakɔ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. 
Ndɔ pi māʼaŋ puoŋ Shaʼafuoŋ mbhi moŋ njiŋnjiŋ mbɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa kə̄ɨ nu pugu pa kru nu shua shi mbɔ fɔ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni nthishɨ ghɔ ŋa, “Ghə̄ɨ, nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ piŋ nɛ, a nɔ haʼaŋ a shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ vɛ nɛ.” Ghɨ̌nɔ muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ kāʼo ndɔ ntɔgɔtɔgɔ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nii nda Pita, njəɨ mǔuŋ ŋgwɛ vi nūaŋ kúoŋ nthɔ ŋgɨ̄nɔ shɨ̀gao. 
Jishɔ kāoŋ mbhɔ yi shɨ̀gao ghɔ taoŋ mbɨŋ yu, a lɔllɔ nchwīe maoŋ mfɛ ghɔ. 
Fanaoŋ ni ŋga mbɔ, pi thɔ ni ntou pa ŋgwa ni miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ pugu njəɨ vi nɔ ghɔ, a fuʼu pa jijwɛ pighɔ ni taʼa chrà, ndɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni ŋgɨ̄nɔ nu nɛ. 
Yei ni mbɔ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Ishaya ni nchhu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ: “Ju nduthɔ yi ni ŋkwe pa noŋ kikie yia ndɔ nchwīe pa ghɨ̌nɔ pia tɔgɔ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njəɨ yú ŋgwa yəɨ yu, mfɛ gɨ́ ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa pugu shāʼa nɔ njiɛŋ ŋkhǐ nduoŋ. 
Yichəɨ masha ŋgaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, ǹshi njōu njiŋ yɔ sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa ɔ shi ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pa mimbaaŋguo fāʼo pa pùo pugu, pa mishi fāʼo pa nda pugu, ndɔ *Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo lɨʼɨ lɛ̄rɛ thɔ yi.” 
Yichəɨ taʼa *ŋgaŋ younjiŋ yi chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, fǔoŋ mieŋ ŋgə̄ɨ ntwei tǎa a ŋkaoŋ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Thɔ njōu njiŋ a, mieŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu khu nɛ twei khu ŋgwa pugu.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nii moŋ kikuoŋ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi yōu njiŋ yi. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, mmɛ fiŋ gū moŋ ŋkhǐ ti kikuoŋ tāʼa nu njīe, ndɔ Jishɔ ka thɔ ndɛllɛ. 
Pugu ghə̄ɨ ŋgūʼu vi lɔgɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Kwe vigi, ma Taathɔ, pia chhɔ nɛ ŋkukhu.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ chhɔ mbɔgɔ pi khɔ, ghaŋ piŋ kikɛʼi pei?” Ndɔllɔ kiʼɛ mbɨ̄ga fɨfrəɨ ghɔ pugu pa ŋkhǐ, mmɛ juju gū moŋ ŋkhǐ. 
Ŋgwa pighɔ ghrāo, nchhu nu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi yəɨ ŋkwaŋ ŋoŋ nɛiŋ ŋa njiʼi nthɛ pi fɨfrəɨ pugu pa ŋkhǐ yaʼo nchò yi?” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nshāʼa ŋkhǐ ntaoŋ krao ŋgei laʼataoŋ Gadara, mbāoŋ pugu pa paa ŋgwa ŋa miŋwɛiŋ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ pugu, pugu taoŋ nu moŋ fúŋ moŋ ŋgùʼɔ, pugu ni nchɨgəɨ ti minthɛ paʼa ŋoŋ lɔ ntɔgɔ ndaoŋ ghɔ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, pugu paʼo ŋgòu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Yo! Muuŋ Minnwi, pia fāʼo pi khɔ? Ɔ thɔ hɛiŋ nɔ fɛ nu ŋgəʼɨ ni pigi ki ndɨɨ lɔ naa ŋkāʼo?” 
Kwíe ntou ŋkunyaŋ ni nthɔ njɨ nu ni ŋgei lɨʼɨ ghɔ yəɨ pugu. 
Pa miŋwɛiŋ pighɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ ndɨ̄gəɨ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ä mbɔ ŋa ɔ shi mfuʼu vigi, ɔ taoŋ vigi pigi nii mbɨŋ kwíe ŋkunyaŋ pinɛ.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ghə̄ɨ!” Pugu taoŋ kiʼɛ nii mbɨŋ pa ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ. Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, ŋguoŋ kwíe ŋkunyaŋ ghɔ tei llɔ ŋkɨŋ mbra ghɔ nshwiʼi ŋgū moŋ ŋkhǐ ŋkhu. 
Ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ tei, ŋga ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ laʼa, nshwei ŋguoŋ pa nnu ŋa a ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, mīʼɛŋ mbɔ nnu ŋa a ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ mbɨŋ paa ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu ni mfāʼo miŋwɛiŋ nɛ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, ŋguoŋ ŋgwa moŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ taoŋ nthɔ lɨʼɨ para Jishɔ, ŋga njəɨ vi, ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a taoŋ moŋ krao ŋgei laʼa yugu ŋgə̄ɨ. 
﻿Matio.
9.
Jishɔ nii moŋ kikuoŋ nshāʼa ntaoŋ moŋ ji laʼataoŋ. 
Ŋgaŋ njəɨ nu, pichəɨ ŋgwa thɔ ni yichəɨ ŋkwíni ŋkuoŋ kúoŋ. Jishɔ ni ŋga njəɨ fɨʼɨ piŋ yugu, nchhu ni ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋa, “Fāʼo tɨnɨnjuʼɔ, ma muuŋ a, pi līʼɛ pa phɨ pɔ.” 
Ŋga njəɨ nu, pichəɨ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi chhu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei chrā chrà nchɨʼəshə nɔ ligi Minnwi!” 
Jishɔ ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbiʼi nu nɛ nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ thɔ mbīʼi nnu pɨphɨ njùʼɔ pəɨ nthɛ khɔ? 
A yīʼɛ yəɨ: Chhu nu ŋa, ‘Pi līʼɛ pa phɨ pɔ,’ ki chhu nu ŋa, ‘Lɔllɔ, nyieŋ’? 
Ndɔ nɔ chwīe nu pəɨ ji ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua fāʼo ghrɨ́ ŋkuoŋ shhɛ nɔ līʼɛ nu pa phɨ,” a chhu ni ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋa, “Lɔllɔ, lɔ̄gɔ kúoŋ yɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼa.” 
A lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼa. 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ ni ŋga njəɨ nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, mbɔgɔ gu ŋgaʼo Minnwi ŋa a fɛ ŋkwaŋ ghrɨ́ ghɔ ni ŋgwamishua nɛ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ndɔllɔ fɔ, njəɨ ŋoŋ chəɨ, ligi yi pɔ Matio, a chhɔ moŋ ntǎa kwe taashi, a chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Yōu njiŋ a!” A yrɛi shhɛ njōu njiŋ yi. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchhɔ yəɨ taprɛi nthɔ njɨ maoŋ nda Matio nɛ, ntou pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ chwīe phɨ thɔ nthɔ njɨ maoŋ pugu pa Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi. 
Pa ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋga njəɨ nnu yei, nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ masha vəɨ jɨ yaoŋ pugu pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ?” 
A ni ŋga njaʼo, nchhu ŋa, “Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ shiʼi nɛ lɔ mfāʼo chà ŋgaŋ fhɔ̌, a fāʼo ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ghɨ̌nɔ nu nɛ. 
Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ ntāʼa njiŋ nnu yei ŋa Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi chhu nɛ ŋa, ‘Ǹtāʼa nu ŋa ŋgwa nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ ki lɔ ŋguʼɔ mfɛ pi yaoŋ *fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ.’ Nthɛ ŋa ǹshini ndɔ nthɔ pi nɔ gɛ̄ nu ŋgwa ndɨndɨ, ǹthɔ nthɛ pi ghaŋ phɨ.” 
Nnɛ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ thɔ njəɨ Jishɔ mbie vi ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ pigi pa ŋgwa Farashi jī ŋkhǐ, ndɔ paʼa pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ lɔ njī?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Mimfɛ pa ghaŋ gɛ̀ lɨʼɨ láŋ pɔ ni tuʼuthɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pugu pa mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ wuʼɔ mbɔ kaʼa nɛ? Ndɔ pa llɛ́ pighɔ shi nthɔ ŋa pi shi mfuʼu mimbia láŋ ghɔ shɨna pugu, nɛnnɛ pugu shi njī ŋkhǐ. 
“Mbaʼa ŋoŋ chri paʼo ŋkuoŋ ndunu ndhwí ni pra ndhwí fhi, nthɛ ŋa pra ndhwí fhi ghɔ shi ŋga ŋɨnɛiŋ, a ka mīʼɛŋ māʼaŋ pi mmɛ mbo ŋkuoŋ ndhwí ghɔ. 
“Ŋgwa shiʼa niʼiŋ làʼo fhi moŋ ndunu mikei ŋgrào, p̈i niʼiŋ, làʼo fhi ghɔ fāʼo ntūgu mikei ŋgrào ghɔ ŋkwrī shhɛ, ŋgrào ghɔ pɨrɨ. Ndɔ pi ghà niʼiŋ làʼo fhi moŋ mikei ŋgrào fhi, nɛnnɛ ŋguoŋ yi ghao pɔ shiʼi.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ŋguʼɔ nthɔ nchhu nnu pei ni pugu nɛ, a gha njəɨ nu, yichəɨ nthishɨ pa Juu nii ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ yu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Muuŋ a yi miŋgwɛ khu wuʼɔ ndwɛ yei. Thɔ nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yɔ mbɨŋ yu nnɛ ŋa a ywiŋ.” 
Jishɔ lɔllɔ njōu njiŋ yi pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu, yichəɨ miŋgwɛ ŋa a ni ŋkwo yəɨ ndɨɨ yi ki a lɔ ntithi nɔ paanchrɔ ŋgaʼo thɔ njiŋ yu, ŋkāoŋ po ndhwí yi. 
Nthɛ ŋa a ni nchhu ni noŋ yi ŋa, “M̈i ŋguʼɔ ŋkāoŋ pi po ndhwí yi, ghɨ̌nɔ a tɔgɔ.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ gha ŋkara njəɨ vi, nchhu ŋa, “Fāʼo tɨnɨnjuʼɔ, ma muuŋ a, piŋ yɔ chwīe ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ tɔgɔ.” Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pi ni nchwīe ghɨ̌nɔ miŋgwɛ ghɔ tɔgɔ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ŋgə̄ɨ nda nthishɨ ghɔ, njəɨ pa ghaŋ tua ndua pugu pa yú ŋgwa pugu yɔ̄nɔ nu moŋ fiŋthɔ. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋguoŋ vəɨ taoŋ! Muuŋ miŋgwɛ yei lɔ ŋkukhu, a chhɔ ndɛllɛ.” Pugu gwɛ̄ vi. 
Ndɔ pi ni ŋga mfuʼu ŋguoŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ mfɛ mbhi, a nii nda ŋgwɛ̄iŋ muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ nɔ mbhɔ yi, a lɔllɔ. 
Shaaŋga nnu yei nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ krao laʼataoŋ ghɔ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ndhɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ, paa pa nchriligi yōu njiŋ yi, mbaʼo ŋgòu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Muuŋ Devi, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pigi.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nii nda, paa pa nchriligi pighɔ thɔ njəɨ vi, a pie vugu ŋa, “Pəɨ piŋ ŋa a nthɛ ǹchuʼɔ ligi yəɨ?” Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ooŋ, ma Taathɔ.” 
Nnɛ Jishɔ kāoŋ ligi yugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “A pɔ ni pəɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ piŋ yəɨ pɔ nɛ.” 
Ligi yugu chuʼɔ. Jishɔ shūu tə́nə yugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ chwīe ŋoŋ ji nnu yei.” 
Ndɔ pugu taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nchīi pa nnu ŋa Jishɔ chwīe nɛ moŋ ŋguoŋ krao laʼataoŋ ghɔ ghao. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ, ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, pi thɔ nu ni ŋoŋ chəɨ ŋa miŋwɛiŋ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ yu, a pɔ fhɨncho, njəɨ vi ni ju. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pi ni mfuʼu miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ nɛ, fhɨncho ghɔ chrā. Yú ŋgwa pighɔ ghrāo, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pi lɔ naa ma njəɨ ŋkwaŋ nnu yei moŋ Ishrae!” 
Ndɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi chhu ŋa, “A fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ pi ni ghrɨ́ nthishɨ pa miŋwɛiŋ.” 
Jishɔ nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ pa mɛmmɛ laʼataoŋ pugu pa puoŋ mi laʼataoŋ, njɛʼi ŋgwa moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi, nthɔ nchīi pwa pishaʼakhɔ mbɔ yi Shaʼafuoŋ, nthɔ njɨ̄gɨ ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pugu pa chəɨchəɨ. 
A ni ŋga njəɨ yú ŋgwa pighɔ, mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pugu, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ moŋ ŋgəʼɨ ndɔ mbou ghrɨ́ nɔ ghɛ̄rɛ nu noŋ pugu nɔ pa minjɨɨ ki ŋkɛ̄ʼi yi. 
Nnɛ a chhu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Maoŋ kwōo yiɛŋ ndɔ ghaŋ kwōo pi kɨgəɨ, 
nthɛ yie ghɔ, p̂əɨ luoŋ ni taʼanjuʼɔ mbhɔ Taathɔ ŋa a fāʼo maoŋ pighɔ nɛ, a taoŋ pa ghaŋ fàʼa pugu ghə̄ɨ ŋkwōo maoŋ pi.” 
﻿Matio.
10.
Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, mfɛ ghrɨ́ ni pugu ŋa pugu fuʼu pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ nɔ ghɔ, ndɔ njɨ̄gɨ ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pugu pa chəɨchəɨ. 
Yei ligi paanchrɔ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi pighɔ: fǔoŋ yi, Shemu, ŋa pi ni mɛ̄iŋ vi ni Pita nɛ, ni Andru ndǐŋ vi, ni Jɛiŋ muuŋ Shebedi, ni Jouŋ ndǐŋ vi, 
Fili pugu Batolomiu, Toma ni Matio mbɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ taashi, ni Jɛiŋ muuŋ Afioshi, ni Tadio, 
ni Shemu mbɔ kwìni laʼa, ni Judashi Ishikario ŋa a ni mfīni vi nɛ. 
Jishɔ ni ntaoŋ paanchrɔ pei, ni ntɨ́gɨ yei, “Kiʼi pəɨ ghə̄ɨ laʼa ŋgwa taoŋ nduoŋ ki moŋ sheshe laʼa pa ŋgwa Shamaria. 
Pəɨ ka ghə̄ɨ pi wuʼɔ moŋ mbaanda Ishrae, ŋa pugu pɔ nɔ minjɨɨ ŋa a kwo phɛ nɛ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nu nɛ, p̂əɨ chīi nu ŋa, ‘Shaʼafuoŋ Po kwo para!’ 
P̂əɨ yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋgwa, njwiŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu khu nɛ, njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ghaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ, mfuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ ŋgwa. Pəɨ ni ŋkwe ghrɨ́ chwīe nu nnu pei mbhɔ mu pi ki lɔ mbe, nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ chwīe pa nnu pei mbɨŋ ŋgwa pi ki pugu lɔ mbe. 
“Kiʼi pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ sheshe laoŋgo, ki mbɨŋ ntɨʼə ki yi kikɛʼi moŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ yəɨ, 
Kiʼi pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ pìɛŋ kra, ki kwri ndhwí, ki tra, ki mbìe, nthɛ ŋa a pie ŋa ŋgaŋ fàʼa fāʼo maoŋ jɨ pi. 
“Sheshe mmɛ laʼataoŋ ki muuŋ laʼataoŋ ŋa pəɨ nii fɔ nɛ, p̂əɨ līi ŋoŋ ŋa a kāʼo ndɔ ŋkhwā nɔ tuo nu vəɨ nɛ, ndaʼa pəɨ pugu ti shi nuʼuŋ ŋgə̄ɨ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ nii moŋ nda ghɔ nɛ, pəɨ chrā ni pugu ŋa, ‘Ghɨghrɨ pɔ mbɨŋ pəɨ.’ 
Ti ghaŋ nda pighɔ ŋkāʼo, ghɨghrɨ yəɨ kɨna nda ghɔ, ti pugu mieŋ ki kāʼo ghɨghrɨ yəɨ pɨ̄nɨ mbɨŋ pəɨ. 
Ti sheshe nda mieŋ ki lɔ mbiŋ vəɨ, ki mbiŋ chrà yəɨ, pəɨ krū kwò məɨ ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ taoŋ nu nda ghɔ ki laʼataoŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa a shi ndɛ njiʼɛ ni laʼataoŋ Shodoŋ pugu Gomora moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa nchaa yie laʼataoŋ ŋa pugu lāa vəɨ nɛ! 
“Pəɨ līi njəɨ, ǹtaoŋ vəɨ nɔ pa minjɨɨ shɨna pa miŋaŋieŋ. Nnɛ pəɨ chhɔ ni lɨna məɨ nɔ pa mitwɛʼi ndɔ njū nɔ pa mintuʼɔlibuŋ. 
P̂əɨ chhɔ ndɨna pichəɨ ŋgwa nthɛ ŋa pugu shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ nchaʼa mfɛ moŋ pa ndashaʼa, pi wie vəɨ moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi yugu. 
Pi shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ shhɨ ghaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa pugu pa fùoŋ nthɛ a, p̂əɨ pɔ pa miŋkwentie shhɨ pugu, pugu pa ŋgwa taoŋ nduoŋ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pi wɛ̄iŋ vəɨ nchaʼa mfɛ ŋa pi shaʼa vəɨ nɛ, kiʼi njùʼɔ yəɨ ghana vəɨ ni ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pəɨ shi nchrā nɛ pugu pa nnu ŋa pəɨ shi nchhu nɛ. Nthɛ ŋa pi shi mfɛ yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ shi nchu nɛ ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa a lɔ nchrā pəɨ, a chrā Jijwɛ Tǎa vəɨ mbɨŋ pəɨ. 
“Ŋoŋ shi nchaʼa ndǐŋ vi mfɛ ŋa pi jwi, Tǎa fɛ muuŋ vi ŋa pi jwi, pa puoŋ kara mbara pa tǎa, pugu pa ma ni nchhɔ̀, nchwīe pi jwi vugu. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa shi mbɨ̄na vəɨ nthɛ a, ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a shi ntīi shii ti ŋgə̄ɨ ndugwi nɛ shi ndūgu. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pi fɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pəɨ moŋ taʼa laʼataoŋ nɛ, pəɨ tei ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ. Nthɛ ŋa shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa pəɨ yiʼi mīʼɛŋ fàʼa yəɨ moŋ ŋguoŋ laʼataoŋ moŋ Ishrae ki Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua lɔ nthɔ. 
“Mbaʼa ŋgaŋ younjiŋ ŋoŋ chaa masha vi, ndɔ paʼa muuŋ fàʼa lɔ nchaa ju nchaa masha vi. 
A kāʼo ni ŋgaŋ younjiŋ ŋoŋ nɔ pɔ nu nɔ masha vi, muuŋ fàʼa pɔ nɔ masha vi. Ti pi mɛ̄iŋ masha nda ni Bɛjɛbu kaŋ pi shi ŋka mɛ̄iŋ pa ŋgwa nda ghɔ pi ni ligi ŋa a pɨgɨ nchaa yie nɛ. 
“Nnɛ kiʼi mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu nthɛ vugu, nthɛ ŋa yichəɨ yaoŋ lɔ njiʼi mbɔ fɔ ŋa pi pūoŋ ŋa mbaʼa Minnwi mieŋ ki nōoŋ páa. Paʼa yichəɨ nnu lə̄ɨŋ lɔ mbɔ ŋa mbaʼa pi yiʼi mieŋ ki ji. 
Nnu ŋa ǹchhu ni pəɨ moŋ njíŋ nɛ, pəɨ chhu nthɛ minaoŋ, yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ yaʼo pi chūuŋ nɛ, pəɨ thi ŋkuoŋ pa thɔnda nchīi. 
“Ndɔ kiʼi pəɨ pɔgɔ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa mimfɛ pugu wuʼɔ njwi pi frɛinoŋ yəɨ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ jwi nu nchə̌ɨ yəɨ nɛ. Pəɨ ka pɔgɔ pi Minnwi ŋa minthɛ a pɨrɨ frɛinoŋ pugu pa nchə̌ɨ yəɨ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ. 
Pi shiʼa fīni paa puoŋ milunu pi wuʼɔ ni taʼa muuŋ mi mbɨŋ? Ndɔ mbaʼa taʼa ŋoŋ vugu gū shhɛ ki a lɔ mbiŋ Tǎa. 
Njiʼi nthɛ pi ŋguoŋ ŋgiithɔ yɔ yi shia ghao. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, kiʼi mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu, nthɛ ŋa ɔ ghaʼo mbhɔ Minnwi nchaa ntou milunu. 
“Nnɛ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chhu shhɨ ŋgwamishua ŋa a nyaŋ nɛ, mummu ŋkaa mu shi nchhu shhɨ Tǎa a po ŋa a nyaŋ. 
Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lāa a shhɨ ŋgwamishua, mummu shi ndāa vi shhɨ Tǎa a ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ. 
“Kiʼi njiʼi mbīʼi ŋa ǹthɔ pi nɔ fɛ nu taʼaŋggi ŋkuoŋ shhɛ. Ǹdɔ nthɔ pi nɔ fɛ ni taʼaŋggi, ǹthɔ pi ni kafa. 
‘Ǹthɔ pi nɔ chwīe nu muuŋ mimbia kara ŋkǔnu yi ni tǎa vi, muuŋ miŋgwɛ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yi ni mǔuŋ vi, muuŋ miŋgwɛ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yi ni maŋgaoŋ vi. 
Mbɨ̌na ŋoŋ shi ŋguʼɔ mbɔ pi pa ndǎa pi.’ 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a khwā tǎa vi ki mǔuŋ vi nchaa a nɛ lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo ŋgaŋ younjiŋ a. Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a khwā muuŋ vi yi mimbia ki vi miŋgwɛ nchaa a nɛ lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo ŋgaŋ younjiŋ a. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi ntiɛŋ wáʼa yi njōu njiŋ a nɛ lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo ŋgaŋ younjiŋ a. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a yəɨ chɔmbhi yi nɛ shi mbhɛ chɔmbhi yi ghɔ, ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a phɛ chɔmbhi yi nthɛ a nɛ shi njəɨ chɔmbhi yi ghɔ. 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ ghɔ ŋa ɔ thɔ a pwa nɛ piŋ pi mmu. Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ a nɛ piŋ pi ŋoŋ ŋa a taoŋ a nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nthɛ ŋa a njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nɛ shi mfāʼo ŋkwaŋ kɨ̀nɛiŋ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ nthɛ ŋa a ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ nɛ shi mfāʼo ŋkwaŋ kɨ̀nɛiŋ ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a fɛ ndua ŋkhǐ ghɨghrɨ ni taʼa muuŋ mi ŋgaŋ younjiŋ a yei nthɛ ŋa a ŋgaŋ younjiŋ a nɛ, shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa a yiʼi nshiɛŋ kɨ̀nɛiŋ yi.” 
﻿Matio.
11.
Jishɔ ni ŋga ŋkwo mīʼɛŋ tɨgɨ nu paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, ndɔllɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nthɔ ntɨgɨ nu ndɔ nchīi nu moŋ pa laʼa pugu. 
Ndwɛ Jouŋ ni ŋga nchhɔ moŋ chə́ɨŋ njaʼo fàʼa Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, ntaoŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni Jishɔ 
ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ mbie vi ŋa, “A gɔ̀ mbɔ ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋa a shi nthɔ nɛ, ki pigi ywɛrɛ ŋoŋ nduoŋ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Jouŋ ŋa, “P̂əɨ pɨ̄nɨ shwei Jouŋ ni yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ yaʼo ndɔ njəɨ nɛ, 
pa nchriligi yəɨ lɨʼɨ, pa ŋkwíni nyīeŋ, ghaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ pɔ shiʼi, pa fhɨtənə yaʼo lɨʼɨ, pi pɨʼɨ pa ŋgwa khu moŋ gu, pi chīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ ni ghaŋ pou. 
Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo kɨʼɨŋgɨnɨ moŋ piŋ yugu nthɛ a nɛ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ ni ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ, Jishɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ nchrā nu ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ nthɛ Jouŋ, “Pəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó njəɨ pi khɔ fɔ? Trǔ ŋa fɨfrəɨ chɨ̄ʼɨ nu? Ŋga! 
Pəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ kiʼɛ njəɨ pi khɔ fɔ? Ŋoŋ ŋa a ni māʼaŋ mbwa ndhwí? Ŋga! Līi njəɨ, ŋgwa ŋa pugu ghà māʼaŋ mbwambwa ndhwí nɛ ghà mbɔ pi moŋ ntuʼɔ pa fùoŋ. 
Ti pəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu kiʼɛ njəɨ pi khɔ fɔ? Njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi? Ooŋ, ǹshwei vəɨ, ŋoŋ ŋa a chaa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Jouŋ ŋoŋ ŋa chrà Minnwi chrā nɔ ligi yi ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, ǹshi ntaoŋ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ a, a ghə̄ɨ shhɨ pəɨ mbīri ndaoŋ ni pəɨ.’ 
“Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, shɨna ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa piŋgɛ kwo ma mbhi nɛ, yichəɨ taʼa yi lɔ mbɔ ŋa a ghaʼo nchaa Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ, ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a kɨgəɨ nchaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po nɛ, ghaʼo nchaa Jouŋ. 
Llɔ ndɨɨ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ti nthɔ nchəɨŋ ndwɛ, Shaʼafuoŋ Po kwo yəɨ ŋgəʼɨ mbhɔ kɨkrɨ, ghaŋ kɨkrɨ kwe ni ghrɨ́. 
Ŋguoŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi pugu pa gɨ́ ni nthɔ nchrā nthɛ pi Shaʼafuoŋ Po ti nthɔ nchəɨŋ thɔ Jouŋ, 
ti ɔ̈ ŋkhwā nɔ piŋ nu ŋkɨ̀nɨ yugu, kaŋ Jouŋ nduthɔ yi Elaija ŋa a ni mfāʼo nɔ thɔ nu nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə nɛ, â yaʼo! 
“Mimfɛ m̀āʼaŋ fɨʼɨ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei pi ni khɔ? A pɔ nɔ pa mikəʼɨ ŋa pugu chhɔ moŋ lɨʼɨ taŋ, nthɔ mɛ̄iŋ pakwo michwe pugu ŋa, 
‘Pigi māʼaŋ ŋkhǐ pwanjuʼɔ ni pəɨ ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ mbini, pigi yrāo ŋkhǐ gu ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ ŋkə̄ɨ.’ 
Jouŋ ni nthɔ paʼa ndɔ njɨ maoŋ ki nnu yaoŋ pugu chhu ŋa, ‘A fāʼo miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ yu.’ 
Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua nthɔ njɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu nu pugu chhu ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, a njru mmɛ yaoŋ, ndɔ mbɔ mbaa làʼo, mbɨnɨ mbɔ shúoŋ ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ.’ Ndɔ shiethɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi ŋa a kāʼo pi ni ŋkwaŋ ntíɛŋ ŋa a yuŋ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ jɛ̄ nchhɔ mbɨ̄ga ŋgwa pa laʼataoŋ pɛ ŋa a ni njiɛŋ nchwīe pa nnu ghraoghrao fɔ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pugu shini ndɔ mbāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ, ma ŋgwa Korashiŋ! Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ, ma ŋgwa Beshaida! Nthɛ ŋa pa nnu ghraoghrao pei ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ hɛiŋ nɛ kaŋ ni mbɔ pi Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ, pugu kaŋ ni ŋkwo māʼaŋ ndhwí ywei gu nchhɔ moŋ phu nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa pugu pāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ, a shi ndɛ njiʼɛ ni ŋgwa Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa nchaa vəɨ. 
Ndɔ ni pəɨ, ma ŋgwa Kapanuŋ, pəɨ pīʼi ŋa Minnwi shi ndɔ̄gɔ vəɨ ŋkuʼɔ nɔ po? Ŋga! A shi nshwiʼi vəɨ moŋ lɨʼɨ ŋgwa khu. Pa nnu ghraoghrao pei ŋa ǹchwīe nu shhɨ pəɨ nɛ kaŋ ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ pi Shodoŋ, pugu kaŋ ni ŋkwri nnɛ ŋguʼɔ mbɔ shiʼa. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ, a shi ndɛ njiʼɛ ni ŋgwa laʼataoŋ Shodoŋ moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa nchaa vəɨ.” 
Moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Tǎa, a gɔ̀ mbɔ Taathɔ po pugu pa ŋkuoŋ shhɛ. Ǹtōo ghɔ nthɛ ŋa yaoŋ ŋa ɔ lə̄ɨŋ ni ghaŋ shiethɔ pugu pa ghaŋ lɨna nɛ, ɔ nōoŋ ni pa puoŋ fhu. 
Ooŋ, ma Tǎa, yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ɔ ni ŋkhwā ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. 
“Tǎa a kwo chaʼa ŋguoŋ yaoŋ mfɛ mbhɔ mu, yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ nji ŋoŋ ŋa Muuŋ yie ghɔ nɛ ŋkiɛŋ Tǎa, ndɔ paʼa yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ nji ŋoŋ ŋa Tǎa yie ghɔ nɛ ŋkiɛŋ Muuŋ pugu pa shesheŋoŋ ŋa muuŋ chuʼɔ nɔ nōoŋ nu Tǎa ghɔ nɛ. 
“P̂əɨ thɔ njəɨ a, ŋguoŋ vəɨ ŋa pəɨ wie noŋ pəɨ ndɔ ntiɛŋ lrì nɛ, m̀fɛ fɛrɛ noŋ ni pəɨ. 
Tiɛŋ shhɔ̀ a mbəʼɨ ghɔ, njɛʼi mbhɔ mu nthɛ ŋa mi ŋoŋ mbɔmbɔrɔ ndɔ mbɔ ŋoŋ juju llɔ moŋ njùʼɔ mu, nnɛ, kaŋ ǹshi mfɛ fɛrɛ ni nchə̌ɨ yɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shhɔ̀ a yīʼɛ, lrì a pɔ yi yīʼɛ yīʼɛ ŋkaa yu.” 
﻿Matio.
12.
Moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ nyīeŋ nu *Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu moŋ nyìeŋ shíe gɛ. Njì yia ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, pugu ka shíe gɛ ŋkru nu. 
Pa ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋga njəɨ, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ thɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa gɨ́ lɔ mbiŋ ŋa pi chwīe Llɛ́ Ji nɛ.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ nnu ŋa Devi ni nchwīe ndɨɨ ŋa njì ni njia vugu pa ŋgwa pi nɛ? 
Ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nii Nda Minnwi pugu pa ŋgwa pi, ndɔ̄gɔ brɛi ŋa pi ni mfɛ ni Minnwi nɛ ŋkru, mbɔ nnu ŋa gɨ́ shini ndɔ mbiŋ ŋa a kru, ki ŋa ŋgwa ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɔ nɛ kru, ŋkiɛŋ pa ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi. 
Ki pəɨ lɔ mɛ̄iŋ moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ gɨ́ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ moŋ Nda Minnwi ghà mbəʼɨ Llɛ́ Ji ndɔ paʼa gɨ́ lɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu? 
Ǹshwei vəɨ, yaoŋ ŋa a chaa Nda Minnwi nɛ pɔ hɛnɛiŋ. 
P̈əɨ kaŋ nji njiŋ nnu yei ŋa, ‘Ǹtāʼa nu ŋa ŋgwa nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ ki lɔ ŋguʼɔ mfɛ pi yaoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ,’ pəɨ shi kaŋ ndɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ŋoŋ ŋa mbhɔ yi yi woo nɛ nɔ ŋgushaʼa. 
Nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua Taathɔ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu.” 
Jishɔ lɔllɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nii moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi yugu. 
Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ mbɔ ŋkwíni mbhɔ. Pugu pie Jishɔ ŋa, “Gɨ́ piŋ ŋa pi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋoŋ Llɛ́ Ji?” nnɛ nɔ wɛ̄iŋ nu mi. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “A gɔ̌ shɨna pəɨ ŋa ä mfāʼo minjɨɨ a gū moŋ tiɛŋ llɛ́ ji, paʼa a lɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi ŋkə̄rə mfuʼu? 
Ŋoŋmishua ghaʼo nchaa minjɨɨ kiʼɛ pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Nɛnnɛ gɨ́ piŋ ŋa pi chwīe shiʼi llɛ́ Ji.” 
Nnɛ a chhu ni ŋkwíni mbhɔ ghɔ ŋa, “Shwīi mbhɔ yɔ.” Ŋoŋ ghɔ shwīi mbhɔ yi, a kiʼi ndɔ mbɔ pi shiʼi nɔ yichəɨ taʼa ŋgei mbhɔ yi. 
Ndɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi taoŋ mbhi ŋgə̄ɨ nyiaŋ ntáŋ nthɛ Jishɔ, ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pugu shi njwi vi nɛ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nji ntáŋ yei, nshūu mbɨnɨ njiŋ llɔ fɔ. Ntou ŋgwa younjiŋ yi, a yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu ghao, 
ndɔ fɛ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa kiʼi pugu chwīe pichəɨ ŋgwa ji vi. 
Yei ni mbɔ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa Ishaya, mbɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, ni nchhu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ: 
“Līi njəɨ, muuŋ fàʼa a yei ŋa ǹchuʼɔ, mbɔ muuŋ yɛ ŋa ŋ̀khwā nɛ, m̀fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ mbɨŋ yu. Ǹshi nūʼɔŋ Jijwɛ a mbɨŋ yu, a shi nchīi ndɨndɨ ni ŋgwa pa taoŋ nduoŋ. 
Mbaʼa a yiʼi mfɛ̄ʼi fɛ̀ʼi ki mbaʼo ŋgòu thɔ ŋgwa, mbaʼa ŋoŋ yiʼi njaʼo ŋggì yi moŋ pa taʼandaoŋ. 
Mbaʼa a yiʼi mbəʼɨ kàʼa ŋa a kwo fāʼo lə̄ɨŋ nɛ, ki mbɨgɛi truka ŋa a ŋkɨɨ nu nɛ ti a shi nuʼuŋ nchwīe ndɨndɨ ghaʼa lɨʼɨ. 
Ŋgwa pa laʼataoŋ nduoŋ shi mfāʼo kwàʼa pi mbiŋ yu.” 
Nɛnnɛ ŋgwa pichəɨ ghə̄ɨ njəɨ Jishɔ ni ŋoŋ chəɨ ŋa miŋwɛiŋ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ yu, paʼa a lɔ nthɔ njəɨ lɨʼɨ, mbɨnɨ mbɔ fhɨncho. Jishɔ chwīe a pɔ shiʼi, nnɛ mfāʼo njɨ nɔ chrā nu ndɔ mbɨnɨ njəɨ lɨʼɨ. 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ ni ŋgrāo nthɔ nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei nthɛ a pɔ muuŋ Devi?” 
Ndɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, nchhu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei wuʼɔ mfuʼu miŋwɛiŋ pi ni ghrɨ́ Bɛjɛbu mbɔ nthishɨ pa miŋwɛiŋ.” 
Jishɔ ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi nu nɛ, nnɛ nchhu ŋa, “Sheshe laʼataoŋ ŋa ŋgwa chhɔ māʼaŋ noŋ pugu ni nchhɔ̀ fɔ nɛ shi ŋguʼɔ ŋgū, ndɔ mbaʼa sheshe laʼa ki nda ŋa a pɔ pi ni minduoŋnduoŋ yiʼi ntithi. 
Ti S̈hata mfuʼu Shata, kaŋ a thi pi moŋ minduoŋnduoŋ ni noŋ yi, shaʼafuoŋ yi lara pi nɛiŋ? 
Ti ä mbɔ ŋa m̀fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ pi ni ghrɨ́ Bɛjɛbu, kaŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pəɨ ghà, mfuʼu yugu kiʼɛ pi ni ghrɨ́ gɔ̌? Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pugu shi mbɔ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu shi nshaʼa vəɨ nɛ. 
Ndɔ ä mbɔ ŋa m̀fuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ pi ni Jijwɛ Minnwi, kaŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi thɔ shɨna pəɨ. 
“Ki minthɛ ŋoŋ kie nɛiŋ nii nda ŋgaŋ ghrɨ́ ntiɛŋ maoŋ pi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ghɔ ki lɔ mfǔoŋ ŋkrao ŋgaŋ ghrɨ́ ghɔ. A wuʼɔ kəʼɨ ghɔ, ŋa minthɛ a tiɛŋ maoŋ pi ntaoŋ nɔ nda yu. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ mbɔ ŋgei mu nɛ mbɨ̌na a, ŋoŋ ŋa pigi yu lɔ ŋkɨrɨ nu kaʼa nɛ thɔ nshaaŋshaaŋ. 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹshwei vəɨ, pi shi ndīʼɛ sheshe phɨ pugu pa chrà nchɨʼəshə ŋa ŋgwa chrā nɛ, ndɔ ti shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shi nchrā chrà nchɨʼəshə nɔ ligi Jijwɛ Minnwi nɛ, mbaʼa pi līʼɛ phɨ yi. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shi nchrā nnu pɨphɨ nthɛ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua nɛ pi shi ndīʼɛ phɨ yi, ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chrā phɨ nthɛ Jijwɛ Minnwi nɛ, mbaʼa pi līʼɛ phɨ yi moŋ yei mbhi ndwɛ ki moŋ yɛ ŋa a thɔ nu nɛ. 
“Chwīe thɨ pwa kaŋ ntíɛŋ yi shi mbwa, ndāa nnɛ ɔ chwīe a pɔ yi pɨphɨ, ntíɛŋ yi pɔ yi pɨphɨ, nthɛ ŋa pi ghà nji thɨ pi ŋkuoŋ ntíɛŋ yi. 
Mbhɛ mitwɛʼi pei! Pəɨ nthɛ pəɨ kie pi nɛiŋ nchrā nnu shiʼi ŋa pəɨ pɔ pi ŋgwa pɨphɨ nɛ. Nthɛ ŋa nchò ghà nchrā pi yaoŋ ŋa a pɨgəɨ llɔ moŋ njùʼɔ nɛ. 
Ŋoŋ shiʼi ghà nthɔ ni maoŋ shiʼi llɔ moŋ pìɛŋ maoŋ shiʼi pi, ŋoŋ mbɨmbhɨ thɔ ni maoŋ pɨphɨ llɔ moŋ pìɛŋ maoŋ pi pi pɨphɨ. 
Ǹshwei vəɨ, moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa, ŋgwa shi mfɨ̄ʼɨ sheshe muuŋ mi chrà ki tou ŋa a taoŋ nchò pugu nɛ. 
Pi shi ndɔ̄gɔ chrà yɔ nshaʼa ghɔ nɔ ghɔ, nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa ɔ tɔgɔ sháʼa ki ŋa ɔ gū sháʼa.” 
Nnɛ pichəɨ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Masha, pigi tāʼa nu ŋa ɔ nōoŋ lì pigi yəɨ.” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ pɨphɨ pugu pa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ ŋkɨna pugu Minnwi ghà ntāʼa pi lì, ndɔ mbaʼa pi nōoŋ kaŋ taʼa lì ghɔ ŋkiɛŋ yi njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Jona. 
Nthɛ ŋa wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ Jona ni mbɔ puŋ mmɛ shhu nɔ trɛi naoŋchɨ ni trɛi tuʼu nɛ, a wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɔ moŋ njùʼɔ shhɛ nɔ trɛi naoŋchɨ ni trɛi tuʼu nɛ. 
Moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa, ŋgwa Nineve shi ma ntithi pugu pa ŋgwrɛiŋgwa yei ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu nɔ pa ŋgushaʼa, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ ndɨɨ ŋa Jona ni nchu chrà Minnwi ni pugu nɛ, ndɔ ti līi njəɨ, yaoŋ ŋa a chaa Jona nɛ pɔ hɛiŋ. 
Moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa, Ŋgwafuoŋ llɔ mbiɛŋ shi ma ntithi pugu pa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu nɔ pa ŋgushaʼa nthɛ ŋa a ki nyīeŋ ŋkiɛŋ ntaaŋ ndaoŋ llɔ laʼataoŋ yu nthɔ njwɛrɛ ntɨ́gɨ shiethɔ mbhɔ Fùoŋ Sholomu, ndɔ līi njəɨ, yaoŋ ŋa a chaa Sholomu nɛ pɔ hɛiŋ. 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa jijwɛ miŋwɛiŋ taoŋ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ nɛ, a nyīeŋ moŋ pa lɨʼɨ yó nthɔ ntāʼa lɨʼɨ fɛrɛ noŋ yi, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ sheshe yi. 
Nnɛ nchhu ŋa, ‘Ǹshi mbɨnɨ nda mu lɨʼɨ ŋa mi ni ndhɔ nɛ.’ A ghà mbɨnɨ, njəɨ moŋ nda a pɔ yi yo ki yaoŋ lɔ mbɔ fɔ, pi kwo yɨ̄gɨ ndɔ nchwīe a kāʼo. 
Nɛnnɛ, a pɨ̄nɨ kiʼɛ ndɔ̄gɔ khwachəɨ pichəɨ jijwɛ haʼaŋ pugu pɨgɨ nchaa vi nɛ pugu pugu thɔ nii ndaʼa nu fɔ, chɔmbhi ŋoŋ ghɔ pɨnɨ mbɨgɨ nchaa nɔ haʼaŋ a ni fǔoŋ mbɔ nɛ. A nɔ haʼaŋ a shi mbɔ ni ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ pɨphɨ yei nɛ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ŋguʼɔ nthɔ nchrā nu ni ŋgwa pighɔ nɛ, ŋga njəɨ nu mǔuŋ vi pugu pa lǐŋ pi pi pimbia thi mbhi nthɔ ntāʼa nu nchrā pugu pugu. 
Nɛnnɛ, pichəɨ pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, mǔuŋ ghɔ pugu pa lǐŋ pɔ pi pimbia pɔ nɛ mbhi ntāʼa nu ŋa pəɨ pugu chrā.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa a ni nchhu ghɔ nɛ ŋa, “Mǔuŋ a pɔ pi gɔ̌, pa lǐŋ paŋ pɔ pa gɔ̌?” 
Mfɛ mbhɔ yi nshwɛ̄ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nchhu ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, mǔuŋ a pugu pa lǐŋ paŋ pɔ nɛiŋ! 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chwīe nnu ŋa Tǎa a po tāʼa nu nɛ, ndǐŋ a yi mimbia pugu yi miŋgwɛ ni mǔuŋ a.” 
﻿Matio.
13.
Wuʼɔ llɛ́ ghɔ, Jishɔ taoŋ nda ŋgə̄ɨ nchhɔ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ. 
Mmɛ yú ŋgwa kɨrɨ yəɨ yu ti a nii pi moŋ kikuoŋ nchɔchhɔ fɔ, yú ŋgwa pighɔ thi ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ. 
A chhu ntou pa nnu ni pugu moŋ luʼɔ chrà ŋa, “Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni ma mbɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni māʼaŋ nu nɛ, pichəɨ gū shhɛmbua, pa mishi shwiʼi ŋkru. 
Pichəɨ gū moŋ shhɛ ŋkwá lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ntou nchíʼa shi ki lɔ mbɔ nɛ, njiʼa ŋkhɛkhɛ nthɛ ŋa nchíʼa shi ki lɔ njiɛŋ fɔ. 
Ndɔ minaoŋ ghà nthɛ ntūoŋ vugu, nthɛ ŋa pugu shini ndɔ mfāʼo ŋǐeŋ yugu nɛ, pugu kāʼo mbraoprao ŋkhu. 
Pichəɨ mbhɛ̌ gū moŋ shishaʼa, shishaʼa yīʼɛ ŋkuʼɔ mfīgi maoŋ pighɔ pugu khu. 
Pichəɨ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ pighɔ gū moŋ shhɛ shiʼi, mbūgu fɔ ŋkuʼɔ nja njuŋ: pichəɨ yuŋ taʼa ŋkɨɨ yi, pichəɨ yuŋ ntɨgao wuŋ yi, pichəɨ yuŋ trɛi wuŋ. 
Ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə nɛ, â yaʼo.” 
Nnɛ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ ɔ chrā nu ni pugu pi moŋ luʼɔ chrà?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pi fɛ njɨ ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ ji pa nnu lə̄ɨŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfɛ ni pugu. 
Nthɛ ŋa ni ŋoŋ ŋa a kwo fāʼo nɛ, pi shi mbīgi ntou yi a fāʼo a yiɛŋ, ndɔ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ mfāʼo nɛ, njiʼi nthɛ pi shɨgɛi yɛ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ, pi shi ŋka kwekwe. 
A chwīe yie ǹchrā ni pugu pi moŋ luʼɔ chrà nthɛ ŋa, Pugu shi njəɨ nu ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ, njaʼo nu ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njaʼo ki nji. 
Nnɛ nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Ishaya ni nchhu nɛ wɛ̄iŋ vugu, nnu ghɔ ni mbɔ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ shi nja njaʼo ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nji njiŋ yi, Pəɨ shi nja ndīi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa njùʼɔ ŋgwa pei kwo fɨ̄nɨ, tə́nə yugu chri ki lɔ nuʼuŋ njaʼo lɨʼɨ, pugu kwo kwiri ligi yugu nnɛ ŋa kiʼi pugu yəɨ ni ligi yugu, njaʼo ni tə́nə yugu, nji ni njùʼɔ yugu ŋkara mbara a, ǹchwīe pugu pɔ shiʼi.’ 
“Ndɔ ni pəɨ, pəɨ fāʼo mbɔrɔ, nthɛ ŋa ligi yəɨ yəɨ lɨʼɨ tə́nə yəɨ yaʼo lɨʼɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, ntou pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi pugu pa ŋgwa ndɨndɨ ni njūa nu nɔ yəɨ nu nnu ŋa pəɨ yəɨ nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ, njūa nɔ yaʼo nu nnu ŋa pəɨ yaʼo nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njaʼo. 
“Yaʼo nɛ njiŋ luʼɔ chrà nthɛ ŋgaŋ māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa shesheŋoŋ yaʼo chrà Shaʼafuoŋ Po ki lɔ nji njiŋ yi nɛ, ŋoŋ mbɨmbhɨ thɔ mfuʼu yaoŋ ŋa pi phi njùʼɔ yu nɛ. Yei pɔ nɔ yɛ mbhɛ̌ ŋa pugu ni ŋgū pi shɛmbua nɛ. 
Pɛ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ ŋa pugu ni ŋgū pi moŋ shhɛ ŋkwá nɛ pɔ pi pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi njiʼɛ ŋkwe ni pwanjuʼɔ 
ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo ŋǐeŋ yugu yi tɨtɨnɨ, ŋguʼɔ ntithi pi nɔ muuŋ kuo ndɨɨ, mōoŋ nu pugu pa ŋgəʼɨ gha nthɔ nthɛ chrà ghɔ ŋa pugu yaʼo nɛ, pugu pāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni chrà ghɔ. 
Pɛ mbhɛ̌ ŋa pugu ni ŋgū moŋ shishaʼa nɛ, pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi, ŋga ŋgə̄ɨ, pa ghaghana ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei, pugu pa mifɨɨ ŋa pa fāʼo ghà nthɔ nɔ nɛ fīgi chrà ghɔ paʼa a lɔ ma njuŋ ntíɛŋ. 
Pɛ mbhɛ̌ ŋa pi ni mbhi moŋ shhɛ shiʼi nɛ pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi ndɔ nji njiŋ yi, nja njuŋ ntíɛŋ, pichəɨ yuŋ ti nchəɨŋ taʼa ŋkɨɨ yi, pichəɨ pɔ ntɨgao wuŋ, pichəɨ pɔ trɛi wuŋ.” 
Jishɔ pɨnɨ nchhu yichəɨ luʼɔ chrà ni pugu: “A nthɛ pi māʼaŋ fɨʼɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Po ni ŋoŋ ŋa a ni māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ shiʼi moŋ nyìeŋ yu 
ndɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋgwa pi ni ndhɛ nu nɛ, mbɨ̌na vi thɔ māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌ trǔ shɨna pa shíe gɛ pighɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ni vhi. 
Maoŋ pighɔ gha ŋkhɛ̄ ti njuŋ nu, pa trǔ pighɔ khɛ̄ ŋkaa pugu. 
“Pa puoŋ fàʼa ŋoŋ ghɔ thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Masha, ɔ ni māʼaŋ pi ŋkiɛŋ mbhɛ̌ moŋ nyìeŋ, ti a kie pi nɛiŋ pa trǔ pɔ moŋ ghɔ?’ 
“A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, ‘Nnu yei chwīe Mimbɨna.’ “Puoŋ fàʼa pighɔ pie vi ŋa, ‘Ɔ tāʼa nu kiʼɛ ŋa pigi ghə̄ɨ shūʼɔ pa trǔ pighɔ?’ 
“Ndɔ a khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, ‘Ŋga! A nthɛ pəɨ gha nthɔ nshūʼɔ pa trǔ, nshūʼɔ pa shíe gɛ ŋkaa pugu. 
Pəɨ mieŋ ŋguoŋ yi ghao kuʼɔ kaʼa ti ndɨɨ kwōo nuʼuŋ nthɔ, moŋ ndɨɨ kwōo, ǹshi nshwei ni ghaŋ kwōo ŋa, p̂əɨ fǔoŋ nshūʼɔ pa trǔ, ŋkrao moŋ pa káʼa ntūoŋ, ndɔ nshūʼɔ shíe gɛ kiʼɛ nūʼɔŋ shaoŋ mu.’ ” 
Jishɔ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nchhu yichəɨ luʼɔ chrà ni pugu, “Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ pi nɔ mbhɛ̌ yaoŋ mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ yi gɛ, ŋa ŋoŋ lɔ̄gɔ ŋgə̄ɨ māʼaŋ moŋ nyìeŋ yu. 
A lɔ mbɔ ŋgɨgɛi nchaa ŋguoŋ pa pichəɨ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ, ndɔ a gha ŋkuʼɔ, mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yi nchaa ŋguoŋ yaoŋ moŋ nyìeŋ, ŋgū thɨ, nnɛ pa mishi thɔ ŋkrao pa nda pugu ŋkuoŋ pa mbhɔ mi.” 
A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nchhu yichəɨ luʼɔ chrà ni pugu ŋa, “Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ pi nɔ yaoŋ chwīe prupɨna kuʼɔ, haʼaŋ miŋgwɛ lɔ̄gɔ niʼiŋ moŋ taʼa brumaʼa prupɨna, a chwīe ŋguoŋ prupɨna ghɔ kuʼɔ ghao.” 
Jishɔ ni nchhu ŋguoŋ nnu pei ni pa yú ŋgwa pighɔ moŋ luʼɔ chrà, a shini ndɔ nchhu kaŋ taʼa nnu ni pugu ki lɔ mbɔ pi moŋ luʼɔ chrà. 
Yei ni mbɔ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni nchhu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa, “Ǹshi ŋaʼaŋ nchò a nchrā moŋ pa luʼɔ chrà. Ǹshi nchhu pa nnu ŋa pi shi ki lɔ nji llɔ moŋ ndɨɨ ŋa pi ni nchwīe mbhi nɛ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mieŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ nii nda, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, “Fɨ̄ʼɨ njiŋ luʼɔ chrà nthɛ trǔ moŋ nyìeŋ ni pigi.” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa a māʼaŋ ŋkiɛŋ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ nɛ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua. 
Moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ pɔ ŋkuoŋ mbhi, mbhɛ̌ maoŋ shiʼi pɔ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu puoŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po nɛ, pa trǔ pɔ pa puoŋ ŋoŋ mbɨmbhɨ, 
mimbɨna ŋa a phi trǔ ghɔ nɛ pɔ devɨ, maoŋ kwōo pɔ ndɨɨ ŋa mbhi shi ndugwi nɛ, ghaŋ kwōo maoŋ pɔ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi. 
“Wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pi ghà ŋkɨrɨ trǔ ntūoŋ ni móŋoŋ nɛ, a wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ a shi mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa mbhi lūgwi nɛ. 
Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi ntaoŋ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi pugu kɨrɨ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ghà nchwīe ŋgwa chwīe phɨ ndɔ mbəʼɨ kɨna nɛ mfuʼu moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ yi, 
māʼaŋ vugu moŋ nda móŋoŋ ŋguʼɔ liɛŋ. Moŋ lɨʼɨ ghɔ, kə̄ɨ pugu pa kru shua shi mbɔ fɔ. 
Nnɛ ŋgwa ndɨndɨ thɛ nɔ minaoŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Tǎa vugu. Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə nɛ, â yaʼo. 
“Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ nɔ fàʼo ŋa pi lə̄ɨŋ moŋ nyìeŋ ŋa yichəɨ ŋoŋ ghə̄ɨ njəɨ mbūoŋ. Nnɛ moŋ pwanjuʼɔ yi, a ghə̄ɨ mfīni ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ ŋgə̄ɨ njuoŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ. 
“Ŋkamuʼɔŋ, Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ nɔ ŋgaŋ piʼɛ taŋ ŋa a ni nthɔ ntāʼa ŋkiɛŋ ŋgùʼɔ tɨnɨnchuoŋ, 
ŋga njəɨ taʼa ŋkiɛŋ ŋgùʼɔ tɨnɨnchuoŋ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni pəə nɛ, a ghə̄ɨ mfīni ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ njuoŋ nɔ ghɔ. 
“Nɔ pigi nu, yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ nɛ. A pɔ nɔ ndáŋ ŋa pi māʼaŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ shhu ghao. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ndáŋ ghɔ lɨnaoŋ nɛ, ŋgwa shūu ŋkuʼɔ nɔ ghɔ mbhi nchɔchhɔ ntɛrɛ pa ŋkiɛŋ shhu niʼiŋ moŋ pa mikuo mīʼaŋ pi pɨphɨ. 
A ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a shi mbɔ moŋ ndugwi mbhi yei nɛ. Pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi shi nthɔ ntɛrɛ ŋgwa pɨphɨ, mfuʼu moŋ ŋgwa ndɨndɨ, 
māʼaŋ vugu moŋ nda móŋoŋ ŋguʼɔ liɛŋ. Moŋ lɨʼɨ ghɔ, kə̄ɨ shi mbɔ fɔ pugu pa kru shua. 
“Thɔ yəɨ shie ni ŋguoŋ nnu pei?” Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ooŋ.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Nthɛ yie ghɔ, sheshe ŋgaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi ŋa a ŋgaŋ younjiŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po nɛ pɔ nɔ ŋgaŋ nda ŋa a fuʼu pa maoŋ fhi pugu pa ndunu maoŋ llɔ moŋ lɨʼɨ nūʼɔŋ pugu.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ pa luʼɔ chrà pei, ndɔllɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ 
ŋga nchəɨŋ moŋ ji laʼataoŋ, nthɔ njɛʼi vugu moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi yugu. Pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni njaʼo nɔ haʼaŋ a yɛʼi nu nɛ ghrāo nchhu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei yəɨ fɨʼɨ shiethɔ yei pugu pa ghrɨ́ pi hɨŋ nɔ fāʼa nu tɨtɨnɨ fàʼa pei nɔ ghɔ? 
Yei lɔ mbɔ muuŋ kaminda? Ligi mǔuŋ vi lɔ mbɔ Meri? Jɛiŋ, Joshɛ, Shemu pugu Judashi shi lɔ mbɔ pa lǐŋ pi? 
Pia pa lǐŋ pi pi piŋgɛ shi lɔ mbɔ hɛiŋ kaʼa? Ti a yəɨ shiethɔ pugu ghrɨ́ pi hɨŋ nɔ chwīe nu ŋkwaŋ nnu pei nɔ ghɔ?” 
Nnɛ pugu lāa vi. Ndɔ Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pi shiʼa nchɨ̄ʼə njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ŋkiɛŋ laʼa pugu shɨna ŋgwa pi.” 
A shini ndɔ nchwīe ntou pa nnu ghraoghrao fɔ nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ ghaŋ ki piŋ. 
﻿Matio.
14.
Hɛrɔ, mbɔ ŋgaŋ shaʼa Galili, ni ŋga njaʼo fɨʼɨ ndighaʼo Jishɔ, 
nchhu ni puoŋ fàʼa pi ŋa, “Yei Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ. Pi kuʼɔ vi llɔ moŋ gu, a chwīe yie a fāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ chwīe nu pa nnu ghraoghrao pei.” 
Nthɛ ŋa Hɛrɔ ni ŋkwo wɛ̄iŋ Jouŋ ŋkrao vi māʼaŋ moŋ chə́ɨŋ nthɛ nnu Herodia mbɔ ŋgwɛ Fili ndǐŋ vi. 
Nthɛ ŋa nɔ yichəɨ fɨʼɨ ndɨɨ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ni nthɔ nchhu nu ni Hɛrɔ ŋa, “A lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo vɛ ŋa ɔ laŋ Herodia!” 
Njiʼi nthɛ nɔ haʼaŋ Hɛrɔ ni ntāʼa nu njwi vi ndɨɨ ghɔ nɛ, a ni mbɔgɔ pa ŋgwa Juu nthɛ ŋa pugu ni ndɔ̄gɔ Jouŋ nɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi. 
Pi ni ŋga nthɔ njɨ llɛ́ phi Hɛrɔ, muuŋ Herodia yi miŋgwɛ pini pini shhɨ ŋgwa, túa Hɛrɔ pwa. 
Nnɛ, a kāʼa vi ndɔ nshwrɛ̄i ŋa a shi ŋkɨnɛiŋ vi ni sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a shi mbie vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
Mǔuŋ vi chwīe a pie ŋa, “Fɛ thɔ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ vəɨ hɛiŋ ŋkuoŋ pashinja yei.” 
Fùoŋ ni mbɔ ni tuʼuthɔ, ndɔ nthɛ kɨna ŋa a ni ŋkwo shwrɛ̄i shhɨ ghaŋ gɛ̀ pi nɛ, a fɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi thɔ ni thɔ Jouŋ mfɛ ghɔ. 
A taoŋ ŋgwa pi yaʼa thɔ Jouŋ moŋ chə́ɨŋ, 
nthɔ ni thɔ yi ghɔ ŋkuoŋ pashinja, mfɛ ni muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ, a ghə̄ɨ njəɨ mǔuŋ vi nɔ ghɔ. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ thɔ ndɔ̄gɔ khu Jouŋ ŋgə̄ɨ ntwei, ndɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nshwei Jishɔ nɔ ghɔ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo yei nnu, ndɔllɔ fɔ moŋ kikuoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ ŋa ŋgwa lɔ mbɔ nɛ. Ndɔ pa ŋgwa ni njaʼo, njōu njiŋ yi ni kwo llɔ moŋ pa laʼa. 
A ni ŋga ntaoŋ ŋkaoŋ mbhi, njəɨ ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yú ŋgwa, mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pugu, njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni fanaoŋ, ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi lɨʼɨ ŋa ŋgwa lɔ mbɔ, ndɨɨ lɔ ŋkwo ya ŋgə̄ɨ, chhu yú ŋgwa pei ghə̄ɨ moŋ pa laʼa, njuoŋ maoŋ jɨ pugu fɔ njɨ.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pugu lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu, p̂əɨ fɛ yaoŋ ni pugu pugu jɨ.” 
Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pigi wuʼɔ mfāʼo pi tiɛŋ kəɨŋ brɛi hɛiŋ ni paa shhu.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ thɔ nɔ hɛiŋ.” 
Nɛnnɛ a fɛ gɨ́ ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu chɔchɔ ŋkuoŋ trǔ. A lɔ̄gɔ tiɛŋ kəɨŋ brɛi ni paa shhu pighɔ, ŋga mbɨʼɨ ligi yi ndīi po, mfɛ tōo nu ni Minnwi. Mbəʼɨ brɛi pighɔ kiʼɛ mfɛ ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi. Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi fɛ ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ. 
Ŋguoŋ yugu kru ti njru. Pugu ni ndɨ̄ga pa pəʼɨ pəʼɨ pɨgəɨ pi, a lɨnaoŋ paanchrɔ mikuo. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋkru nɛ ni mbɔ tiɛŋ ŋkaŋ pimbia maa ndɔ̄gɔ piŋgɛ pugu pa puoŋ. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ chwīe ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nii moŋ kikuoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ nɔ shaʼa nu ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nchhu nu ni kɨrɨ ghɔ ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ nɛ. 
A ni ŋga ŋkwo chhu ni kɨrɨ ghɔ ti pugu ghə̄ɨ, a kuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra lɨʼɨ luoŋ Minnwi təʼɨ vi. Fanaoŋ ni ŋga nthɔ, Jishɔ wuʼɔ mbɔ fɔ təʼɨ vi. 
Ndɔ ndɨɨ yei, kikuoŋ ghɔ ni ŋkwo ya ŋgə̄ɨ ndaoŋ shɨga moŋ ŋkhǐ, fɨfrəɨ thɔ ndɨʼɨ vi nthɛ ŋa a ni ntaoŋ pi ŋgei yɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni ndaʼa mbhi laŋ, moŋ shɨna trɛi minaoŋ pugu ntɨgao minaoŋ, a nyīeŋ nu ŋkuoŋ ŋkhǐ nthɔ nu yəɨ pugu. 
Ndɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni ŋga njəɨ vi a nyīeŋ nu ŋkuoŋ ŋkhǐ nthɔ nu nɛ, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu pugu chhu ŋa, “A pɔ pi ŋkhushɛ!” mbaʼo ŋgòu moŋ pɔgɔ gu. 
Ndɔ wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ Jishɔ chrā ni pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “P̂əɨ fāʼo wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ, a mmu, kiʼi pəɨ pɔgɔ gu.” 
Pita chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, ä mbɔ gɔ̀, ɔ fɛ gɨ́ vəɨ ŋa nthɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋkhǐ mbara ghɔ.” 
A chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Thɔ.” Nnɛ, Pita taoŋ moŋ kikuoŋ nyīeŋ ŋkuoŋ ŋkhǐ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ para Jishɔ. 
Ndɔ a ni ŋga njəɨ fɨfrəɨ, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vi, a jɛ̄ yie nu, ŋkə̄ɨ ŋa, “Taathɔ, kwe a!” 
Jishɔ fɛ mbhɔ yi chomilaoŋ ghɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, “Yo, ŋgaŋ piŋ kikɛʼi vei! A ni nchwīe khɔ ɔ fāʼo khuthɔ?” 
Pugu yu gha nii moŋ kikuoŋ, fɨfrəɨ ghɔ tithi. 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ moŋ kikuoŋ nɛ ghaʼo vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Shishini, ɔ Muuŋ Minnwi!” 
Pugu ni ŋga nshaʼa, ntaoŋ mbhi lɨʼɨ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Gɛnɛsharɛ nɛ, 
pa ŋgwa lɨʼɨ pighɔ gha nji ŋa a Jishɔ, ntaoŋ ŋgwa moŋ ŋguoŋ krao ŋgei ghɔ, pugu thɔ ni pa ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ njəɨ vi nɔ ghɔ. 
Pugu lɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a mieŋ ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ wuʼɔ ŋkāoŋ pi po ndhwí yi. Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni ŋkāoŋ ndhwí yi nɛ, noŋ yugu tɔgɔ. 
﻿Matio.
15.
Nnɛ, a gha ndara pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi thɔ llɔ Jerushalɛiŋ njəɨ Jishɔ nchhu ŋa, 
“A chwīe khɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ pəʼɨ nùʼɔŋ pa tǎa? Pugu shiʼa njiʼi nshɨ̄gao mbhɔ yugu maa njɨ maoŋ.” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ti a chwīe khɔ pəɨ pəʼɨ kɨ̀na Minnwi nthɛ nùʼɔŋ yəɨ? 
Nthɛ ŋa Minnwi fɛ gɨ́ ŋa, ‘Ghaʼo tǎa ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ ghɔ,’ ndɔ ‘Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chrā nnu pɨphɨ nthɛ tǎa vi, ki mǔuŋ vi nɛ yiʼi ŋa pi shi njwi vi.’ 
Ndɔ pəɨ chhu yəɨ ŋa, ‘Ŋ̈oŋ nchhu ni tǎa vi ki mǔuŋ vi ŋa, “Yaoŋ ŋa ŋ̀ka ni mfɛ vɛ nɛ, mfɛ ni Minnwi,” 
ŋoŋ ghɔ lɔ mfāʼo nɔ ghaʼo nu tǎa vi.’ Nnɛ nthɛ nùʼɔŋ yəɨ, pəɨ chwīe chrà Minnwi pɔ gha. 
Pa ŋgwa mifɨɨ pei! Njəɨlɨʼɨ mbɔ Ishaya ni nchhu shini ndɨɨ ŋa a ni nchrā nthɛ vəɨ ŋa, 
‘Ŋgwa pei ghà ŋgaʼo a pi ni nchò yugu, ndɔ paʼa njùʼɔ yugu lɔ mbara yəɨ mu, 
Ghɛ̀rɛ lɔ mbɔ ni pugu moŋ ghaʼo nu ma, nthɛ ŋa pugu yɛʼi nūʼɔŋ ŋgwamishua nɔ haʼaŋ a pɔ pi gɨ́ a!’ ” 
Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ ŋgwa pighɔ pugu thɔ njəɨ vi, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ ywɛrɛ ndɔ njaʼo. 
A lɔ njiʼi mbɔ yaoŋ ŋa a ghà nii nchò ŋoŋ nɛ ŋa a ghà mfuo vi, a pɔ pi yaoŋ ŋa a taoŋ nchò yu nɛ. A yie ghɔ mbɔ yaoŋ ŋa a ghà mfuo ŋoŋ nɛ.” 
Nnɛ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ ji ŋa pa ŋgwa Farashi fāʼo pɨgɨtua ndɨɨ ŋa pugu yaʼo ɔ chhu nnu yei nɛ?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Sheshe thɨ ŋa a lɔ mbhi Tǎa a po nɛ, pi shi nshūʼɔ. 
Kiʼi pəɨ wie noŋ yəɨ nthɛ vugu. Pugu pa nchriligi nthɔ nōoŋ ndaoŋ ni pa nchriligi. Ndɔ ti n̈chriligi nōoŋ ndaoŋ ni nchriligi, ŋguoŋ vugu gū moŋ tiɛŋ.” 
Ndɔ Pita chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Shwei njiŋ luʼɔ chrà ghɔ ni pigi.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ wuʼɔ mbou pi lɨna ŋkaa pəɨ? 
Pəɨ lɔ naa njəɨ ŋa sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a nii nchò nɛ tiri nii moŋ puŋ, ntiri ntaoŋ nii moŋ krao? 
Ndɔ ti yaoŋ ŋa a taoŋ moŋ nchò nɛ, llɔ pi moŋ njùʼɔ, nchwīe ɔ pɔ yi fuo. 
Nthɛ ŋa pa kwàʼa pɨphɨ, jwi nu ŋoŋ, nnu shúoŋ mbhɔ ghaŋ láŋ, ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ nnu kwoshuoŋ ghao, ŋgɨna, kwe nu ntie ni mbe pugu pa chrā nu phɨ nɔ ligi ŋoŋ, llɔ pi moŋ njùʼɔ ŋoŋ. 
A pa pie ghɔ mbɔ pa maoŋ pɛ ŋa a ghà mfuo ŋoŋ nɛ. Ndɔ jɨ nu yaoŋ ki lɔ nshɨ̄gao mbhɔ shiʼa njiʼi mfuo ŋoŋ.” 
Jishɔ lɔllɔ fɔ nshūu mbɨnɨ njiŋnjiŋ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ krao ŋgei Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, miŋgwɛ Kanaŋ chəɨ llɔ krao ŋgei ghɔ taoŋ mbaʼo ŋgòu nchhu ŋa, “Fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu, yo Taathɔ, Muuŋ Devi, muuŋ a yi miŋgwɛ thɔ mfāʼo ŋgəʼɨ llɔ mbhɔ pa miŋwɛiŋ.” 
Ndɔ paʼa Jishɔ lɔ njiʼi ŋkhwɛ̄ taʼa chrà ghɔ. Ndɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa, “Yōu vi a ghə̄ɨ nthɛ ŋa a nyīeŋ mbaʼo ŋgòu nthɔ nu njiŋ pia!” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pi ni ntaoŋ a pi wuʼɔ ni pa puoŋ Ishrae ŋa pugu pɔ nɔ pa minjɨɨ ŋa pugu phɛ nɛ.” 
Ndɔ miŋgwɛ ghɔ thɔ ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ yu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Taathɔ, ghɛ̄rɛ a.” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “A lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɔ lɔ̄gɔ nu maoŋ jɨ puoŋ māʼaŋ ni pa miŋgu.” 
Miŋgwɛ ghɔ chhu ŋa, “Ooŋ, ma Taathɔ, ndɔ njiʼi nthɛ pi pa miŋgu ghà njɨ pa ŋkuʼu maoŋ ŋa a gū llɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi taathɔ vugu nɛ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ kiʼɛ ŋa, “Yo, miŋgwɛ vei! Ɔ fāʼo mmɛ piŋ! Nnu ŋa ɔ tāʼa nu nɛ pi shi nchwīe mfɛ vɛ.” Chomilaoŋ ghɔ noŋ muuŋ vi ghɔ kiʼi ndɔ ntɔgɔtɔgɔ. 
Jishɔ lɔllɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nyīeŋ nu ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ Galili. Ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra nchɔchhɔ fɔ. 
Ŋkiɛŋ ntou yú ŋgwa thɔ njəɨ vi ni pa ŋkwíni kwo, pa nchriligi, pa sheshe ŋkwaŋ ŋkwíni, pa fhɨncho, pugu pa ntou pichəɨ ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ, nūʼɔŋ vugu shhɨ Jishɔ a yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
Pa yú ŋgwa pighɔ ni ŋgrāo ndɨɨ ŋa pugu ni njəɨ fhɨncho chrā nu, pa sheshe ŋkwaŋ ŋkwíni pɔ nu shiʼi, pa ŋkwíni kwò nyīeŋ nu, pa nchriligi yəɨ lɨʼɨ. Pugu ghaʼo Minnwi ŋgwa Ishrae. 
Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi yəɨ yu nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “M̀fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ yú yei nthɛ ŋa pugu kwo pɔ pigi pugu ndwɛ ni trɛi llɛ́ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo yaoŋ njɨ. Ǹdɔ njiʼi ntāʼa nu mieŋ pugu ghə̄ɨ ni njì, kaŋ minthɛ shɔnɔ ŋgū ndaoŋ.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pia shi njəɨ ntou brɛi pi hɨŋ moŋ lɨʼɨ yó yei ti fɨʼɨ mmɛ yú ŋgwa pei kru njru?” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo pi ndigi brɛi yi khɔ?” Pugu chhu ŋa, “Yi khwachəɨ, ni shɨgɛi puoŋ mi shhu.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu chɔchɔ shhɛ. 
A lɔ̄gɔ khwachəɨ ndigi brɛi ghɔ pugu pa shhu ghɔ, ŋga ŋkwo tōo Minnwi, mbəʼɨ mfɛ ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi fɛ ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ. 
Ŋguoŋ vugu ghao kru ti njru. Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi lɨ̄ga pa pəʼɨpəʼɨ pɨgəɨ pi, a lɨnaoŋ moŋ khwachəɨ mɛmmɛ mikuo. 
Ŋguoŋ pimbia pɛ ŋa pugu ni njɨ maoŋ pighɔ nɛ ni mbɔ khwɛ ŋkaŋ yugu, ŋkaoŋ maa ndɔ̄gɔ piŋgɛ pugu pa puoŋ. 
A gha ŋkwo chhu pa yú ŋgwa pighɔ ghə̄ɨ, a nii moŋ kikuoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ krao ŋgei Magadaŋ. 
﻿Matio.
16.
Pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ŋgwa Shadushi thɔ njəɨ Jishɔ, ntāʼa nu mōoŋ vi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa a nōoŋ lì ni pugu llɔ po. 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “A ghà ŋga mbɔ ni fanaoŋ, pəɨ chhu ŋa mbhi shi mbwa nthɛ ŋa pəɨ līi ghaa mbhi njəɨ ŋa a pie. 
A ghà mbɔ ni tutuʼu, pəɨ chhu ŋa, ‘mbɨ̀ shi ndhɔ nthɛ ŋa mbhi pie nshishini.’ Pəɨ ya nji līi nu ghaa mbhi nshwei njiŋ yi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nji njiŋ pa lì ŋa a thɔ nōoŋ nu moŋ mbhi nɛ. 
Ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ pɨphɨ pugu pa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ ŋkɨna pugu Minnwi ghà ntāʼa pi lì, ndɔ mbaʼa pi yiʼi nōoŋ kaŋ taʼa lì ghɔ ŋkiɛŋ lì Jona.” Nnɛ a mieŋ vugu ŋgə̄ɨ ni vhi. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ ni ŋga nshāʼa ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ, ndīʼɛ nɔ lɔ̄gɔ nu brɛi. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ lɨna yishi pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ŋgwa Shadushi.” 
Pugu jɛ̄ nthɔ nchrā nu ni noŋ pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pia lɔ nthɔ ni brɛi, a chwīe yie a chhu nnɛ.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ ni ŋga nji nnu pei, nchhu ŋa, “Yo, ghaŋ fāʼo piŋ kikɛʼi pei, A chwīe khɔ pəɨ chrā nu ni noŋ pəɨ ŋkuoŋ nnu pou brɛi? 
Thɔ yəɨ lɔ naa nshie yaʼa? Pəɨ lɔ ŋkwiŋ tiɛŋ ndigi brɛi yɛ ni tiɛŋ ŋkaŋ pimbia, ni fɨʼɨ mikuo yɛ ŋa pɨgəɨ yi ni ndɨnaoŋ nɛ? 
Ki ŋkwiŋ khwachəɨ ndigi brɛi ni khwɛ ŋkaŋ pimbia, ni fɨʼɨ pa mɛmmɛ mikuo ndɨnaoŋ ŋa pəɨ ni ndɨ̄ga nɛ? 
A pɔ pi nɛiŋ ŋa pəɨ lɔ nji ŋa ǹdɔ njiʼi nchrā nthɛ pi brɛi? P̂əɨ chhɔ ndɨna yishi pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ŋgwa Shadushi.” 
Nɛnnɛ thɔ yugu shie kiʼɛ ŋa a shini ndɔ nchhu pi ŋa pugu chhɔ ndɨna yishi brɛi, a ni nchhu pi ŋa pugu lɨna yaoŋ ŋa pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ŋgwa Shadushi ghà ntɨgɨ nɛ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nthɔ moŋ krao ŋgei Kaisharia Filipai, mbie ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Ŋgwa ghà nchhu ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Pugu chhu ŋa, “Pichəɨ chhu ŋa Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ, pichəɨ chhu ŋa Elaija, pichəɨ ŋa Jɛrimaya ki taʼa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ti pəɨ chhu ŋa mi pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Shemu Pita khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi maoŋ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Mbɔrɔ pɔ vɛ, ma Shemu muuŋ Jona. A lɔ njiʼi nōoŋ ŋoŋmishua nōoŋ yinɛ nnu vɛ, a nōoŋ Tǎa a ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei ghɔ, ɔ Pita (njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa ŋgùʼɔ), ndɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋgùʼɔ yei ǹshi ŋkrao chɔshi a, ndɔ ti mbaʼa njɨ gu lɛ ŋgaʼa vi. 
Ǹshi mfɛ chuʼɔ nda Shaʼafuoŋ Po vɛ, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa ɔ krao ŋkuoŋ shhɛ hɛiŋ nɛ shi mbɔ yi krao po, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa ɔ fēi ŋkuoŋ shhɛ nɛ shi mbɔ yi fēi po.” 
Nnɛ, Jishɔ fɛ gɨ́ ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa kiʼi pugu shwei shesheŋoŋ ŋa a Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ. 
Jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ jɛ̄ nōoŋ nu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa a yiʼi ŋa a ghə̄ɨ Jerushalɛiŋ, njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ nthɛ ntou pa nnu llɔ mbhɔ pa thishɨ pugu pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ni pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi, pi jwi vi, a gha mbɔ trɛi llɛ́, a kuʼɔ. 
Pita lɔ̄gɔ vi pugu yu ghə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ təʼɨ vugu njɛ̄ pɨ̄ga nu vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Mbaʼa a yiʼi mbɔ nnɛ vɛ, ma Taathɔ. Mbaʼa nnu yei ma ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ghɔ.” 
Ndɔ a kara nchhu ni Pita ŋa, “Lɔllɔ yəɨ mu, ma Shata. Ɔ pɔ pi kɨʼɨŋgɨnɨ vəɨ nthɛ ŋa ɔ lɔ njiʼi nūʼɔŋ njùʼɔ yɔ pi ŋkuoŋ pa nnu Minnwi, ɔ ka nūʼɔŋ pi ŋkuoŋ nnu ŋgwamishua.” 
Nnɛ Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Shesheŋoŋ ntāʼa nu njōu njiŋ a, a mieŋ phi nnu haʼaŋ a khwā nɛ, ntiɛŋ wáʼa yi njōu njiŋ a. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu ndūgu ni chɔmbhi yi nɛ shi shiɛŋ chɔmbhi yi ghɔ, ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a mīʼaŋ chɔmbhi yi nthɛ a nɛ, shi ndūgu ni chɔmbhi yi ghɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋmishua nthɛ a shei pi khɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ä mfāʼo ŋguoŋ mbhi ghao nɔ ji ndɔ nshiɛŋ chɔmbhi yi, ki ŋoŋmishua nthɛ a kwri chɔmbhi yi ŋkwe pi khɔ? 
Nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nthɔ pugu pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi moŋ ndighaʼo Tǎa vi, ŋkɨnɛiŋ shesheŋoŋ wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋoŋ ghɔ fāʼa nɛ. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, pichəɨ ŋgwa thi hɛiŋ ŋa mbaʼa pugu yiʼi ŋkhu ŋkaoŋ maa njəɨ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua a thɔ nɔ fùoŋ.” 
﻿Matio.
17.
Ntɨgao llɛ́ ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, Jishɔ lɔ̄gɔ Pita, ni Jɛiŋ, ni Jouŋ ndǐŋ vi, pugu pugu kuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ ntaaŋ mbra mbɔ fɔ wuʼɔ pugu. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni ndīi Jishɔ nɛ, a kwri ligi pugu, miŋi mi thɛ nɔ minaoŋ, ndhwí yi fugu ti nchīa nɔ líʼɛ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, Mushi pugu Elaija nōoŋ noŋ yugu, pugu pa Jishɔ chrā nu. 
Pita chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, a pwa nɔ haʼaŋ pia pɔ hɛiŋ nɛ. Ɔ̈ ŋkhwā, ŋ̀krao trɛi ntǎa hɛiŋ, taʼa yi vɛ, taʼa yi ni Mushi, taʼa yi ni Elaija.” 
A ni ŋguʼɔ nchrā nu ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, lúluŋ chiachia kuru vugu, ŋggì chhu moŋ lúluŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Yei ŋkiɛŋ Muuŋ a ŋa ŋ̀khwā, m̀fāʼo pwatua nthɛ vi. P̂əɨ yaʼo mbhɔ yu.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, mfūŋ ni thɔ yugu shhɛ, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu. 
Ndɔ Jishɔ thɔ ŋkāoŋ vugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔllɔ, kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu.” 
Pugu gha mbɨʼɨ thɔ yugu, paʼa ndɔ njəɨ kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ ŋkiɛŋ Jishɔ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nthɔ nshwiʼi mbra nɛ, Jishɔ fɛ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ shwei ŋoŋ ni nnu ŋa pəɨ yəɨ nɛ ti Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nuʼuŋ ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pie vi ŋa, “Ti a ni nchwīe khɔ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi chhu ŋa Elaija shi fǔoŋ nthɔ?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Elaija thɔ nu, ndɔ shi mbīri ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ghao a kāʼo nɔ haʼaŋ a ni fǔoŋ mbɔ nɛ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa Elaija kwo thɔ, ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ nji vi, pugu fāʼa mbɨŋ yu ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pugu khwā nɛ. A haʼaŋ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua ŋkaa yu shi njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ mbhɔ pugu nɛ.” 
Thɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shie kiʼɛ ŋa a thɔ nchhu pi Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ. 
Pugu ni ŋga nthɔ njəɨ yú ŋgwa pighɔ, chəɨ ŋoŋ thɔ njəɨ vi ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɛ shhɨ yu, 
nchhu ŋa, “Taathɔ, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ muuŋ a, a ghà ŋgū thɔ, nthɔ njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi. A ghà ŋgū moŋ móŋoŋ pugu pa moŋ ŋkhǐ ŋgɛŋgɛ. 
Mi ni ndɔ̄gɔ vi nthɔ njəɨ ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ nɔ ghɔ, ndɔ pugu yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yi kikie.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋgwrɛiŋgwa ki fāʼo piŋ ndɔ mbɔ ŋgwa təɨtəɨ moŋ kwāʼa nu məɨ, mi shi mbɔ pia pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Mi shi mfāʼo wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ nthɛ vəɨ pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Pəɨ thɔ nu muuŋ ghɔ hɛiŋ.” 
Jishɔ pɨ̄ga miŋwɛiŋ, ghɔ a taoŋ mbɨŋ muuŋ ghɔ, ghɨ̌nɔ muuŋ ghɔ mmɛ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ thɔ njiŋnjiŋ mbara vi mbie vi ŋa, “A ni nchwīe khɔ pigi fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ kikie?” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Nthɛ ŋa pəɨ fāʼo pi puoŋ mi piŋ. Nthɛ ŋa shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, p̈əɨ mfāʼo piŋ, a wuʼɔ ŋkɨgəɨ ti mbɔ pi nɔ ŋkiɛŋ muuŋ mi mbhɛ̌ yaoŋ gɛ, pəɨ chhu ni mbra yei ŋa, ‘Lɔllɔ hɛiŋ nyīeŋ ŋgə̄ɨ hiŋ,’ kaŋ a shi nyīeŋ, ndɔ mbaʼa yichəɨ nnu ghaʼa vəɨ.” 
Ndɔ yei ŋkwaŋ miŋwɛiŋ shiʼa ntaoŋ, kaŋ a nɛiŋ pi luoŋ Minnwi ni jī ŋkhǐ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni ŋkɨrɨ nu Galili nɛ, Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pi tɔthɔ nchaʼa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua mfɛ mbhɔ ŋgwamishua. 
Pugu shi njwi vi, a gha mbɔ moŋ trɛi llɛ́, Minnwi kuʼɔ ni ju moŋ gu.” Nnu ghɔ ghana vugu ŋkiɛŋ yie ghɔ. 
Pugu ni ŋga nthɔ nchəɨŋ Kapanuŋ, pa ghaŋ kwe taashi moŋ Nda Minnwi thɔ njəɨ Pita, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha yɔ shiʼa mbe taashi moŋ Nda Minnwi?” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “A ghà mbe.” Pita ni ŋga nii nda, a fǔoŋ Jishɔ nchrā ghɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ɔ pīʼi jɔ ŋa, Shemu? Pa fùoŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei ghà ŋkwe shebe ki taashi pi mbhɔ pa gɔ̌? Llɔ mbhɔ puoŋ pugu ki llɔ mbhɔ pa ŋgwa nduoŋ?” 
Pita khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pa ŋgwa nduoŋ.” Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “A nōoŋ ŋa pa puoŋ lɔ mfāʼo nɔ pe nu. 
Ndɔ nɔ chwīe nu ŋa kiʼi túa yugu pɨgɨ, ghə̄ɨ moŋ ŋkhǐ māʼaŋ mbaʼa. Fǔoŋ shhu ŋa ɔ wɛ̄iŋ nɛ, ŋaʼaŋ nchò yi, ɔ shi nɛ njəɨ mbɨŋ fɔ. Fuʼu ŋgə̄ɨ mbe ni pugu nɔ ligi yɔgɔ.” 
﻿Matio.
18.
Ndɨɨ ghɔ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ thɔ njəɨ vi mbie vi ŋa, “A gɔ̌ mbɔ ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po?” 
Nnɛ, Jishɔ gha mɛ̄iŋ muuŋ mbrɔ ntigi vi shɨna pugu 
nchhu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, p̈əɨ mieŋ ki lɔ njiʼi ŋkara mbɔ nɔ puoŋ prɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ ma nii moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a jū noŋ yi mbɔ nɔ muuŋ vei nɛ pɔ ju ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ taʼa muuŋ nɔ yei nɔ ligi a nɛ piŋ pi mmu. 
“Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chwīe taʼa yi shɨna puoŋ mi puoŋ pei ŋa pugu piŋ a nɛ kɔ̄rɔ ŋgū moŋ phɨ nɛ, a nì mbwa ŋa pi chu mmɛ ŋgùʼɔ wuʼɔ yaoŋ mmi yu njīe vi laʼo ŋkhǐ nchaa ŋa a thi sháʼa Minnwi. 
“Wuwuru ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni ŋkuoŋ mbhi nthɛ ŋa pa yaoŋ ŋa a nthɛ a chwīe ŋgwa gū moŋ phɨ nɛ pɔ moŋ ghɔ. Ndɔ a yiʼi ŋa pa yaoŋ nɔ chwīe nu ŋgwa gū moŋ phɨ shi nthɔ. Ndɔ ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni ŋoŋ ŋa pa nnu pighɔ kie pi mbhɔ yu maa nthɔ nɛ. 
Ndɔ ti kwò yɔ ki mbhɔ yɔ nchwīe ɔ gū moŋ phɨ, ɔ yaʼa vi mīʼaŋ. A pwa ŋa ɔ nii moŋ chɔmbhi nɔ ŋkwíni ki ŋkwíni kwò, nchaa ŋa ɔ fāʼo paa mbhɔ yɔ pugu paa kwò yɔ, pi lɔ māʼaŋ ghɔ moŋ móŋoŋ ki ndugwi yi. 
L̈igi yɔ nchwīe ɔ gū moŋ phɨ, ɔ fuʼu vi mbɨŋ ghɔ mīʼaŋ. A pwa ŋa ɔ nii chɔmbhi ni taʼa ligi nchaa fāʼo nu paa ligi pi lɔ māʼaŋ ghɔ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ. 
“Paʼo nɔ yəɨ nu ŋa pəɨ lɔ nchɨ̄ʼə taʼa puoŋ mi ŋgwa pei, nthɛ ŋa ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi pugu ghà ŋguʼɔ mbɔ shhɨ Tǎa a po. 
Nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua ni nthɔ pi nɔ kwe nu ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu phɛ nɛ. 
“Pəɨ pīʼi yəɨ ŋa? Ŋ̈oŋ mfāʼo taʼa ŋkɨɨ minjɨɨ, taʼa yi ghə̄ɨ mbhɛ, paʼa ŋoŋ ghɔ lɔ mieŋ ndipuʼu wuŋ ni ndigi ndipuʼu ŋkuoŋ ŋkǔnu, ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ tāʼa nu taʼa yi yɛ ŋa a phɛ nɛ? 
Ti ä njəɨ, shishini ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, a shi mfāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nɔ ghɔ nchaa ndipuʼu wuŋ ni ndigi ndipuʼu ŋa pugu lɔ njiʼi mbhɛ nɛ. 
Nnɛ, a lɔ njiʼi mbɔ khwǎ njùʼɔ Tǎa a ŋa kaŋ taʼa yi shɨna puoŋ mi ŋgwa pei phɛ gha. 
“N̈dǐŋ ghɔ nchwīe phɨ mbɨŋ ghɔ, ɔ ghə̄ɨ njəɨ vi nshwei fàŋ yi ghɔ, wuʼɔ shɨna pəɨ yu pi paa. Ti a njwɛrɛ nnu ŋa a chhu nu nɛ, kaŋ ɔ ghɛ̄rɛ ndǐŋ ɔ ŋkwəɨ ni ju. 
Ndɔ ä mieŋ ki lɔ njaʼo nnu ŋa ɔ chhu nɛ, ɔ lɔ̄gɔ taʼa ŋoŋ ki paa ŋgwa mbīgi mbɨŋ ghɔ nnɛ ŋa paa ŋgwa ki trɛi ŋgwa shi mbɔ pa miŋkwentie moŋ nnu ŋa pugu chhu nɛ nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa nnu ghɔ nnu shini. 
Ndɔ ti ä ndāa ki lɔ njaʼo vugu, ɔ shwei chɔshi nɔ ghɔ. Ti ä mieŋ ki yaʼo njiʼi nthɛ pi mbhɔ chɔshi, pəɨ tuo vi nɔ haʼaŋ pi ghà ntuo ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ mbiŋ Minnwi nɛ pugu pa ŋgwɛ̄iŋ taashi. 
“Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ krao ŋkuoŋ shhɛ hɛiŋ nɛ shi mbɔ yi krao po, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ fēi ŋkuoŋ shhɛ nɛ shi mbɔ yi fēi po. 
“Ŋkamuʼɔŋ ǹshwei vəɨ, p̈əɨ pi paa mbiŋ nnu ŋkuoŋ shhɛ ŋa pəɨ luoŋ nu ŋa Minnwi chwīe nɛ, Tǎa a po shi nchwīe mfɛ ni pəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa lɨʼɨ ŋa paa ŋgwa ki trɛi ŋgwa kɨrɨ nɔ ligi a nɛ, m̀bɔ fɔ pigi pugu.” 
Nnɛ Pita thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, ndǐŋ a nthɛ a chwīe phɨ mbɨŋ a pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ ŋ̀guʼɔ ndīʼɛ phɨ yi liʼɛ? Khwachəɨ ŋgɛ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋga, ǹdɔ njiʼi nchhu ŋa khwachəɨ ŋgɛ. Ǹchhu pi ŋa khwachəɨ wuŋ ŋgɛ́ ti nchəɨŋ khwachəɨ lɨʼɨ! 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, minthɛ m̀āʼaŋ fɨʼɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Po pi ni yichəɨ fùoŋ ŋa a ni ntāʼa nu ŋka ŋkrù yi mbhɔ puoŋ fàʼa pi. 
Ŋga njɛ̄ pīʼi nu, pi thɔ ni yichəɨ taʼa muuŋ fàʼa yi ghɔ njəɨ vi nɔ ghɔ ŋa ŋkrù taathɔ yi ghɔ ni mbɔ puŋ yu fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa m̈uuŋ fàʼa mfāʼa a tɔgɔ paa ŋkɨɨ ŋkaŋ ŋgaʼo pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa a kaŋ mfɛ paʼa a lɔ mbe nɛ, taathɔ yi fɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi fīni vi pugu pa ŋgwɛ vi, ni puoŋ pi pugu pa ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ŋa a ni mfāʼo nɛ nɔ kɛ̄ʼi nu ŋkrù ghɔ. 
“Nnɛ muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ gū ni kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ taathɔ yi ghɔ ndɨ̄gəɨ, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Fāʼo wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ mbɨŋ mu, nji ŋa ǹshi ŋkɛ̄ʼi ŋguoŋ ŋkrù yɔ ghao!’ 
Nthɛ kwoshɨnɨ, taathɔ muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ, līʼɛ ŋkrù yi ghɔ mieŋ vi a ghə̄ɨ. 
“Ndɔ muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ gha ntaoŋ mbhi, njəɨ yichəɨ ŋoŋ ŋa ŋkrù yi ni mbɔ puŋ ŋoŋ ghɔ fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa m̈uuŋ fàʼa mfāʼa nɔ taʼa ŋkɨɨ llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ. Ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi njɛ̄ kiɛŋ nu mmi yi, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Kɛ̄ʼi ŋkrù a.’ 
“Ndɔ ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa a ni mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa nɔ ju nɛ gū shhɛ, ndɨ̄gəɨ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Fāʼo wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ mbɨŋ mu, nji ŋa ǹshi ŋkɛ̄ʼi ŋkrù yɔ.’ 
A lāa, ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ ndɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ niʼiŋ chə́ɨŋ ti a shi nuʼuŋ ŋkɛ̄ʼi ŋkrù yi. 
“Pichəɨ pa puoŋ fàʼa ni ŋga njəɨ nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, a pɨgɨ vugu nshāʼa laʼa muŋu. Pugu ghə̄ɨ mfɨ̄ʼɨ ŋguoŋ nnu ghao ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ ni fùoŋ ghɔ. 
Nɛnnɛ, a gɛ̄ muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Muuŋ fàʼa mbɨmbhɨ vei! Ǹdīʼɛ ŋguoŋ ŋkrù yɔ nthɛ ŋa ɔ lɨ̄gəɨ a. 
A ka ni mfɛ paʼa ɔ lɔ mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ muuŋ fàʼa nɔ gɔ̀ wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋki fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ?’ 
Moŋ pɨgɨtua, fùoŋ ghɔ chaʼa vi mfɛ ŋa pi niʼiŋ vi chə́ɨŋ mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ghɔ ti a shi nuʼuŋ mbe ŋguoŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ. 
“A haʼaŋ Tǎa a po shi nchwīe ni shesheŋoŋ vəɨ nɔ haʼaŋ p̈əɨ mieŋ ki līʼɛ phɨ pa lǐŋ pəɨ llɔ moŋ njùʼɔ pəɨ.” 
﻿Matio.
19.
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni ŋkwo mīʼɛŋ chhu nu pa nnu pei nɛ, a lɔllɔ Galili ŋgə̄ɨ krao ŋgei Judia njiɛŋ ŋkhǐ Jodaŋ. 
Ntou yú ŋgwa yōu njiŋ yi, a yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu fɔ. 
Pa ŋgwa Farashi thɔ njəɨ vi, mōoŋ vi ni pie nu ŋa, “Gɨ́ Mushi piŋ ŋa ŋoŋ shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi nthɛ sheshe nnu?” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ ŋa ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a ni nchwīe vugu llɔ moŋ njɛ̄ yi nɛ ni nchwīe mimbia pugu miŋgwɛ 
nchhu ŋa, ‘Nthɛ yie ghɔ, mimbia shi mieŋ tǎa vi pugu mǔuŋ vi nchīni mbɨŋ ŋgwɛ vi. Pugu pi paa gū taʼa frɛinoŋ’? 
Nnɛ pugu lɔ nuʼuŋ mbiʼi paa ŋgwa. Pugu pɔ pi taʼa frɛinoŋ. Nthɛ yie ghɔ, yaoŋ ŋa Minnwi chīni nɛ, kiʼi ŋoŋ fɛ̄nɛ.” 
Pugu pie vi ŋa, “Ti a ni nchwīe khɔ Mushi fɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi fɛ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ shāaŋ láŋ mbhɔ miŋgwɛ ghɔ njōu vi a ghə̄ɨ?” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Nthɛ ŋa thɔ yəɨ ni ŋkwei nɛ, Mushi ni mieŋ ŋa pəɨ shāaŋ láŋ pəɨ pa ŋgwɛ pəɨ. Ndɔ llɔ moŋ njɛ̄ yi a shini ndɔ mbɔ pi nɛnnɛ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi ŋkiɛŋ ŋa a kwo shúoŋ mbɨnɨ ndaŋ miŋgwɛ nduoŋ nɛ, kwo shúoŋ.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Shɨ̀na mimbia pugu ŋgwɛ vi mbɔ pi nɛnɛiŋ, a pwa ŋa ŋoŋ chhɔ ki laŋ.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Yei ntɨ́gɨ lɔ mbɔ pi ni ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ghao, a wuʼɔ mbɔ pi ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa Minnwi fɛ ni pugu nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ntou pa nnu pɔ fɔ ŋa a chwīe ki ŋgwa lɔ ndaŋ, pichəɨ pɔ nthɛ ŋa pi ni mbhi vugu ŋa pugu pɔ nɛnnɛ, pichəɨ pɔ nthɛ ŋa ŋgwamishua chwīe ŋa pugu pɔ nɛnnɛ, pichəɨ chwīe noŋ yugu mbɔ nɛnnɛ nthɛ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. Ŋoŋ ŋa a nthɛ a piŋ ntɨ́gɨ yei nɛ chwīe nɛnnɛ.” 
Nnɛ pi thɔ ni pa puoŋ prɔ ŋa a nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ pugu nduoŋ Minnwi mfɛ ni pugu, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pɨ̄ga vugu. 
Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “P̂əɨ mieŋ pa puoŋ prɔ thɔ njəɨ a, kiʼi pəɨ pɔ kɨʼɨŋgɨnɨ ni pugu nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ pi ni ŋkwaŋ ŋgwa pei.” 
A gha nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ pugu, ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ. 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ ni nthɔ njəɨ Jishɔ nchhu ŋa, “Masha, a yəɨ ŋkwaŋ nnu shiʼi ŋa minthɛ ǹchwīe nɔ fāʼo nu chɔmbhi ki mmɛ?” 
A khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ ɔ pie a ni nnu ŋa a yi shiʼi nɛ? A wuʼɔ Taʼa ŋoŋ shiʼi. Ndɔ ɔ̈ ntāʼa nu nii moŋ chɔmbhi ki mmɛ, ɔ nūʼɔŋ pa kɨ̀na.” 
Nnɛ a chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Mbɔ pa pəɨ kɨna?” Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “ ‘Kiʼi njwi ŋoŋ, kiʼi ŋgaŋ láŋ kwoshuoŋ, kiʼi njōo, kiʼi ŋkwe ntie ŋoŋ ni mbe. 
Ghaʼo tǎa ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ ghɔ, ŋkhwā taakuo yɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ khwā noŋ yɔ nɛ.’ ” 
Maʼaŋ mikhwa ghɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋ̀kwo nūʼɔŋ ŋguoŋ yei ghao, ti mi pou pi khɔ ŋkamuʼɔŋ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ̈ ntāʼa mbɔ yi kaʼokaʼo, ɔ ghə̄ɨ mfīni maoŋ pɔ mfɛ ni ghaŋ pou, kaŋ ɔ shi mfāʼo fàʼo po, ndɔ nthɔ njōu njiŋ a.” 
Ndɔ maʼaŋ mikhwa ghɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ tuʼuthɔ nthɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋgaŋ fàʼo. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, a shi ŋguʼɔ ntɔgɔ pi moŋ ghaghaʼa ŋgaŋ fàʼo maa nii moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Po. 
M̀bɨnɨ nshwei vəɨ ŋa, a yīʼɛ ni minyieŋləɨ nɔ tɔgɔ nu moŋ mbo mitaʼa nchaa ŋgaŋ fàʼo nɔ nii nu moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo yei, ŋgrāo ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi nchhu ŋa, “A nthɛ a lūgu gɔ̌ kiʼɛ?” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ līi vugu nchhu ŋa, “Ni ŋoŋmishua, minthɛ paʼa a lɔ mfāʼa, ndɔ ni Minnwi, minthɛ a fāʼa.” 
Nnɛ Pita khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, pigi mieŋ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ghao njōu njiŋ yɔ, ti pigi shi mfāʼo pi khɔ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ ŋa pəɨ yōu njiŋ a nɛ, a shi ŋga mbɔ moŋ mbhi fhi ndɨɨ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ faaŋ ndighaʼo yi nɛ, pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ shi nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ paanchrɔ faaŋ nthɔ shaʼa paanchrɔ laʼataoŋ Ishrae. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu mieŋ pa laʼa pugu, pa lǐŋ pugu pi pimbia pugu pa piŋgɛ, ki tǎa vugu, ki mǔuŋ vi, ki pa puoŋ pi, ki pa shhɛ pi nthɛ a nɛ, shi mbɨnɨ mfāʼo taʼa ŋkɨɨ lɨʼɨ, mbɨnɨ mfāʼo chɔmbhi ki mmɛ. 
Ndɔ ntou ŋgwa ŋa pugu thi shhɨ nɛ shi mbɔ ndugwi njiŋ, pa ndugwi njiŋ thi shhɨ.” 
﻿Matio.
20.
“Shaʼafuoŋ Po pɔ pi nɔ yichəɨ ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ŋa a taoŋ ni muuŋ tutuʼu ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ tāʼa pa puoŋ fàʼa pugu fāʼa moŋ nyìeŋ yu. 
A ni ŋga ŋkwo chrā fɨʼɨ nchuoŋ fāʼa nu taʼa llɛ́, mbɔ fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋoŋ ghà mfāʼa pi pe vi nɔ taʼa llɛ́ nɛ, ntaoŋ vugu moŋ nyìeŋ yu. 
“A gha ntaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ taŋ moŋ ndipuʼu minaoŋ ni tutuʼu, njəɨ pichəɨ ŋgwa thi fɔ ki lɔ nthɔ nchwīe yaoŋ; 
a chhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘Pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ nyìeŋ a, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a kāʼo nɛ ǹshi mbe vəɨ nɔ ghɔ.’ 
Nnɛ pugu ghə̄ɨ. A gha mbɨnɨ mbɔ moŋ paanchrɔ minaoŋ pugu trɛi minaoŋ, a wuʼɔ mbɨnɨ nchwīe pi nɛnnɛ. 
“A gha ŋgə̄ɨ pi tiɛŋ minaoŋ, a pɨnɨ ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ pichəɨ ŋgwa pugu tithi moŋ taŋ, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘A chwīe khɔ pəɨ thi hɛiŋ ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ki lɔ nthɔ nchwīe yaoŋ?’ 
“Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋ lɔ mbe vigi ni fàʼa.’ “Ŋoŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, ‘Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ ŋkaa pəɨ.’ 
“Fanaoŋ gha nthɔ, ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ chhu ni ŋoŋ ŋa a ghà ndɨna ni puoŋ fàʼa nɛ ŋa, ‘Mɛ̄iŋ puoŋ fàʼa mbe mbɨŋ yugu llɔ ŋkuoŋ pa ndugwi pi ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ŋkuoŋ pa fǔoŋ pi.’ 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi ni ndɔ̄gɔ vugu moŋ tiɛŋ minaoŋ ni ŋga nthɔ, pi pe vugu ni fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋoŋ ghà mfāʼa taʼa llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi ki fǔoŋ ndɔ̄gɔ vugu nɛ ni ŋga nthɔ, mbīʼi nu ŋa yugu pe shi njiɛŋ, ndɔ shesheŋoŋ vugu ŋkaa pugu fāʼo pi fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋoŋ ghà mfāʼa taʼa llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
Pugu ni ŋga ŋkwe mbɨŋ yugu, nduo nu ni ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ, 
nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu thɔ ni njiŋ nɛ wuʼɔ mfāʼa pi nɔ taʼa awa, ɔ lɔ̄gɔ vigi pugu ŋkuoŋ taʼa nthɨŋkwo, pigi lɔ mbɔ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pigi fāʼa nɔ taʼa llɛ́ ghɔ ghao, minaoŋ tūoŋ vigi.’ 
“Ndɔ ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ni taʼa yi ŋa, ‘Taannu a, ǹdɔ njiʼi mfāaŋ yichəɨ nnu mbɨŋ ghɔ, pɔgɔ shini ndɔ nchrā ŋa ǹshi mbe ghɔ ni fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋ̈oŋ mfāʼa taʼa llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ? 
Kwe yaoŋ ŋa a jɔ nɛ ŋgə̄ɨ. Ndɔ ŋ̀khwā nɔ fɛ nu ni ndugwi njiŋ muuŋ fàʼa wuʼɔ fɨʼɨ yaoŋ ŋa m̀fɛ vɛ nɛ. 
A lɔ ŋkāʼo vəɨ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa ŋ̀khwā nɛ ni yaoŋ ŋa a nyaŋ nɛ, ki ɔ thɔ mfāʼo kighɨʼə nthɛ ŋa ǹōoŋ pwapuŋ nɛ?’ 
“Nnɛ, ŋgwa ŋa pugu lūgwi njiŋ nɛ shi nthi shhɨ, pɛ ŋa pugu thi shhɨ nɛ, lūgwi njiŋ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ŋkuʼɔ nu Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ, a gɛ̄ paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi njiŋnjiŋ, pugu pugu gha mbɔ shɛndaoŋ a chhu ni pugu ŋa, 
“Pəɨ līi njəɨ, pia kuʼɔ nu nɛ Jerushalɛiŋ. Pi shi nchaʼa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua mfɛ mbhɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi, pugu fɛ njɔ́ gu ghɔ, 
nchaʼa vi mfɛ mbhɔ pa ŋgwa taoŋ nduoŋ, pugu māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ, ŋgwie vi ndɔ ŋkwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa, a gha mbɔ moŋ trɛi llɛ́ a pɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ.” 
Nnɛ, mǔuŋ Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ, mbɔ puoŋ Shebedi, ghə̄ɨ njəɨ Jishɔ ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ yu nduoŋ yaoŋ mbhɔ yu. 
Jishɔ pie vi ŋa, “Ɔ tāʼa pi khɔ?” A chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kāʼa ŋa paa puoŋ paŋ pei shi nchhɔ, taʼa yi ŋgei mbhɔ yɔ yi jɨ, taʼa yi ŋgei mbhɔ ŋkwrɛi, ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ thɔ nshaʼa fùoŋ yɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ njiʼi nji yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ pie nu nɛ, minthɛ pəɨ nnu ndua ŋgəʼɨ ŋa ǹshi nnu nɛ?” Pugu khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “A nthɛ pigi nnu.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ shi nnu llɔ moŋ ndua a, ndɔ chhɔ nu ŋgei mbhɔ a yi jɨ pugu pa ŋkwrɛi lɔ mfāʼo mmu njɨ nɔ fɛ nu, ndɔ a pɔ pi ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa Tǎa a kwo pīri ni pugu nɛ.” 
Ndɔ pɨgəɨ wuŋ ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, mbɨgɨ túa ni paa pa lǐŋ pighɔ. 
Ndɔ Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ vugu, pugu thɔ njəɨ vi, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ji ŋa pa thishɨ ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei ghà nshaʼa ŋgwa pugu shaʼa, pa mɛmmɛ ŋgwa pugu nōoŋ pi nnu ghrɨ́ ni pugu. 
Ndɔ mbaʼa a yiʼi mbɔ pi nnɛ ni pəɨ. Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu nɔ pɔ nu ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ shɨna pəɨ nɛ fāʼo nɔ pɔ nu muuŋ fàʼa vəɨ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu mbɔ nthishɨ shɨna pəɨ nɛ, fāʼo nɔ pɔ nu ŋkǔna vəɨ. 
Wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shini ndɔ nthɔ pi ŋa pi fāʼa mbhɔ yu, a ni nthɔ pi nɔ fāʼa nu ndɔ mfɛ chɔmbhi yi nɔ nchúoŋ yuoŋ thɔ ntou ŋgwa.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni ntaoŋ nu Jeriko nɛ, mmɛ yú ŋgwa yōu njiŋ yi. 
Paa pa nchriligi ni nchhɔ ŋkɨŋ ndaoŋ, pugu ni ŋga njaʼo ŋa Jishɔ tɔgɔ nu shɛndaoŋ ghɔ, mbaʼo ŋgòu ŋa, “Taathɔ, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pigi, ma Muuŋ Devi!” 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ pɨ̄ga vugu, nshwei vugu ŋa pugu lɛrɛ laŋ, pugu pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ mbaʼo pi ŋgòu ni njɨ ŋa, “Taathɔ, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pigi, ma Muuŋ Devi!” 
Jishɔ gha ntithi, mɛ̄iŋ vugu mbie vugu ŋa, “Pəɨ tāʼa nu ŋa ǹchwīe khɔ mbɨŋ pəɨ?” 
Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, ŋaʼaŋ ligi yigi, pigi yəɨ lɨʼɨ.” 
Jishɔ fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pugu, ŋkāoŋ ligi yugu. Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ ligi yugu chuʼɔ, pugu yəɨ lɨʼɨ, njōu njiŋ Jishɔ. 
﻿Matio.
21.
Pugu ni ŋga mbara nu Jerushalɛiŋ, ti ŋkwo chəɨŋ Bɛfɛgɛ ŋkuoŋ Mbra pa Thɨ Olive nɛ, Jishɔ taoŋ paa pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shhɨ, 
nchhu nu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ laʼataoŋ yinɛ shhɨ pəɨ, pəɨ shi ŋga nchəɨŋ fɔ, pəɨ kiʼɛ njəɨ ŋkwɛ́iŋ yəɨ ni muuŋ vi yəɨ yu. Pəɨ kɨ̄gɛi vugu, nthɔ ni pugu mfɛ vəɨ. 
Ti s̈hesheŋoŋ nchhu sheshe nnu ni pəɨ, pəɨ chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taathɔ fāʼo chà nɔ ghɔ’ kaŋ a shi mieŋ vugu ni pəɨ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ.” 
Yei ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa Minnwi ni nchrā ni njəɨlɨʼɨ yi nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa, 
“Chhu ni puoŋ laʼataoŋ Shayaoŋ, ‘Līi njəɨ, fùoŋ vəɨ thɔ nu nɛ njəɨ vəɨ moŋ juju, ndɔ nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ, mbɔ muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ.’” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ghə̄ɨ ŋguʼɔ nchwīe pi nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchhu ni pugu ŋa pugu chwīe nɛ. 
Pugu ghə̄ɨ nthɔ ni ŋkwɛ́iŋ pugu muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ, nūʼɔŋ pa ndhwí pugu mbɨŋ pugu a kuʼɔ nchhɔ fɔ. 
Ntou ŋgwa moŋ yú ghɔ shɛ̄iŋ pa ndhwí pugu shɛndaoŋ, pichəɨ yaʼa pa mbhɔthɨ nshɛ̄iŋ shɛndaoŋ. 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ yu, pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthɔ nu njiŋ yu nɛ ni nthɔ mbaʼo ŋgòu ŋa, “Ndighaʼo pɔ ni Muuŋ Devi! Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni ju ŋa a thɔ nɔ ligi Taathɔ nɛ! Ndighaʼo pɔ ni Minnwi ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ fie moŋ ndugwi po!” 
A gha nii Jerushalɛiŋ, ŋguoŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ chɨ̄ʼɨ ghao, ŋgwa pie nu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Yei njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ moŋ Galili.” 
Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ Nda Minnwi njōu ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthɔ mfīni yaoŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yuoŋ yaoŋ moŋ Nda Minnwi, nshrī taprɛi ghaŋ kwri mbɨŋ pugu pa lə̌ɨ ghaŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni thɔ mfīni pa mintuʼɔlibuŋ nɛ. 
Nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pi nāʼaŋ ŋa, ‘Nda a shi mbɔ lɨʼɨ luoŋ Minnwi,’ ndɔ pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ a pɔ pùo pa ŋgɨna.” 
Pa nchriligi pugu pa ŋkwíni kwò thɔ njəɨ vi moŋ Nda Minnwi, a chwīe pugu pɔ shiʼi. 
Ndɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi ni ŋga njəɨ pa mbwambwa nnu ŋa a chwīe, pugu pa mikəʼɨ ŋa pugu ni mbaʼo ŋgòu moŋ Nda Minnwi ŋa, “Ndighaʼo pɔ ni Muuŋ Devi!” nɛ, pugu pɨgɨtua. 
Nchhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Ɔ yaʼo nnu ŋa ŋgwa pei chhu nu nɛ?” Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Ooŋ, pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ ŋa, ‘Llɔ nchò pa puoŋ fhu pugu pa puoŋ prɔ ɔ pīri ndighaʼo ŋa pi ghaʼo ghɔ nɔ ghɔ.’ ” 
Jishɔ mieŋ vugu ntaoŋ moŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ Betani ndaʼa fɔ. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni tutuʼu, nɔ haʼaŋ a ni mbɨnɨ nu laʼataoŋ ghɔ nɛ, njì yia vi. 
A gha njəɨ thɨ wùnu ŋkɨŋ shɛndaoŋ, ŋgə̄ɨ fɔ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ sheshe yaoŋ ŋkiɛŋ wuʼɔ pa fhɔthɨ. A chhu ni thɨ ghɔ ŋa, “Mbaʼa kaŋ taʼa ntíɛŋ ma nuʼuŋ njuŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ ŋkamuʼɔŋ,” thɨ wùnu ghɔ wuʼɔ mbrāo pi ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi gha njəɨ, ŋgrāo, nchhu nu ŋa, “A kie pi nɛiŋ thɨ wùnu ghɔ kiʼi mbraoprao taʼa ŋgɛ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, p̈əɨ mfāʼo piŋ ki lɔ mfāʼo khuthɔ, paʼa pəɨ lɔ ŋguʼɔ nchwīe pi nnu ŋa pi chwīe mbɨŋ thɨ wùnu yei nɛ, p̈əɨ njiʼi nchhu pi ni mbra yei ŋa, ‘Shūʼɔ hɛiŋ ŋgə̄ɨ ŋgū moŋ ŋkhǐ,’ a wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nnɛ. 
Sheshe yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ pie moŋ luoŋ nɛ, pəɨ shi ŋguʼɔ mfāʼo nɔ haʼaŋ p̈əɨ mfāʼo piŋ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nii moŋ Nda Minnwi, pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa pichəɨ thishɨ thɔ mbara vi nɔ haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ thɔ nchwīe nnu pei pi ni ghrɨ́ gɔ̌, a lɔ mfɛ gɔ̌ mfɛ ghrɨ́ ghɔ vɛ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Mummu ŋkaa mu shi mbie vəɨ ni taʼa píe, ti p̈əɨ mfɛ khwɛ̀ vəɨ, kaŋ ǹshi nshwei vəɨ ni ghrɨ́ ŋoŋ ŋa ǹthɔ nchwīe nnu pei nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
Kwe ŋkhǐ Jouŋ ni ndhɔ pi hɨŋ? A ni ndhɔ pi po ki mbhɔ ŋgwamishua?” Pugu chrā nnu yei shɨna pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “P̈ia nchhu ŋa a ni ndhɔ pi po, a chhu ni pia ŋa ti a ni nchwīe khɔ paʼa pia lɔ mbiŋ vi? 
Ndɔ p̈ia nchhu ŋa a llɔ mbhɔ ŋgwamishua, pia thɔ mbɔgɔ nnu ŋa yu ŋgwa pei shi nchwīe nɛ, nthɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ vugu ji ŋa Jouŋ ni mbɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi.” 
Nnɛ pugu khwɛ̄ ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Pigi lɔ njiʼi nji.” Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kaŋ mbaʼa mummu shwei vəɨ ni lɨʼɨ ŋa m̀fāʼo ghrɨ́ nthɔ nchwīe nnu pei nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
“Pəɨ pīʼi yəɨ ŋa? Yichəɨ ŋoŋ ni mfāʼo paa puoŋ pi mimbia, ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ fǔoŋ yi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Muuŋ a, ghə̄ɨ mfāʼa fàʼa moŋ nyìeŋ shiʼa.’ 
“Muuŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘M̀baʼa njiʼi ŋgə̄ɨ,’ ndɔ a gha ndara shɨgɛi yi, a kwri njùʼɔ yi, nnɛ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ. 
“Ŋoŋ ghɔ ghə̄ɨ mbara yichəɨ muuŋ vi ŋguʼɔ nchhu pi taʼa nnu ghɔ. Muuŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Ǹshi ŋgə̄ɨ, ma baba,’ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋgə̄ɨ. 
A yəɨ shɨna paa puoŋ pei ŋa a chwīe nnu ŋa tǎa vi ni ntāʼa nu nɛ?” Pugu chhu ŋa, “Fǔoŋ yi.” Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa shakhɨ thɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi shhɨ pəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ni nthɔ njəɨ vəɨ, nōoŋ ndaoŋ ndɨndɨ ŋa pəɨ tɔgɔ, ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ mbiŋ vi, ndɔ pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa shakhɨ piŋ vi, ndɔ njiʼi nthɛ pi ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ ni njəɨ nnu pei nɛ, paʼa ndɔ ndaʼa ŋkwri njùʼɔ yəɨ mbiŋ vi.” 
Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Pəɨ pɨnɨ njaʼo yichəɨ luʼɔ chrà. Yichəɨ ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋa a ni mbhi faaŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni grape nɛ. A ni ŋkrao ŋkaʼa ŋgɨ̄ŋ nɔ, ndɔ ntuo ŋkuʼɔ nɨ̄ɨ ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ ŋkhǐ yi taoŋ nɔ chwīe nu làʼo, ndɔ ŋkrao muuŋ nda tɔthɨ nɔ chhɔ nu fɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi nyìeŋ ghɔ. Mfɛ nyìeŋ ghɔ ni ghaŋ fàʼa ŋa pugu lɨna nu nɔ ghɔ ŋga ŋkwōo maoŋ, pugu pugu ghrā, ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼataoŋ nduoŋ. 
Ndɨɨ kwōo ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ ni ŋga ŋkāʼo, a taoŋ puoŋ fàʼa pi ni ghaŋ fàʼa moŋ nyìeŋ ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ ŋkwe ji ghrà ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ. 
“Pa ghaŋ fàʼa pighɔ wɛ̄iŋ puoŋ fàʼa pi pighɔ ŋa a ni ntaoŋ nɛ, ŋgwie taʼa yi, njwi taʼa yi, ntuŋ yichəɨ ni ŋgùʼɔ. 
Ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ pɨnɨ ntaoŋ pichəɨ puoŋ fàʼa ŋa pugu yiɛŋ nchaa fǔoŋ pi pɛ ŋa a ni ntaoŋ nɛ, ghaŋ fàʼa moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ wuʼɔ nchwīe mbɨŋ pugu pi nɛnnɛ. 
“Ndugwi yi ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ taoŋ muuŋ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Pugu shi ŋgaʼo muuŋ a.’ 
“Ndɔ pa ghaŋ fàʼa moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ ghà njəɨ muuŋ vi thɔ nu, pugu chhu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, ‘Yei muuŋ ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ ŋa ŋguoŋ maoŋ shi mbɔ ji nɛ, pəɨ thɔ pia jwi vi nshīŋ maoŋ pi.’ 
Pugu wɛ̄iŋ vi mfuʼu vi moŋ faaŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ māʼaŋ vi mbhi, njwi vi. 
“Ndwɛ, ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgaŋ faaŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ shi nthɔ kiʼɛ nɛ, a shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ ni ghaŋ fāʼa moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ?” 
Pugu khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “A shi njwi ŋgwa pɨphɨ pighɔ, mfɛ faaŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ ni pa ghaŋ fàʼa nduoŋ ŋa pugu shi mfɛ ji ntíɛŋ thɨ ndɨɨ ŋa ndɨɨ kwōo kāʼo nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ yaoŋ ŋa Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi nchhu nɛ yaʼa? ‘Muuŋ nchíʼa yɛ ŋa pəɨ ghaŋ krao nda ni ndāa ŋa a lɔ mfāʼo ghɛ̀rɛ nɛ, pɨnɨ nɛ ŋkara ju mbɔ muuŋ nchíʼa kwonda. Yei fàʼa llɔ mbhɔ Taathɔ, ndɔ mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ nnu pwapwa ligi pia.’ 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹshwei vəɨ, pi shi ŋkwe Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi mbhɔ pəɨ mfɛ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu yuŋ ntíɛŋ ŋa a kāʼo nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a gū ŋkuoŋ ŋgùʼɔ yei shi shɨna kraokrao, ndɔ ti a ŋgū ŋgùʼɔ ghɔ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ a nwīʼiŋ vi.” 
Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋga njaʼo pa luʼɔ chrà pi pei, nji ŋa a ni nchrā nthɛ pi pugu. 
Ndɔ njiʼi nthɛ pi nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nthɔ ntāʼa nu ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi nɛ, pugu ni mbɔgɔ pa ŋgwa nthɛ ŋa ŋgwa pighɔ ni ndɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ ŋa a njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi. 
﻿Matio.
22.
Jishɔ pɨnɨ nchrā ni pugu ŋkamuʼɔŋ moŋ pa luʼɔ chrà, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Minthɛ pi māʼaŋ fɨʼɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Po pi ni yichəɨ fùoŋ ŋa a ni mbīri jɨ nɔ nnu tini muuŋ vi yi mimbia. 
Ntaoŋ puoŋ fàʼa pi ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ mɛ̄iŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi ni ŋgɛ̄ vugu nɔ nnu jɨ tini ghɔ nɛ, ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ ŋkhwā nɔ thɔ nu. 
“A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ntaoŋ pichəɨ puoŋ fàʼa, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Pəɨ chhu ni pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi gɛ̄ vugu nɛ ŋa ŋ̀kwo pīri maoŋ jɨ nɛ, ŋ̀kwo sho pa fua pugu pa naʼaŋ fuʼu, ti mbīri ŋguoŋ yaoŋ a kāʼo. Pəɨ thɔ lɨʼɨ jɨ tini ghɔ.’ 
Ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ ndīi a fhi nnu, nnɛ pugu ghə̄ɨ ni vugu, taʼa yi moŋ nyìeŋ yu, yichəɨ taʼa yi lɨʼɨ taŋ yi. 
Pɨgəɨ yi wɛ̄iŋ puoŋ fàʼa pi pighɔ, mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pugu, njwi vugu. 
“Túa fùoŋ ghɔ pɨgɨ, a fɛ gɨ́ ni pa shoogɛ pi pugu ghə̄ɨ njwi ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu ni njwi puoŋ fàʼa pi pighɔ nɛ ndɔ ntūoŋ laʼa muŋu mfɛ shhɛ. 
Nnɛ fùoŋ ghɔ chhu ni puoŋ fàʼa pi ŋa, ‘Maoŋ jɨ tini ghɔ kāʼo nɛ, ndɔ paʼa pa ŋgwa ŋa ŋki gɛ̄ nɛ lɔ ŋkāʼo ŋkwaŋ ŋgwa ŋa minthɛ pugu jɨ nɛ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ pa taʼandaoŋ fɨʼɨ ŋgwa ŋa pəɨ yəɨ fɔ nɛ, pəɨ gɛ̄ vugu ŋa pugu thɔ lɨʼɨ jɨ tini ghɔ.’ 
Nnɛ pa puoŋ fàʼa pighɔ ghə̄ɨ moŋ pa shɛndaoŋ, ŋkɨrɨ ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni njəɨ nɛ, ŋgwa shiʼi pugu pa pi pɨphɨ. Nnɛ nda jɨ tini ghɔ ni ndɨnaoŋ ni ŋgwa ŋa pi gɛ̄ vugu nɛ. 
“Ndɔ fùoŋ ghɔ gha nthɔ lɨʼɨ yəɨ pa ghaŋ gɛ̀ pighɔ, njəɨ yichəɨ ŋoŋ fɔ paʼa a lɔ mfāʼo ndhwí tini. 
A chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taannu a, ɔ kie pi nɛiŋ maa nii hɛiŋ ki lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo ndhwí tini?’ Ŋoŋ ghɔ pou chrà. 
Nnɛ fùoŋ ghɔ chhu ni pa ghaŋ fàʼa lɨʼɨ tini ghɔ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ krao kwò yi pugu pa mbhɔ mi māʼaŋ vi mbhi moŋ njiŋ. Moŋ lɨʼɨ ghɔ, kə̄ɨ pugu pa kru shua shi mbɔ fɔ.’ 
“Nthɛ ŋa pi gɛ̄ ntou ŋgwa, ndɔ ŋguʼɔ ntɛrɛ pi shɨgɛi yi.” 
Nnɛ pa ŋgwa Farashi nyiaŋ ntáŋ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a nthɛ pugu pīri Jishɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi ŋkuoŋ chrà yi nɛ. 
Nnɛ pugu taoŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pugu pugu pa ŋgwa fùoŋ Hɛrɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Masha, pigi ji ŋa ɔ ghà nchrā nnu shini, njɛʼi nnu ŋa Minnwi tāʼa nu nɛ moŋ nnu shini ki lɔ mbɔgɔ ligi shesheŋoŋ nthɛ ŋa ɔ shiʼa njiʼi ndīi pi ŋa ŋoŋ pɔ pi moŋ yəɨ ŋkwaŋ nthɨŋkwo. 
Ndwɛ shwei vigi, ɔ pīʼi jɔ ŋa? A kāʼo ŋa pi māʼaŋ taashi ni Kaisha ki ŋga?” 
Jishɔ kwo ji ntáŋ pɨphɨ ŋa pugu ni mfāʼo nɛ, nnɛ nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ tāʼa nu njwɛʼi a ŋa pa ŋgwa mifɨɨ pei? 
Pəɨ nōoŋ ndigi mbɨŋ ŋa pi ghà māʼaŋ taashi nɔ nɛ vəɨ.” Pugu thɔ ni ndigi mbɨŋ ghɔ mbɔ fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋoŋ ghà mfaʼa taʼa llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ. 
Jishɔ pie vugu ŋa, “Yei thɔ gɔ̌ pugu pa ligi gɔ̌ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ?” 
Pugu chhu ŋa, “A yi Kaisha.” A chhu ni pugu kiʼɛ ŋa, “Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ fɛ yaoŋ ŋa a yi Kaisha nɛ ni Kaisha, mfɛ yi Minnwi ni Minnwi.” 
Pugu ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, a ghrāo vugu, pugu lɔllɔ mieŋ vi ŋgə̄ɨ. 
Wuʼɔ llɛ́ ghɔ, pa ŋgwa Shadushi ŋa pugu ghà nchhu ŋa ŋoŋ ghà ŋkhu paʼa ndɔ nuʼuŋ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ thɔ njəɨ vi mbie vi ni taʼa pie ŋa, 
“Masha, Mushi ni nchhu ŋa, ‘Ŋoŋ ŋkhu ki lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo muuŋ, a yiʼi ŋa ndǐŋ vi lɔ̄gɔ ŋkugu yi ghɔ mbhi muuŋ nɔ ghɔ nɔ ligi ndǐŋ vi ŋa a khu nɛ.’ 
Ndwɛ khwachəɨ puoŋ pimbia pichəɨ ni mbɔ shɨna pigi mbɔ taʼa puŋ. Fǔoŋ yi ni ndaŋ ŋkhu ki lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo muuŋ, nnɛ mieŋ ŋgwɛ vi ndǐŋ vi lɔ̄gɔ. 
Mbra yi, pugu yichəɨ mbra yi wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nɛnnɛ ti ŋguoŋ vugu pi khwachəɨ nuʼuŋ mmɛ. 
A ni ŋga ndugwi, miŋgwɛ ghɔ khu ŋkaa yu. 
Ndwɛ, moŋ llɛmbhi ŋa ŋgwa lɛ mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu nɛ, miŋgwɛ ghɔ shi mbɔ pi ŋgwɛ gɔ̌ shɨna pugu pi khwachəɨ pei, nthɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ yugu ghao ni ndaŋ vi?” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāaŋ nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɔ nji Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nji njɨ Minnwi. 
A lɛ ŋga mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgwa ŋa pugu khu lɛ mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ, paʼa ŋgwa lɔ ndaŋ ki ŋgə̄ɨ láŋ. Ŋgwa lɛ mbɔ pi nɔ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi po. 
“Ndɔ nthɛ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu shi ndɛ ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu nɛ, pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ nnu ŋa Minnwi ni nchhu ni pəɨ nɛ: 
‘A mmu mbɔ Minnwi Abrahaŋ, mbɔ Minnwi Aiji, mbɔ Minnwi Jakɔ’? A lɔ njiʼi mbɔ pi Minnwi pa ŋgwa khu, a pɔ pi yi ŋgwa maoŋ.” 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ ni ŋga njaʼo yei nnu, ŋgrāo ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ. 
Ndɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋga njaʼo ŋa Jishɔ chri nchò pa ŋgwa Shadushi, ŋkɨrɨ noŋ yugu taʼa lɨʼɨ. 
Yichəɨ taʼa yi shɨna pugu ŋa a ni nji gɨ́ Mushi ŋgaʼa pie Jishɔ ni taʼa pie nɔ mōoŋ nu vi. 
“Masha, a yəɨ mbɔ mmɛ kɨ̀na ŋa a chaa ŋguoŋ yi moŋ gɨ́ nɛ?” 
A chhu ghɔ ŋa, “ ‘Khwā Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yɔ ni ŋguoŋ njùʼɔ yɔ ghao, ŋguoŋ nchə̌ɨ yɔ ghao, ni ŋguoŋ kwāʼa nu mɔ ghao.’ 
Yei mmɛ kɨ̀na ndɔ mbɔ fǔoŋ yi. 
Mbra yi pɔ nɔ yie ghɔ: ‘Khwā taakuo yɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ khwā noŋ yɔ nɛ.’ 
Ŋguoŋ gɨ́ Mushi ghao pugu pa yaoŋ ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi yɛʼi nɛ yɨʼə pi ŋkuoŋ paa kɨ̀na yei.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pa ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋkɨrɨ taʼa lɨʼɨ nɛ, Jishɔ pie vugu ni taʼa pie, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ pīʼi yəɨ ŋa nthɛ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ? A pɔ pi muuŋ gɔ̌?” Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Muuŋ Devi.” 
Jishɔ pie vugu kiʼɛ ŋa, “Ti a ki pɔ pi nɛiŋ kiʼɛ Devi moŋ njɨ Jijwɛ Minnwi mɛ̄iŋ vi ŋa ‘Taathɔ,’ nchhu nu ŋa, 
‘Taathɔ ni nchhu ni Taathɔ a ŋa, Chɔchɔ hɛiŋ ŋgei mbhɔ a yi jɨ ti ǹshi nuʼuŋ nchwīe pa mimbɨna pɔ pɔ laʼo kwò yɔ.’ ” 
“Ti nɔ haʼaŋ Devi mɛ̄iŋ vi ni ‘Taathɔ,’ ti a pɨnɨ ŋkie pi nɛiŋ mbɔ pi muuŋ vi?” 
Kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ shini ndɔ mfāʼo khwɛ̀ nɔ fɛ nu ghɔ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nuʼuŋ mbie vi ni kaŋ taʼa pie jɛ̄ llɛ́ ghɔ. 
﻿Matio.
23.
Nnɛ Jishɔ chhu ni kɨrɨ ghɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, 
“Pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi pɔ pi ŋgwa ŋa pi ji vugu nɔ ghaŋ tūgu gɨ́ Mushi. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ yaʼo nchò yugu ndɔ nchwīe ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa pugu shwei vəɨ nɔ ghɔ nɛ, ndɔ ki lɔ mbīni vugu. Nthɛ ŋa pugu ghà nchhu ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa pugu chhu nɛ. 
Pugu ghà ŋkrao pa lrì ŋa a ghaʼa nɔ tiɛŋ nu nɛ nūʼɔŋ mbəʼɨ ŋgwa, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋkhwā nɔ fɛ nu muuŋshɨmbhɔ yugu nɔ ghɛ̄rɛ nu ŋgwa pighɔ ni lrì ghɔ. 
“Pugu ghà mfāʼa ŋguoŋ yugu fàʼa pi ŋa ŋgwa yəɨ vugu, nthɛ ŋa yugu ŋgrào ŋa pugu ghà nāʼaŋ chrà Minnwi ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nchu nɔ pa yéi yugu pugu pa ŋgei mbhɔ yugu yi ŋkwrɛi nɛ ghaʼo ŋgaʼa ndɔ nchwīe pa yugu shɨ̌gəɨ ŋkuoŋ pa ndhwí pugu shɨga ŋgaʼa. 
Pugu khwā pa lə̌ɨ chɨɨchɨɨ lɨʼɨ jɨ pugu pa lə̌ɨ ŋgwa liɛŋ moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi, 
ndɔ ŋkhwā ŋa pi tuʼu noŋ nchrā ni pugu moŋ lɨʼɨ taŋ pugu pa ŋa ŋgwamishua mɛ̄iŋ vugu ŋa ‘Masha.’ 
“Ndɔ kiʼi pi mɛ̄iŋ vəɨ ŋa ‘Masha,’ nthɛ ŋa pəɨ fāʼo pi wuʼɔ taʼa Masha ndɔ ŋguoŋ vəɨ ghao pɔ pi pa lǐŋ. 
Kiʼi pəɨ mɛ̄iŋ shesheŋoŋ ŋkuoŋ shhɛ hɛiŋ ni tǎa vəɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ wuʼɔ fāʼo pi taʼa Tǎa, mbɔ ju ŋa a pɔ po nɛ. 
Kiʼi pi mɛ̄iŋ vəɨ ni ‘pa ghaŋ fɛ ntɨgɨ,’ nthɛ ŋa ŋgaŋ fɛ ntɨ́gɨ wuʼɔ taʼa yi, mbɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ. 
Ndɔ ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ shɨna pəɨ shi mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa vəɨ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a kə̄rə noŋ yi nɛ, pi shi nshwiʼi vi shhɛ, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shwiʼi noŋ yi nɛ, pi kə̄rə vi. 
“Ndɔ ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi. Pəɨ ŋgwa mifɨɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ fɨ̄nɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Po ni ŋgwa, ndɔ pəɨ nduthɔ yəɨ lɔ nii moŋ ghɔ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mieŋ ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu nii nu nɛ ŋa pugu nii. 
Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi, pa ŋgwa mifɨɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà nchīgi pa piŋgɛ kugu ŋkwe maoŋ pugu, ŋkuru nnu ŋa pəɨ chwīe nɛ ni pa ntaaŋntaaŋ luoŋ Minnwi lɨʼɨ kaʼa, nthɛ yie ghɔ, yəɨ sháʼa shi mbɔ yi wuwuru. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi pəɨ ŋgwa mifɨɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà nshāʼa ŋkhǐ pugu pa ndaoŋ ntou nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu kara ŋoŋ a younjiŋ nnu Minnwi yəɨ, ndɔ a gha njōu njiŋ yəɨ, pəɨ chwīe vi a pɨnɨ mbɨgɨ nchaa vəɨ paa lɨʼɨ nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma pa ghaŋ chriligi ŋa pəɨ thɔ nōoŋ ndaoŋ ni ŋgwa nɛ, ŋa pugu chhu ŋa, ‘Ŋ̈oŋ nshwrɛ̄i ligi Nda Minnwi, paʼa nnu lɔ mbɔ, ndɔ ti ŋ̈oŋ nshwrɛ̄i pi laoŋgo ŋa a pɔ moŋ Nda Minnwi nɛ, a yiʼi vi.’ 
Pa na ŋa ligi yugu yi chri! A ghaʼo yəɨ? Laoŋgo ki Nda Minnwi ŋa a chwīe laoŋgo ghɔ pɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ nɛ? 
Pəɨ ghà mbɨnɨ nchhu ŋa ŋ̈oŋ nshwrɛ̄i lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ paʼa nnu lɔ mbɔ, ndɔ ŋ̈oŋ nshwrɛ̄i yaoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ŋkuoŋ lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ, kaŋ a yiʼi vi. 
Pəɨ pa ghaŋ chriligi, a ghaʼo yəɨ nchaa yichəɨ, yaoŋ fɛ́, ki lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ŋa a ghà nchwīe yaoŋ fɛ ghɔ pɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shwrɛ̄i lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɛ, shwrɛ̄i lɨʼɨ ghɔ pugu sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a pɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
Nnɛ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shwrɛ̄i Nda Minnwi nɛ, shwrɛ̄i Nda ghɔ pugu Minnwi mbɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a pɔ Nda ghɔ nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shwrɛ̄i po nɛ, shwrɛ̄i faaŋ Minnwi pugu Minnwi mbɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a chhɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi. Pəɨ pa ŋgwa mifɨɨ. Nthɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà mfɛ shwéi pa mishwrɛi pugu pa pichəɨ pa puoŋ mi mbhɛ ŋa pi ghà niʼiŋ moŋ maoŋ jɨ, ndɔ ki lɔ mfāʼo ndɨɨ nɔ nūʼɔŋ nu pa mɛmmɛ ntɨ́gɨ moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ gɨ́ nɔ pa ndɨndɨ, ni kwoshɨnɨ pugu pa yaʼo nu nchò Minnwi, ndɔ yei pa nnu pɛ ŋa pəɨ kaŋ ni nchwīe ndɔ ki lɔ nchɨ̄ʼə pi ni. 
Ghaŋ chri ligi pei ŋa pugu nōoŋ ndaoŋ ni ŋgwa, pəɨ ghà nde minjinji mfuʼu moŋ làʼo yəɨ, ndɔ mmi minyieŋləɨ! 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi. Pəɨ ghaŋ mifɨɨ! Nthɛ ŋa pəɨ shɨ̄gao ŋkuoŋ ndua pugu pa kumbu ndɔ mooŋ yi lɨnaoŋ ni pɨ̀ga pugu pa pou wɛ̄iŋ nu noŋ. 
Pa ghaŋ chri ligi pei mbɔ pəɨ Farashi, pəɨ fǔoŋ nshɨ̄gao pa mooŋ ndua pugu pa mooŋ kumbu nnɛ ŋa minthɛ ŋkuoŋ yi gū yi taoŋtaoŋ ŋkaa yu. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi. Pəɨ pa ghaŋ mifɨɨ! Pəɨ pɔ nɔ fúŋ ŋa pi shini njùʼɔ ni yaoŋ fhu ŋa a pwa mbhi, ndɔ mooŋ yi lɨnaoŋ ni kwéi khu ŋgwa pugu pa ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ maoŋ tɔtrɔ. 
A haʼaŋ pi līi vəɨ mbhi pəɨ pɔ nɔ ŋgwa ndɨndɨ, ndɔ mooŋ njùʼɔ yəɨ lɨnaoŋ ni nnu mifɨɨ pugu pa ŋguoŋ ŋkwaŋ phɨ. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi. Pəɨ pa ghaŋ mifɨɨ, pəɨ krao fúŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, nchwīe fúŋ pa ŋgwa ndɨndɨ a pwa, 
nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Pigi kaŋ ni mbɔ mbhi pi ndɨɨ pa tǎa pigi, pigi shi kaŋ ndɔ nchɨ kwò pigi pugu nɔ jwi nu pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi.’ 
“Nnɛ pəɨ pa miŋkwentie ni noŋ pəɨ ŋa pəɨ pa puoŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njwi pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nɛ. 
Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nɛ shhɨ mīʼɛŋ nnu pɛ ŋa pa ŋkhu tǎa pəɨ ni njɛ̄. 
Pa mitwɛʼi, pa mbhɛ̌ mitwɛʼi mbɨmbhɨ pei, pəɨ shi ŋkie pi nɛiŋ maa ntei njɔ́ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ? 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹshi ntaoŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni pa ghaŋ shiethɔ ni pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi ni pəɨ. Pəɨ shi njwi pichəɨ, ŋkwīŋ pichəɨ ŋkuoŋ wáʼa, ŋgwie pichəɨ ni ŋgwàŋ moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi pəɨ, mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pichəɨ llɔ moŋ taʼa laʼataoŋ nii moŋ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ. 
Ǹshi ntaoŋ vugu nɛnnɛ, nji ŋa chhǐ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ndɨndɨ ŋa pi ni nshrāo vugu njwi ŋkuoŋ shhɛ, llɔ thɔ Abe ŋa mbhɔ yi ni mbɔ yi woo nɛ ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ thɔ jwi nu Shakaria, mbɔ muuŋ Bɛrɛkia, shɨna Nda Minnwi pugu lɨʼɨ Fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi. 
Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, ŋguoŋ nnu pei shi nshwiʼi mbɨŋ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei. 
“Yo, Jerushalɛiŋ, Jerushalɛiŋ! Laʼataoŋ ŋa a jwi pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, ntuŋ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi pɛ ŋa pi taoŋ vugu ghɔ nɛ ni ŋgùʼɔ. A fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ ŋa mi ni ntāʼa nu ŋkɨrɨ puoŋ pɔ taʼa lɨʼɨ nɔ haʼaŋ miŋguo ghà ŋkɨrɨ puoŋ pi laʼo prǎ yi nɛ, ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ ntāʼa nu! 
Līi njəɨ, nda yəɨ kuʼɔ fùŋ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, jɛ̄ ndwɛ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ, mbaʼa pəɨ nuʼuŋ njəɨ a, ti nuʼuŋ nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ shi nchhu ŋa, ‘Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni ju yɛ ŋa a thɔ nɔ ligi Taathɔ nɛ!’ ” 
﻿Matio.
24.
Jishɔ ni ntaoŋ Nda Minnwi ŋgə̄ɨ nu, ndɨɨ ghɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi nthɔ nōoŋ pa nda ghɔ moŋ Nda Minnwi. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ yəɨ ŋguoŋ maoŋ pei hɛiŋ ghao? Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa taʼa ŋgùʼɔ hɛiŋ yiʼi ŋkɨna ŋkuoŋ ndǐŋ vi ki pi lɔ mbūo mfɛ shhɛ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchɔchhɔ ŋkuoŋ Mbra pa Thɨ Olive nɛ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njiŋnjiŋ njəɨ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Shwei vigi, pa nnu pei shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ pi ndɨɨ khɔ? Lì thɔ nu yɔ pugu pa yi ndugwi mbhi yei shi mbɔ pi khɔ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɨna nu kiʼi ŋoŋ fɨ̄ɨ vəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ntou ŋgwa shi nthɔ nɔ ligi a, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Mbɔ pi Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ,’ mfɨ̄ɨ ntou ŋgwa. 
Pəɨ shi njaʼo pa nchhɔ̀ pugu pa pishaʼakhɔ nnu nchhɔ̀. Ndɔ kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu nthɛ ŋa pa nnu pighɔ shi ŋguʼɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ, ndɔ yinɛ lɔ naa mbɔ ndugwi yi. 
Pa laʼataoŋ shi ndɔllɔ māʼaŋ yichəɨ ni nchhɔ̀, ŋgwa taʼa fùoŋ māʼaŋ ŋgwa yichəɨ ni nchhɔ̀. Njì shi ŋgū moŋ pa lɨʼɨlɨʼɨ, shhɛ shi nchɨʼɨ ti shɨna moŋ pa lɨʼɨlɨʼɨ. 
Ŋguoŋ nnu pei pɔ pi nɔ haʼaŋ muuŋ ghà njɛ̄ naoŋ nu miŋgwɛ shūu nɛ. 
“Nnɛ pi shi nchaʼa vəɨ mfɛ ŋa pi fɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pəɨ ndɔ njwi vəɨ. Ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ shi mbɨ̄na vəɨ nthɛ a. 
Ntou ŋgwa shi ŋgū moŋ piŋ yugu, mfīni noŋ pugu, mbɨ̄na noŋ pugu. 
Ntou pa njəɨlɨʼɨ mifɨɨ shi nthɔ mfɨ̄ɨ ntou ŋgwa. 
Nthɛ ŋa phɨ shi mbīgi nɛ, khwǎ ŋa ntou ŋgwa fāʼo nɛ shi ŋkɛrɛ. 
Ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a tīi shii ti nchəɨŋ nɔ ndugwi yi nɛ shi ndūgu. 
Ndɔ pi shi nchīi pwa pishaʼakhɔ yei ŋa Minnwi shaʼa fùoŋ yi moŋ ŋguoŋ mbhi yei nnɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ghao yaʼo, ndugwi yi thɔ kiʼɛ. 
“Nnɛ ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ shi njəɨ nnu wuwuru yɛ ŋa a fuo Nda Minnwi nchwīe pi tei nɛ, a thi Lɨʼɨ Taoŋtaoŋ, mbɔ nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Dania ni nchhu nɛ, (shesheŋoŋ ŋa a mɛ̄iŋ yaoŋ yei nɛ pīʼi, nji ŋa a shi nji njiŋ nnu yei), 
nnɛ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ moŋ Judia nɛ tei ŋkuʼɔ thɔ pa mbra. 
Kiʼi ŋoŋ ŋa a chhɔ thɔnda nɛ nuʼuŋ nshwiʼi shhɛ lɨʼɨ lɔ̄gɔ yaoŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ nda nɛ, 
kiʼi shesheŋoŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ nyìeŋ nɛ nuʼuŋ mbɨnɨ laʼa lɨʼɨ lɔ̄gɔ mmɛ ndhwí yi. 
Ndɔ a shi mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ wuwuru ŋgəʼɨ ni pa piŋgɛ shūu pugu pa mapuoŋ haʼaŋ pugu thɔ nuʼɔŋ puoŋ nɛ moŋ llɛ́ pighɔ! 
Pəɨ luoŋ ni Minnwi ŋa kiʼi nnu pei lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ pi moŋ laoŋ ki llɛ́ ji. 
Nthɛ ŋa moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ghɔ, ŋgəʼɨ shi mbɔ ti nchəɨŋ fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a lɔ naa ma mbɔ, jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ŋa Minnwi ni mbuoŋ mbhi nɛ ti nthɔ nchəɨŋ ndwɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mbiʼi piʼi ma nuʼuŋ mbɔ. 
Ti pi kaŋ ni mieŋ ki kɛrɛ fɨʼɨ llɛ́ pighɔ paʼa kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ lɔ ndūgu. Ndɔ nthɛ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa Minnwi ni nchuʼɔ vugu nɛ, Minnwi shi ŋkɛrɛ fɨʼɨ llɛ́ pighɔ. 
“Nɛnnɛ s̈hesheŋoŋ nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ pɔ nɛiŋ,’ ki ŋa, ‘A pɔ ni hiŋ!’ Kiʼi pəɨ piŋ, 
nthɛ ŋa pa mifɨɨ ŋa pugu chhu nu ŋa pi chuʼɔ vugu ntaoŋ nɔ ŋkwe nɛ, pugu pa njəɨlɨʼɨ mifɨɨ shi nōoŋ noŋ yugu, nōoŋ ntou pa mɛmmɛ lì pugu pa nnu ghraoghrao nɔ fɨ̄ɨ nu pa ŋgwa ti mfɨ̄ɨ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ Minnwi chuʼɔ nɛ nɔ haʼaŋ a kaŋ njiʼɛ. 
Pəɨ līi njəɨ, ŋ̀kwo shwei vəɨ ŋkaoŋ ndɨɨ maa ŋkāʼo. 
“Nɛnnɛ, p̈ugu nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, a pɔ nɛ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó!’ Kiʼi pəɨ ghə̄ɨ fɔ. Ti p̈ugu nchhu ŋa ‘Līi njəɨ, a pɔ nɛ hɛiŋ moŋ njiɛŋ nda,’ kiʼi pəɨ piŋ. 
Nthɛ ŋa wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ fiembɨ ghà nshei llɔ ŋgei shaʼa minaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nii ŋgei nii minaoŋ nɛ, a haʼaŋ thɔ nu Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɔ nɛ. 
Sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa khu miyaoŋ pɔ nɛ, pa mishi ŋa pugu ghà ŋkru khu miyaoŋ nɛ shi ŋkɨrɨ fɔ. 
“Pa ŋgəʼɨ pei shi ŋga ntɔgɔ, wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, minaoŋ shi ŋgū njiŋ, paʼa fhú lɔ nuʼuŋ mfɛ líʼɛ, pa fɨ́nəɨ gū llɔ po, Minnwi chɨ̄ʼɨ pa njɨ moŋ tɔthɨ. 
“Lì Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nōoŋ noŋ yi po, nnɛ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ŋkuoŋ shhɛ shi njūa, njəɨ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua a thɔ nu moŋ lúluŋ po ni ghrɨ́ pugu pa mmɛ ndighaʼo. 
Pi shi ntua ntàŋ ŋggì ya ŋkuʼɔ, a taoŋ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi pugu kɨrɨ pa ŋgwa pi ŋa a chuʼɔ nɛ moŋ ŋguoŋ mbhi moŋ khwɛ ghaa mbhi, llɔ moŋ taʼa ŋgei po ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ yichəɨ. 
“Yɛʼi ntɨ́gɨ llɔ ŋkuoŋ thɨ wùnu: Nɔ haʼaŋ fhɔ̌ yi nuʼuŋ njɛ̄ tua nu ŋkuoŋ mbhɔ yi nɛ, ɔ ji ŋa ŋkwəɨ mbɨ̀ para. 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ yəɨ ŋguoŋ nnu pei nɛ, pəɨ ji ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua kwo para ti mbɔ chonda. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei yiʼi ŋkhu mmɛ ki ŋguoŋ nnu pei lɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. 
Po pugu shhɛ shi ntɔgɔ gha, ndɔ mbaʼa pa chrà paŋ yiʼi ntɔgɔ gha. 
“Ndɔ nɔ llɛ́ ghɔ pugu pa ndɨɨ ghɔ, ŋoŋ lɔ nji, njiʼi nthɛ pi ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi po, ki nduthɔ Muuŋ ni noŋ yi. A wuʼɔ nji Tǎa təʼɨ vi. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni mbɔ moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ Noa nɛ, a haʼaŋ thɔ nu Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɔ nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋkhǐ shini ndɔ naa ŋkuʼɔ mfīgi mbhi nɛ, ŋgwa ni njɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu nu, ndaŋ nu ndɔ mfɛ ŋgwa nda láŋ, ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa Noa ni nii moŋ mmɛ pie ŋa a pɔ nɔ nda nɛ. 
Pugu shini ndɔ nji ti ŋkhǐ nuʼuŋ ŋkuʼɔ mfīgi njɨ̄gɨ vugu ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ghɔ. A haʼaŋ thɔ nu Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɔ nɛ. 
“Paa ŋgwa shi mbɔ moŋ nyìeŋ, pi lɔ̄gɔ taʼa yi, taʼa yi kɨna. 
Paa piŋgɛ shi nthɔ ŋguʼɔ maoŋ, pi lɔ̄gɔ taʼa yi, taʼa yi kɨna. 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ chhɔ ni lɨna məɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɔ njiʼi nji llɛ́ yɛ ŋa Taathɔ vəɨ thɔ nu nɛ. 
Ndɔ p̂əɨ ji yei nnu ŋa, ŋ̈gaŋ nda kaŋ nji ndɨɨ yɛ ŋa ŋgɨna thɔ nu ni tuʼu nɛ, a kaŋ nchhɔ ni lɨna mi, ndɨna nu ni nda yi ŋa kiʼi pi pəʼɨ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ pīri noŋ yəɨ, nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua thɔ nu moŋ ndɨɨ ŋa mbaʼa pəɨ yiʼi mbīʼi nɛ. 
“A gɔ̌ kiʼɛ mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa taʼanjuʼɔ, mfāʼo shiethɔ ŋa masha vi nūʼɔŋ vi ŋa a lɨna nu ni pichəɨ puoŋ fàʼa moŋ mbaanda yi, mfɛ maoŋ jɨ moŋ ndɨɨ kaʼokaʼo. 
Mbɔrɔ shi mbɔ ni muuŋ fàʼa yɛ ŋa masha vi yəɨ vi a fāʼa nu shiʼi ndɨɨ ŋa a thɔ nɛ. 
Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, a shi nūʼɔŋ vi a lɨna nu ni ŋguoŋ maoŋ pi. 
Ndɔ ti ä mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa mbɨmbhɨ, kaŋ a shi nchhu ni noŋ yi ŋa, ‘Mbaʼa masha a yiʼa ŋkwəɨ,’ 
njɛ̄ wie nu pichəɨ puoŋ fàʼa, njɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu nu pugu pa mbaa làʼo. 
Taathɔ muuŋ fàʼa yei shi ŋkwəɨ moŋ llɛ́ yɛ ŋa muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ shini ndɔ mbīʼi nɛ, pugu pa ndɨɨ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi nji nɛ 
nchrɛi vi kaoŋkaoŋ, mīʼaŋ vi lɨʼɨ ŋa pa ŋgwa mifɨɨ shi ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ. Nɔ lɨʼɨ ghɔ kə̄ɨ pugu pa kru shua shi mbɔ fɔ.” 
﻿Matio.
25.
“Nnɛ Shaʼafuoŋ Po shi mbɔ nɔ wuŋ puoŋ piŋgɛ ŋa pugu lɔ naa nji mimbia, ŋa pugu ni ndɔ̄gɔ pa laŋ pugu ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ para mimbia láŋ. 
Yi tiɛŋ ni mbɔ pa na, yi tiɛŋ pɔ pa ndɨna. 
Pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ pa na nɛ ni ŋga ndɔ̄gɔ laŋ yugu paʼa ndɔ ntuo yichəɨ krashi, 
ndɔ pɛ ŋa pugu ni ndɨna nɛ lɔ̄gɔ tuʼɔ krashi yugu pugu pa laŋ yugu. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ ni nthɔ njiyiri nɛ, lɔ̄gɔ wɛ̄iŋ vugu pugu llɛ. 
“Ndɔ a gha mbɔ moŋ ntuŋ mbhi pi paʼo ŋgòu ŋa, ‘Mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ pɔ nɛiŋ! Pəɨ taoŋ nthɔ mbara vi.’ 
“Wuŋ puoŋ piŋgɛ pighɔ lɔllɔ mbīri laŋ yugu. 
Pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ pa na nɛ chhu ni pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ pa ndɨna nɛ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ fɛ yichəɨ krashi yəɨ ni pigi nthɛ ŋa laŋ yigi thɔ mbɛphɛ.’ 
“Ndɔ pa pi shiethɔ pighɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Ŋa minthɛ paʼa yɛ ŋa pigi fāʼo nɛ lɔ ŋkāʼo ni pia nɛ, pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ nda taŋ njuoŋ yəɨ fɔ.’ 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa pugu ni ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ yuoŋ nɛ, mimbia láŋ ghɔ thɔ, pɛ tiɛŋ piŋgɛ ŋa pugu ni mbīri noŋ yugu mbɔ fɔ nɛ ghə̄ɨ pugu pa mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ lɨʼɨ jɨ láŋ, pi fɨ̄nɨ nda. 
A gha ndara pichəɨ nchǔʼɔ mbɨnɨ pighɔ thɔ ŋkaa pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, taathɔ, chuʼɔ nda ni pigi.’ 
“Ndɔ a khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, ǹdɔ njiʼi nji vəɨ.’ ” 
Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ chhɔ ni lɨna məɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɔ nji llɛ́ ki ndɨɨ. 
“Ndɨɨ ghɔ, Shaʼafuoŋ Po shi ma mbɔ pi nɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu ŋgə̄ɨ kra, nnɛ mɛ̄iŋ pa puoŋ fàʼa mfɛ maoŋ pi ni pugu ŋa pugu tiʼi nchhɔ ndɨna nu nɔ ghɔ. 
A ni mfɛ tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ ni taʼa yi. Taʼa pìɛŋ pɔ fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋ̈oŋ mfaʼa nɔ paa wuŋ ŋgaʼombhi, pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ, ni vichəɨ, a fɛ paa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ, ni vichəɨ a fɛ taʼa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ. A ni mfɛ mbɨŋ ni shesheŋoŋ vugu nɔ fɨʼɨ njɨ yi ndɔllɔ kiʼɛ ŋgə̄ɨ kra yi. 
“Chomilaoŋ ghɔ, yɛ ŋoŋ ŋa a ni ŋkwe tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ nɛ ghə̄ɨ ni ji mbɨŋ mbiʼɛ taŋ nɔ ghɔ nshei tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ mbīgi. 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, yɛ ŋoŋ ŋa ji mbɨŋ ni mbɔ paa pìɛŋ nɛ shei paa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ mbīgi. 
Ndɔ yɛ ŋoŋ ŋa ji mbɨŋ ni mbɔ taʼa pìɛŋ nɛ ghə̄ɨ ntou tiɛŋ ndə̄ɨŋ mbɨŋ taathɔ yi moŋ ghɔ. 
“A ni ŋga ndaʼa nɔ ntaaŋ ndɨɨ, taathɔ pa puoŋ fàʼa pighɔ pɨnɨ, pugu pugu pīʼi ŋkrù yi. 
Yɛ ŋoŋ ŋa a ni mfɛ tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ thɔ njəɨ taathɔ vi ni tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ nduoŋ mbīgi, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, ɔ ni mfɛ tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ vəɨ. Njəɨ, m̀bɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nshei tiɛŋ pìɛŋ mbīgi.’ 
“Taathɔ vi chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ɔ ya mfāʼa, ma muuŋ fàʼa shishiʼi ndɔ mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa taʼanjuʼɔ. Ɔ tɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou ni shɨgɛi yaoŋ, ǹshi mfɛ ntou yi vɛ ɔ lɨna nɔ ghɔ, thɔ pɔgɔ fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ kaʼa!’ 
“Vɛ ŋkaa yu ŋa pi ni mfɛ paa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ thɔ nchhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, ɔ ni mfɛ paa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ vəɨ. M̀bɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nshei paa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ mbīgi.’ 
“Taathɔ yi chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ɔ ya mfāʼa, ma muuŋ fàʼa shishiʼi ndɔ mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa taʼanjuʼɔ. Ɔ tɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou ni shɨgɛi yaoŋ, shi mfɛ ntou yi vɛ ɔ lɨna nɔ ghɔ, thɔ pɔgɔ fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ kaʼa.’ 
“Yɛ ŋkaa yu ŋa pi ni mfɛ taʼa pìɛŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ thɔ nchhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, ǹji ghɔ ŋa ɔ ŋoŋ tɨtɨnɨ, ŋkwōo nu lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ɔ shini ndɔ njiʼi mbhi, ŋkɨrɨ nu lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ɔ shini ndɔ njiʼi māʼaŋ kaŋ taʼa mbhɛ̌. 
Ŋki mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu ŋgə̄ɨ ndə̄ɨŋ mbɨŋ yɔ moŋ shhɛ. Njəɨ, yaoŋ yɔ pɔ nɛiŋ.’ 
“Ndɔ taathɔ yi khwɛ̄ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Muuŋ fàʼa mbɨmbhɨ, muuŋ fàʼa lɨʼəlɨʼə, ɔ ni nji ŋa ŋga ŋkwōo lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ǹshini ndɔ njiʼi mbhi nɛ, ŋkɨrɨ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ǹshini ndɔ njiʼi māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌ nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ, ɔ ni mfāʼo nɔ niʼiŋ nu mbɨŋ a moŋ bəɨŋ, ŋ̀ga mbɨnɨ ŋ̀kwe mbɨŋ a pugu pa thɔ yi. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ kwe mbɨŋ ghɔ mbhɔ yu mfɛ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a ni mfāʼo wuŋ pìɛŋ mbɨŋ nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a kwo fāʼo nɛ, pi shi mbīgi ntou yi ghɔ nji ŋa a shi mfāʼo a ya njiɛŋ ti ŋgaʼa, ndɔ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo nɛ, njiʼi nthɛ pi shɨgɛi yɛ ŋa a pɔ mbhɔ yu nɛ, pi shi ŋkwe. 
Pəɨ māʼaŋ muuŋ fàʼa ghagha yinɛ mbhi moŋ njiŋnjiŋ, moŋ lɨʼɨ ghɔ, kə̄ɨ pugu pa kru shua shi mbɔ fɔ.’ 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nthɔ moŋ ndighaʼo yi, pugu pa ŋguoŋ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi po, kaŋ a shi nchhɔ kiʼɛ ŋkuoŋ faaŋ ndighaʼo yi. 
Ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ghao shi ŋkɨrɨ shhɨ yu, a shɛrɛ vugu pugu taoŋ lɨʼɨ yi paa, wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋkɛ̄ʼi pa minjɨɨ ghà shɛrɛ pa minjɨɨ mfuʼu shɨna pa mimbhi nɛ. 
A shi nūʼɔŋ pa minjɨɨ ŋgei mbhɔ yi yi jɨ, pa mimbhi pɔ yugu ŋgei mbhɔ ŋkwrɛi. 
“Nnɛ fùoŋ ghɔ shi nchhu ni pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɔ ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ nɛ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ ŋa mbɔrɔ Tǎa a pɔ mbɨŋ pəɨ nɛ thɔ, pəɨ shi nshei Shaʼafuoŋ ŋa pi ni mbīri ni pəɨ moŋ njɛ̄ mbhi nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa njì ni njia a, pəɨ fɛ maoŋ jɨ vəɨ, njùʼɔ a yaoŋ pəɨ fɛ yaoŋ nnu vəɨ, ŋki pɔ ŋgɨ̀nɨ, pəɨ chuʼɔ chonda vəɨ. 
Ŋki pɔ ntii, pəɨ gwɛ ndhwí mbɨŋ mu, ŋki ghɨ̌nɔ nu, pəɨ kra a, ŋki pɔ moŋ chə́ɨŋ, pəɨ thɔ njəɨ a.’ 
“Pa ŋgwa ndɨndɨ shi khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, pigi ni njəɨ ghɔ pi yəɨ ndɨɨ nji yia ghɔ pigi fɛ maoŋ jɨ vɛ, ki njùʼɔ yɔ yaoŋ pigi fɛ yaoŋ nnu vɛ? 
Ndɔ pigi ni njəɨ ghɔ pi yəɨ ndɨɨ ɔ pɔ ŋgɨ̀nɨ pigi chuʼɔ nda yigi ŋa ɔ nii fɔ, ki ɔ pɔ ntii pigi māʼaŋ ndhwí mbɨŋ ghɔ? 
Pigi ni njəɨ ghɔ pi yəɨ ndɨɨ ɔ ghɨ̌nɔ nu ki mbɔ moŋ chə́ɨŋ pigi thɔ ŋkra ghɔ?’ 
“Fùoŋ ghɔ shi ŋkwe nchhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ ni nchwīe nnɛ ni taʼa miŋkwasha shɨna pa lǐŋ paŋ pei nɛ, pəɨ ni nchwīe pi vəɨ!’ 
“Nnɛ a shi nchhu ni pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ ŋgei mbhɔ yi yi ŋkwrɛi nɛ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ lɔllɔ yəɨ mu, pəɨ ŋa nchɔ̀nɔ Minnwi pɔ mbɨŋ pəɨ nɛ, ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ móŋoŋ ki ndugwi yi ŋa pi ni mbīri ni Devɨ pugu pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa njì ni njia a paʼa pəɨ lɔ mfɛ maoŋ jɨ vəɨ, njùʼɔ a ni njaoŋ paʼa pəɨ lɔ mfɛ yaoŋ vəɨ ŋa ǹnu, 
ŋki pɔ ŋgɨ̀nɨ paʼa pəɨ lɔ nchuʼɔ chonda yəɨ vəɨ ŋa ǹii fɔ, ŋki pɔ ntii paʼa pəɨ lɔ māʼaŋ ndhwí mbɨŋ mu, ŋgɨ̄nɔ ndɔ mbɨnɨ mbɔ moŋ chə́ɨŋ paʼa pəɨ lɔ njiʼi ŋkra a.’ 
“Pugu ŋkaa pugu shi ŋkhwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, pigi ni njəɨ ghɔ pi ndɨɨ khɔ nji yia ghɔ, ki njùʼɔ yɔ yaoŋ, ki ɔ pɔ ŋgɨ̀nɨ, ki ɔ pɔ ntii, ki ŋgɨ̄nɔ nu ki mbɔ moŋ chə́ɨŋ ki pigi lɔ ŋgɛ̄rɛ ghɔ?’ 
“Nnɛ a shi ŋkhwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, ‘Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ shini ndɔ nchwīe nɛnnɛ ni miŋkwasha shɨna ŋgwa pei nɛ, pəɨ shini ndɔ njiʼi nchwīe vəɨ.’ 
“Nnɛ pi shi mfɛ pei moŋ ŋgəʼɨ ki mmɛ ndɔ pa ŋgwa ndɨndɨ, pi fɛ vugu moŋ chɔmbhi ki mmɛ.” 
﻿Matio.
26.
Jishɔ ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ yɛʼi nu ŋguoŋ pa nnu pei, nchhu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, 
“Pəɨ ji ŋa paa llɛ́ shi ŋga ntɔgɔ, a pɔ Jɨ *Lli Njiʼa, ndɔ pi shi nchaʼa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua mfɛ ŋa pi kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa.” 
Nnɛ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa thishɨ pa ŋgwa Juu paoŋ ntuʼɔ Kaifa, mbɔ *taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ, 
ntáŋ nɔ wɛ̄iŋ nu Jishɔ njiŋnjiŋ ki ŋgwa lɔ nji ndɔ njwi vi. 
Ndɔ pugu ni nchhu nu ŋa, “Kiʼi a pɔ pi ndɨɨ Jɨ Lli Njiʼa, kiɛŋ nnɛ kaŋ ŋgwa shi nsha mighei.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mbɔ Betani nda Shemu mbɔ ŋgaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ, 
nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni njɨ maoŋ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi fɔ nɛ, miŋgwɛ chəɨ thɔ njəɨ vi ni yichəɨ nchɨ́ŋ ŋa pi chwīe ni ŋgùʼɔ, laminda tɨnɨnchuoŋ lɨnaoŋ moŋ ghɔ, a shāʼo thɔ Jishɔ nɔ pɔrɔ nu vi nɔ ghɔ. 
Ndɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni mbɨgɨ túa ndɨɨ ŋa pugu ni njəɨ nnu yei nɛ, nnɛ nchhu ŋa, “Láʼo yei phɛ pɔ pi ŋa? 
Nthɛ ŋa a ka ni mfɛ pi fīni laminda yei ni ŋkiɛŋ ntou mbɨŋ ŋgɛ̄rɛ pa ghaŋ pou nɔ ghɔ.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ ji nnu ŋa pugu chhu nu nɛ, nnɛ, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghana miŋgwɛ vi nɛ ŋa? A chwīe pi nnu shiʼi vəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà ŋguʼɔ mfāʼo pa ghaŋ pou ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ, ndɔ mbaʼa pəɨ yiʼi mfāʼo a ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ. 
A shāʼo laminda yei mbɨŋ mu nɔ pīri nu noŋ a nɔ twei nu. 
Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa pi shi nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ yei moŋ ŋguoŋ mbhi nɛ, nnu ŋa miŋgwɛ vei chwīe nɛ, pi shi nchhu nɔ kwiŋ nu vi.” 
Taʼa ŋoŋ shɨna paanchrɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ mbɔ Judashi Ishikario ghə̄ɨ njəɨ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ, 
nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ shi mfɛ pi khɔ vəɨ nɔ haʼaŋ mi mfīni vi ni pəɨ?” Nnɛ pugu pe vi ni trɛi wuŋ ndigi mbɨŋ. 
Llɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ a taʼa shɨna nɔ fīni nu vi. 
A ni mbɔ fǔoŋ llɛ́ jɨ Jɨ Brɛi Ki Kuʼɔ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ thɔ njəɨ vi, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa pigi pīri maoŋ jɨ Lli Njiʼa vɛ pi hɨŋ?” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ nii moŋ laʼa, nchhu ni ŋoŋ chəɨ ŋa pəɨ shi njəɨ vi nɛ ŋa, ‘Masha chhu ŋa ndɨɨ a kwo para, ǹshi njɨ Lli Njiʼa nda ghɔ pigi pa ghaŋ younjiŋ paŋ.’ ” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chwīe wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchhu ni pugu nɛ, mbīri maoŋ jɨ Lli Njiʼa ghɔ. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni fanaoŋ, a chɔchɔ yəɨ taprɛi nthɔ njɨ maoŋ pugu pa paanchrɔ ghɔ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni njɨ nu nɛ, Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, taʼa ŋoŋ shɨna pəɨ shi mfīni a.” 
Nnu ghɔ wīni vugu ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi, pugu jɛ̄ nchhu nu ghɔ pa taʼa yi taʼa yi ŋa, “Taathɔ, ŋa a lɔ mbɔ mmu?” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa mbhɔ yigi yu shi mbāoŋ moŋ pɛiŋ nɛ, a ju ŋa a shi mfīni a nɛ. 
Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi ŋguʼɔ ŋgə̄ɨ pi nɔ haʼaŋ pi nāʼaŋ nthɛ vi nɛ, ndɔ ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a fīni vi nɛ. A ni mbwa ghɔ ŋa kiʼi pi phi vi.” 
Judashi, ŋa a ni mfīni vi nɛ, chhu ŋa, “Masha, ŋa a lɔ mbɔ mmu?” Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “A chhu gɔ̀ ni noŋ yɔ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nchhɔ njɨ nu nɛ, Jishɔ lɔ̄gɔ brɛi, ŋga ŋkwo tōo Minnwi, mbəʼɨ mfɛ ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ kwe ŋkru, yei frɛinoŋ a.” 
A lɔ̄gɔ ndua, ŋga ŋkwo tōo Minnwi mfɛ ni pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋguoŋ yəɨ ghao nnu. 
Nthɛ ŋa làʼo yei chhǐ a ŋa a krao *kɨ̀na yɛ ŋa Minnwi wrā pugu pɔ ŋgwa pi nɛ, ŋa a ni ŋkwrī nthɛ ntou ŋgwa nɔ līʼɛ nu pa phɨ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa m̀baʼa nuʼuŋ nnu làʼo yei pia, ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa ǹshi mbɨnɨ nnu pia kaʼa fifhi moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Tǎa a nɛ.” 
Pugu gha njrāo taʼa ŋkhǐ ntaoŋ kəʼɨ ghɔ ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ Mbra pa Thɨ Olive. 
Nnɛ Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ni tuʼu yei, pəɨ shi ntei mieŋ a nthɛ ŋa pi nāʼaŋ ŋa, ‘Ǹshi njwi ŋkɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ, pa minjɨɨ sha.’ 
Ndɔ pi shi ŋga ŋkwo kuʼɔ ni mmu moŋ gu, ŋ̀gə̄ɨ shhɨ pəɨ Galili.” 
Ndɔ Pita chhu ŋa, “Njiʼi nthɛ pi nɔ haʼaŋ pi shi ntei njiŋ yɔ ghao nɛ, m̀baʼa njiʼi ntei.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Shishini ǹshwei ghɔ ŋa ni tuʼu yei ŋkaoŋ miŋkəʼɨ maa ŋkhwɛ, ɔ shi ŋkwo lāa a ni trɛi ŋgɛ.” 
Pita chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ä njiʼi mbɔ pi ŋa pɔgɔ khu kaʼa, paʼa ǹdɔ ndāa ghɔ.” Ŋguoŋ pichəɨ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi wuʼɔ nchhu pi nnɛ. 
Jishɔ lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ pugu pugu lɨʼɨ chəɨ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Geshemani, nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pəɨ chɔchɔ hɛiŋ ŋgə̄ɨ hiŋ nduoŋ Minnwi.” 
A lɔ̄gɔ Pita pugu pa paa puoŋ Shebedi, njɛ̄ nthɔ mfāʼo yuʼɔ njùʼɔ. 
Nnɛ, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Njùʼɔ a ya mbəʼɨ ti minthɛ ŋka kukhu, pəɨ kɨna hɛiŋ pia yra nu kaʼa.” 
A chənə ŋgə̄ɨ shɨgɛi yi shhɨ, mfūŋ thɔ yi shhɛ nduoŋ Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Tǎa a, ä njiʼɛ, ɔ pəɨ ndua ŋgəʼɨ yei vəɨ, ndɔ kiʼi a pɔ pi nɔ haʼaŋ ǹtāʼa nu nɛ, a pɔ pi nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ tāʼa nu nɛ.” 
A gha nthɔ, njəɨ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pugu thɔ ndɛllɛ. A chhu ni Pita ŋa, “Nnɛ minthɛ paʼa pəɨ lɔ nchhɔ tɔthɨ pia kaʼa nɔ taʼa awa? 
Pəɨ chhɔ tɔthɨ nduoŋ Minnwi nnɛ ŋa kiʼi pəɨ gū moŋ mōoŋ nu. Jijwɛ yəɨ khwā nu, ndɔ frɛinoŋ yəɨ pou ghrɨ́.” 
Nɔ mbra ŋgɛ, a pɨnɨ ŋgə̄ɨ nduoŋ Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Tǎa a, ä mbɔ ŋa minthɛ paʼa ndua ŋgəʼɨ yei lɔ tɔgɔ ki ǹdɔ njiʼi nnu, a pɔ nɛ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ tāʼa nu nɛ.” 
Jishɔ pɨ̄nɨ ŋkamuʼɔŋ njəɨ vugu pugu llɛ nu, nthɛ ŋa lɔ̄gɔ ni ndɨnaoŋ ligi pugu. 
A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ mieŋ vugu ŋgə̄ɨ nduoŋ Minnwi, a pɔ trɛi ŋgɛ, ŋguʼɔ nchhu pi taʼa nnu ghɔ ŋa a ni ŋkwo fǔoŋ nchhu nɛ. 
Nnɛ a thɔ njəɨ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ wuʼɔ nchhɔ ndhɛ nu mfɛrɛ noŋ yəɨ? Njəɨ, ndɨɨ kāʼo nɛ, pi fīni Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua nɛ ni pa ghaŋ phɨ. 
Pəɨ lɔllɔ pia ghə̄ɨ. Pəɨ līi njəɨ, ŋoŋ ŋa a fīni a nɛ pɔ nɛiŋ!” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ŋguʼɔ nchrā nu, Judashi, mbɔ taʼa ŋoŋ shɨna paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chəɨŋ pugu pa ntou yú ŋgwa, pugu tuo pa kafa pugu pa wrɛ́i, llɔ mbhɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa pichəɨ pa thishɨ pa ŋgwa moŋ laʼa. 
Ŋoŋ ŋa a ni mfīni vi nɛ ni ŋkwo fɛ lì ni pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa nshi mbaŋ vi nɛ, ju, pəɨ wɛ̄iŋ vi.” 
Judashi kuʼɔ nthɔ mbara Jishɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹchrā vɛ, ma Masha,” mbaŋ vi nɔ chrā nu ghɔ. 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taannu a, chwīe yaoŋ ŋa ɔ ni nthɔ nɔ chwīe nu nɛ.” Nnɛ ŋgwa pighɔ thɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ nshūu vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, yichəɨ taʼa ŋoŋ ŋa pugu pa Jishɔ ni mbɔ nu nɛ shua kafa ŋkəʼɨ muuŋ fàʼa taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɔ ghɔ njaʼa tə́nə yi. 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pɨnɨ niʼiŋ kafa yɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa ɔ fuʼu nɛ. Ghaŋ wie ŋkrɔ̀ ndɔ njwi ŋgwa ni kafa ghà ŋguʼɔ ŋkhu ntɔgɔ pi ŋkuoŋ kafa. 
Ki ɔ pīʼi ŋa minthɛ paʼa ndɔ ǹjūa ni Tǎa a ŋa a ghɛ̄rɛ a, a wuʼɔ ntaoŋ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ po ŋa pugu ghà māʼaŋ nchhɔ̀ nɛ pugu tɔgɔ khwachəɨ wuŋ ŋkaŋ yugu ni ŋkaŋ yi paa wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ? 
Ndɔ ä mbɔ nɛnnɛ kiʼɛ, nnu ŋa Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi chhu nɛ shi ŋkie pi nɛiŋ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ, ŋa a yiʼi ŋa a wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nɛnnɛ nɛ?” 
Moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ chhu ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa, “M̀bɔ pi ŋgɨna minwi ŋa pəɨ thɔ nu ŋgwɛ̄iŋ a ni pa kafa pugu pa wrɛ́i? Pa lɛllɛ ŋga nchhɔ Nda Minnwi njɛʼi nu paʼa pəɨ lɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ a. 
Ndɔ ŋguoŋ pa nnu pei lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nnɛ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni nāʼaŋ nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ.” Nnɛ ŋguoŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi mieŋ vi ntei ni vugu. 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ nɛ lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ shhɨ Kaifa, mbɔ taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ, mbɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa pichəɨ pa thishɨ ni ŋkɨrɨ nɛ. 
Pita ni thɔ nu njiŋ pugu ndɔ mbɔ pi fie hiŋ, mbɔ nɔ haʼaŋ yɨna taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ni mbɔ nɛ nii nchɔchhɔ pugu pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi lɨʼɨ nɔ yəɨ nu nnu ŋa a shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. 
Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ŋguoŋ pa kúŋ ghao ni nthɔ ntāʼa lɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ŋa minthɛ pugu shwiʼi thɔ Jishɔ nnɛ ŋa pugu jwi vi nɛ. 
Ndɔ pugu shini ndɔ fāʼo sheshe yi, njiʼi nthɛ pi nɔ haʼaŋ ntou pa ghaŋ piŋ nnu mbe ni ntaoŋ nthɔ nɛ. Ndugwi yi, yi paa taoŋ nthɔ shhɨ 
nchhu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei ni nchhu ŋa, ‘Mfāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ shaʼa nu Nda Minnwi mfɛ shhɛ mbɨnɨ ŋkrao moŋ trɛi llɛ́.’ ” 
Ndɔ taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ lɔllɔ ntithi tɔthɨ nchhu ŋa, “Ɔ lɔ mfāʼo khwɛ̀ nɔ fɛ nu? Nnu ŋa ŋgwa pei wɛ̄iŋ ghɔ ŋa ɔ chwīe nɛ pɔ pi khɔ?” 
Ndɔ paʼa Jishɔ lɔ nchrā. Taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “M̀fɛ gɨ́ vɛ nɔ ligi Minnwi maoŋ ŋa ɔ shwei vigi ŋa ɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi nɛ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ chhu nɛnnɛ. Ndɔ ǹshwei ghɔ, llɔ ndwɛ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ, pəɨ shi njəɨ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua a chhɔ ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ ju ŋa a fāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ chwīe nu sheshe nnu nɛ, ndɔ nshwiʼi nu moŋ lúluŋ llɔ po.” 
Taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ni ŋga njaʼo yei, nshāa ndhwí yi nchhu ŋa, “A chɨ̄ʼə ligi Minnwi. Pia nuʼuŋ ntāʼa pa miŋkwentie mbīgi nchwīe khɔ nɔ ndwɛ? Līi njəɨ, pəɨ yaʼo chrà nchɨʼəshə yei ni noŋ yəɨ. 
Pəɨ pīʼi yəɨ ŋa?” Pugu khwɛ̄ ŋa, “A pie ŋa a khu.” 
Nnɛ pugu thu thwɛ nɔ ligi yi ndɔ ŋgwie vi, pichəɨ chrə̄ɨ vi ni lrì 
nchhu ŋa, “Gɔ̀ ŋa pi Chuʼɔ ghɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, yəɨ nɛ lɨʼɨ nshwei vigi, ŋoŋ ŋa a chhwi ghɔ nɛ gɔ̌?” 
Pita ni nchhɔ mbhi moŋ yɨna, muuŋ fàʼa chəɨ, mbɔ miŋgwɛ, thɔ njəɨ vi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Gɔgɔ ŋkaa ghɔ ni mbɔ pəɨ Jishɔ ŋoŋ Galili.” 
Ndɔ Pita lāa shhɨ pugu ghao, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ǹdɔ njiʼi nji njiŋ nnu ŋa ɔ chhu nu nɛ.” 
A gha nchəɨŋ cho yɨna, yichəɨ muuŋ fàʼa mbɔ miŋgwɛ yəɨ vi nchhu ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei ni mbɔ pugu Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ.” 
A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ndāa ti nshwrɛ̄i ŋa, “Ndɔ nji ŋoŋ ghɔ.” 
A gha ndara shɨgɛi, ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ kuʼɔ mbara Pita nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Shishini, ɔ taʼa pakwo pugu, nthɛ ŋa ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ɔ chrā nu nɛ fīni ghɔ.” 
Nnɛ a jɛ̄ chɔ̄nɔ nu noŋ yi nshwrɛ̄i nu ŋa, “Ndɔ njiʼi nji ŋoŋ ghɔ.” Ndɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ miŋkəʼɨ khwɛ. 
Nnɛ Pita kwiŋ nnu ŋa Jishɔ ni nchhu nɛ ŋa, “Ŋkaoŋ miŋkəʼɨ ma ŋkhwɛ, ɔ shi ndāa a ni trɛi ŋgɛ.” Ǹtaoŋ mbhi ŋkə̄ɨ a ghaʼa. 
﻿Matio.
27.
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni muuŋ tutuʼu, ŋguoŋ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa thishɨ pa ŋgwa Juu nyiaŋ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pugu shi njwi Jishɔ nɛ. 
Pugu krao vi, ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju nchaʼa mfɛ ni Pailɛ, mbɔ ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa. 
Nnɛ ndɨɨ ŋa Judashi, ŋa a ni mfīni Jishɔ nɛ, ni njəɨ ŋa pi fɛ njɔ́ gu ni Jishɔ nɛ, a kwri njùʼɔ yi mbɨnɨ nduʼu trɛi wuŋ ndigi mbɨŋ pighɔ ni pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa pichəɨ thishɨ, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Ǹchwīe phɨ nɔ fīni nu ŋoŋ ŋa mbhɔ yi yi wo nɛ pi jwi vi.” Ndɔ pugu chhu ŋa, “Yinɛ pɔ pi khɔ ni pigi? Yinɛ yəɨ pi gɔ̀!” 
Judashi māʼaŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ moŋ Nda Minnwi ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ŋkrə̄ɨ noŋ yi. 
Ndɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ lɔ̄gɔ mbɨŋ ghɔ nchhu ŋa, “Gɨ́ lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ ŋa pia niʼiŋ moŋ lɨʼɨ nūʼɔŋ mbɨŋ Nda Minnwi nthɛ ŋa a pɔ pi mbɨŋ chhǐ.” 
Nnɛ pugu pini, njuoŋ lɨʼɨ shhɛ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni shhɛ ŋgaŋ puoŋ pa kɨ̌ŋ, ndɔ̄gɔ nɔ lɨʼɨ twei pa ghɨ̀nɨ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pi mɛ̄iŋ shhɛ ghɔ ni Shhɛ Chhǐ ti nchəɨŋ thɔ pa shiʼa. 
Nnɛ nnu ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Jɛrimaya ni nchhu nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa, “Ndɔ pugu lɔ̄gɔ trɛi wuŋ ndigi mbɨŋ ghɔ, mbɔ fɨʼɨ nchuoŋ thɔ ju yɛ ŋa pichəɨ pa ŋgwa Ishrae ni nūʼɔŋ nɔ pe nu nɔ thɔ yi nɛ, 
Mfɛ mbɨŋ ghɔ nɔ yuoŋ nu lɨʼɨ shhɛ yɛ ŋa pi ni mɛ̄iŋ ni shhɛ ŋgaŋ puoŋ yaoŋ, nɔ haʼaŋ Taathɔ ni nōoŋ vəɨ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ thi shhɨ ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa, ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa ghɔ pie vi ŋa, “Ɔ Fùoŋ pa Juu?” Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “A haʼaŋ ɔ chhu nɛ.” 
Ndɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa pichəɨ pa thishɨ ni ŋga nchhu pa nnu thɔ yu, paʼa a lɔ njiʼi ŋkhwɛ̄. 
Nnɛ Pailɛ chhu ghɔ kiʼɛ ŋa, “Ɔ lɔ njaʼo fɨʼɨ pa nnu ŋa pugu chhu nu thɔ ghɔ nɛ?” 
Ndɔ paʼa a lɔ njiʼi ŋkhwɛ̄ sheshe nnu ghɔ ki taʼa ndigi nnu ŋa pi chhu thɔ yu nɛ, nnɛ ti ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa ghɔ ghrāo ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi. 
A ghà mbɔ nùʼɔŋ ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa moŋ sheshe ndɨɨ Jɨ Lli Njiʼa nɔ chuʼɔ nu sheshe ŋgaŋ chə́ɨŋ ŋa ŋgwa chhu ŋa a chuʼɔ nɛ. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pugu fāʼo yichəɨ wuwuru ŋgaŋ nchəɨŋ ŋa pi ya nji vi, ligi yi pɔ Baraba. 
Nnɛ pugu gha ŋkɨrɨ, Pailɛ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ tāʼa nu ŋa ǹchuʼɔ pi gɔ̌ mfɛ ni pəɨ, Baraba ki Jishɔ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ŋa Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ?” 
Nthɛ ŋa a ni nji ŋa a ni nchwīe nnu kighɨʼə pugu wɛ̄iŋ vi nchaʼa mfɛ ghɔ. 
Nɔ pigi nu, a ni ŋga mbɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ju Pailɛ ni nchɔchhɔ ŋkuoŋ faaŋ yi nchhɔ shaʼa nu nɛ, ŋgwɛ vi taoŋ ŋkɨ̀nɨ ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nchwīe nnu mbɨŋ ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ yinɛ, nthɛ ŋa ŋ̀kwo yəɨ ŋgəʼɨ shiʼa ntou yi moŋ njə̀ɨŋ nthɛ vi.” 
Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa pichəɨ pa thishɨ kwo niʼiŋ puŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ fɔ nɛ ŋa pugu pie pi ŋa pi fɛ Baraba ni pugu njwi Jishɔ. 
Ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa ghɔ pɨnɨ mbie vugu ŋkamuʼɔŋ ŋa, “Pəɨ tāʼa nu ŋa ǹchuʼɔ yəɨ ŋoŋ shɨna paa ŋgwa pei mfɛ ni pəɨ?” Pugu ŋa, “Baraba!” 
Pailɛ pie ni pugu ŋa, “Ti mi shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ ni Jishɔ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ni Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ.” Ŋguoŋ yugu chhu ŋa, “Pi kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa!” 
A chhu ŋa, “Nthɛ khɔ? Nnu pɨphɨ ŋa a chwīe nɛ khɔ?” Ndɔ pugu pɨnɨ mbaʼo ŋgòu mbīgi ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ ŋa, “Pi kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa!” 
Pailɛ ni ŋga njəɨ ŋa ghɛ̀rɛ lɔ mbɔ nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu shhɨ ndōu nu, ndɔ njəɨ ŋa minthɛ ŋgwa pighɔ sha mighei nɛ, a kwe ŋkhǐ nshɨ̄gao mbhɔ mi nɔ ghɔ shhɨ yú ŋgwa pighɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Mbhɔ ma yi wo nɔ chhǐ ŋoŋ vei, yei pɔ pi fàʼa yəɨ.” 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pighɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Chhǐ yi shi mbɔ thɔ pigi pugu pa thɔ puoŋ pigi!” 
Nnɛ, a chuʼɔ Baraba mfɛ ni pugu, ŋga ŋkwo wie Jishɔ, nchaʼa vi mfɛ ŋa pi kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa. 
Nnɛ pa ghaŋ māʼaŋ nchhɔ̀ ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa ghɔ lɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju moŋ ntuʼɔ, ŋkɨrɨ kwíe ntɨgao ŋkɨɨ pa shoogɛ yəɨ yu. 
Pugu shrāo ndhwí yi māʼaŋ pɨ̀rɨ pipie mbɨŋ yu. 
Pugu ni ŋga ŋkra ŋkie michwɛʼichwɛʼi, ŋgwɛ thɔ yu, niʼiŋ mbìe pa fùoŋ ŋgei mbhɔ yi yi jɨ, ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yugu shhɨ yu māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Chrá njɨ yɔ, ma fùoŋ pa ŋgwa Juu!” 
Pugu thu thwɛ mbɨŋ yu, ŋkwe mbìe ghɔ ndɔ ŋgwie vi nɔ thɔ yi. 
Pugu ni ŋga ŋkwo māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ, nshrāo pɨ̀rɨ pipie ghɔ mbɨŋ yu māʼaŋ ji ndhwí mbɨŋ yu, ndɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ lɨʼɨ kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni ntaoŋ nu mbhi nɛ, njəɨ ŋoŋ chəɨ llɔ Shiriŋ, ligi yi pɔ Shemu, pugu ŋɨ vi ŋa a tiɛŋ wáʼa Jishɔ. 
Pugu ni ŋga nchəɨŋ lɨʼɨ chəɨ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Gogota, njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa Lɨʼɨ Kwéi Thɔ. 
Pugu fɛ làʼo ghɔ ŋa pi nyāaŋ ni yaoŋ lwilwi ŋa a nnu, ndɔ a gha njwɛʼi, paʼa ndɔ nnu. 
Pugu ni ŋga ŋkwo kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa, māʼaŋ pɛʼi nɔ ghrā nu ndhwí yi shɨna pugu. 
Nnɛ pugu chɔchɔ shhɛ nchhɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi vi fɔ. 
Pugu nāʼaŋ yaoŋ ŋa pi ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ ŋkuoŋ wáʼa thɔ yu ŋa, “Yei Jishɔ, mbɔ Fùoŋ pa Ŋgwa Juu.” 
Pi ni ŋkwīŋ vugu pa paa ŋgɨna minwi kaʼa, taʼa yi ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ, taʼa yi ŋgei mbhɔ ŋkwrɛi. 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ntɔgɔ nu fɔ nɛ ni nthɔ ŋgwɛʼi vi, nchɨʼɨ thɔ yugu, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Gɔ̀ ŋa ɔ kaŋ ni nthɛ ɔ shāʼa Nda Minnwi mbɨnɨ ŋkrao moŋ trɛi llɛ́ nɛ, kwe nɛ noŋ yɔ pia! Ä mbɔ ŋa ɔ Muuŋ Minnwi, ɔ shwiʼi nɛ ŋkuoŋ wáʼa yinɛ pia.” 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ, pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa pichəɨ thishɨ māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ ŋkaa pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“A ni ŋkwe ŋgwa ndɔ minthɛ paʼa a lɔ ŋkwe noŋ yi. A pɔ pi Fùoŋ pa ŋgwa Ishrae, a shwiʼi nɛ ŋkuoŋ wáʼa ndwɛ pigi piŋ vi. 
A ni njɨʼə noŋ yi pi mbɨŋ Minnwi, Minnwi kwe nɛ vi ndwɛ nɔ haʼaŋ ä ŋkhwā vi, nthɛ ŋa a ni nchhu ŋa, ‘M̀bɔ pi Muuŋ Minnwi.’ ” 
Pa ŋgɨna minwi ŋa pi ni ŋkwīŋ vugu pugu nɛ ni māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ ŋkaa pugu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ moŋ ntuŋ minaoŋ, njiŋnjiŋ gū moŋ ŋguoŋ laʼa ghao ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ moŋ trɛi minaoŋ ni naoŋchɨ. 
A gha mbɔ moŋ trɛi minaoŋ ghɔ, Jishɔ kə̄ɨ ŋa, “Eli, Eli, lema shabatani?” njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, “Minnwi a, Minnwi a, ɔ mīʼaŋ a ŋa?” 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ gha njaʼo, nchhu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei thɔ mɛ̄iŋ pi Elaija.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, yichəɨ taʼa ŋoŋ vugu kɛ̄ʼi ntei tei ŋgə̄ɨ ndɔ̄gɔ kusha niʼiŋ làʼo chəchɨgəɨ fɔ nchwɛʼi thɔ muuŋ thɨ mfɛ ghɔ ŋa a nnu. 
Ndɔ pichəɨ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ chhu ŋa, “Mieŋ vi pia yəɨ ŋa Elaija shi nthɔ ŋkwe vi.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ pɨnɨ ŋkə̄ɨ ŋkiɛŋ ni njɨ, jijwɛ yi taoŋ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, ndhwí kɨʼɨ lɨʼɨ ŋa a ni mbɔ moŋ Nda Minnwi shāa ntaoŋ yi paa llɔ thɔ ghɔ nshwiʼi mfɛ làʼo ghɔ, shhɛ chɨ̄ʼɨ, pa ŋgùʼɔ shɨna. 
Pa fúŋ moŋ ŋgùʼɔ chuʼɔ ŋkaa pugu, ntou khu ŋgwa Minnwi pi taoŋtaoŋ ŋa pugu ni ŋkwo khu nɛ kuʼɔ moŋ gu, 
ntaoŋ moŋ fúŋ moŋ ŋgùʼɔ, Jishɔ ni ŋga ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu, pugu pugu ghə̄ɨ moŋ mmɛ laʼataoŋ taoŋtaoŋ nōoŋ noŋ yugu ni ntou ŋgwa. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa nthishɨ pa taʼa ŋkɨɨ shoogɛ, pugu pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɔ nchhɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi Jishɔ ni njəɨ shhɛ nchɨʼɨ pugu pa nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu, pugu chhu ŋa, “Shishini, ŋoŋ vei ni mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi.” 
Ntou pa piŋgɛ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋkaa pugu nthi fie hini nchhɔ mbɛʼi nu. Yei ni mbɔ piŋgɛ pɛ ŋa pugu ni njōu njiŋ Jishɔ llɔ Galili nchhɔ ŋgɛ̄rɛ vi nɛ. 
Shɨna pugu ni mbɔ Meri Madaliŋ, ni Meri mǔuŋ Jɛiŋ ni Joshɛ, ni mǔuŋ puoŋ Shebedi. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni fanaoŋ, ŋgaŋ fàʼo chəɨ llɔ Arimatia, ligi yi pɔ Joshɛ, ŋa juju ŋkaa yu ni mbɔ ŋgaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ nɛ thɔ. 
A ni ŋgə̄ɨ mbara Pailɛ mbie vi ŋa a fɛ khu Jishɔ ghɔ. Nnɛ Pailɛ fɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi fɛ ghɔ. 
Joshɛ lɔ̄gɔ khu Jishɔ ndiŋ moŋ mbhɔ ndhwí fhu, mbɔ yi fhi, 
niʼiŋ vi moŋ ji fúŋ ŋa a ni ŋguʼɔ ŋka fiʼifiʼi moŋ ŋgùʼɔ, ŋkə̄nə ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ ŋgùʼɔ nchri chofuŋ ghɔ nɔ, ŋgə̄ɨ ni vhi. 
Meri Madaliŋ pugu yichəɨ taʼa Meri ni mbɔ fɔ nchɔchhɔ njɨna chofuŋ moŋ ŋgùʼɔ ghɔ. 
Mbhi ni ŋga ndaŋ, llɛ́ pīri noŋ kwo tɔgɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi kɨrɨ shhɨ Pailɛ, 
nchhu ŋa, “Masha, pigi kwiŋ ŋa ŋgaŋ mifɨɨ yinɛ ni ŋga ŋguʼɔ mbɔ yi maoŋ, nchhu ŋa, ‘Trɛi llɛ́ shi ŋga ntɔgɔ, m̀bɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ.’ 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, mfɛ gɨ́ pi thɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi chofuŋ ti trɛi llɛ́ nuʼuŋ ntɔgɔ kaŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shi nthɔ njōo khu yi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ghɔ nchhu ni pa ŋgwa ŋa, ‘A kuʼɔ moŋ gu.’ Ndugwi njiŋ fɨ̄ɨ nu yei wūru nchaa fǔoŋ yi.” 
Pailɛ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ pa shoogɛ kɛ̄ʼi lɨʼɨ ŋgə̄ɨ nchwīe pugu ya ndɨna ni fúŋ ghɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ tāʼa nu nɛ.” 
Nnɛ pugu fɨ̄nɨ chofuŋ ghɔ nɔ haʼaŋ mbaʼa ŋoŋ nii fɔ ntɔgɔ pi ŋkuoŋ lēi nu pugu pa mieŋ nu ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi lɨʼɨ fɔ. 
﻿Matio.
28.
Llɛ́ ji pa Juu ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, mbhi jɛ̄ laŋ nu, mbɔ fǔoŋ llɛmbhi moŋ shwiʼi taŋ ghɔ, mbɔ Shonde, Meri Madaliŋ pugu yichəɨ taʼa Meri ghɔ ghə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ yəɨ fúŋ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu, shhɛ chɨ̄ʼɨ ŋkiɛŋ yie ghɔ nthɛ ŋa ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ ni nshwiʼi llɔ po ŋkə̄nə ŋguʼɔ chofuŋ mbɨnɨ nɔ njiŋ nchɔchhɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ. 
Miŋi mi ni nshei nɔ fiembɨ, ndhwí yi fugu nɔ wěi. 
Pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi lɨʼɨ pɔgɔ vi ŋgrū ti noŋ yugu khu. 
Ndɔ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ chhu ni piŋgɛ pighɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu, ǹji ŋa pəɨ thɔ ntāʼa pi Jishɔ ŋa pi ni ŋkwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa nɛ. 
A lɔ njiʼi mbɔ hɛiŋ, nthɛ ŋa a kwo kuʼɔ moŋ gu nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nchhu nɛ, pəɨ thɔ njəɨ lɨʼɨ ŋa pi ni ntwei vi nɛ. 
Nnɛ, pəɨ yiʼa ŋgəɨghəɨ nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa a kwo kuʼɔ moŋ gu, ndɔ pəɨ līi njəɨ, a ghə̄ɨ nu nɛ shhɨ pəɨ moŋ Galili, ndɔ pəɨ shi njəɨ vi fɔ! Pəɨ kwiŋ nnu ŋa ǹshwei vəɨ nɔ ghɔ nɛ.” 
Nnɛ pugu lɔllɔ chofuŋ ni tei moŋ pɔgɔ gu pugu pa mmɛ pwanjuʼɔ, ntei ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ shwei pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nɔ ghɔ. 
Ndɔ ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, Jishɔ paoŋ pugu pugu nchhu ŋa, “Nchrā ni pəɨ!” Ndɔ pugu thɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ kwò yi ŋgaʼo vi. 
Nnɛ Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu, pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nchhu ni pa lǐŋ paŋ ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ Galili kaŋ pugu shi njəɨ a fɔ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ piŋgɛ pighɔ ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ, ŋga njəɨ nu, pichəɨ pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi fúŋ ghɔ thɔ moŋ laʼa mfɨ̄ʼɨ ŋguoŋ pa nnu ŋa a ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ ni pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ. 
Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pighɔ kɨrɨ pugu pa pichəɨ pa thishɨ, mbini ntaoŋ mfɛ ntou mbɨŋ ni pa shoogɛ pighɔ, 
nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo nɔ chhu nu pi ŋa, ‘Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ ni tuʼu njōo vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ghɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pigi ni ndhɛ nu nɛ.’ 
Ndɔ ti ÿei nchəɨŋ tə́nə ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa, pigi ji ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pigi shi ŋkara vi nnɛ ŋa kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo ŋgəʼɨ.” 
Pugu kwe mbɨŋ ghɔ nchwīe nɔ haʼaŋ pi ni nchhu ni pugu nɛ. Chrà yei nyīeŋ wuʼɔ nnɛ shɨna pa Juu ti nthɔ nchəɨŋ thɔ pa shiʼa. 
Taʼanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pighɔ ghə̄ɨ Galili ŋkuoŋ mbra nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nshwei vugu nɛ. 
Pugu ni ŋga njəɨ vi, ŋgaʼo vi ndɔ pichəɨ fāʼo khuthɔ. 
Jishɔ thɔ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pi kwo fɛ ŋguoŋ ghrɨ́ po pugu pa ŋkuoŋ shhɛ vəɨ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, p̂əɨ ghə̄ɨ nchwīe ŋgwa pugu pɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ paŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ghao nchhɔ ŋkwe vugu ni ŋkhǐ moŋ ligi Tǎa ni Muuŋ ni Jijwɛ Minnwi, 
nchhɔ njɛʼi vugu ŋa pugu nūʼɔŋ ŋguoŋ pa nnu ŋa ǹchhu ni pəɨ nɛ ghao. Pəɨ līi njəɨ, pia shi mbɔ kaʼa ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ti mbhi shi nuʼuŋ ndugwi.” 
﻿Pwa Pishaʼakhɔ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Maaku fɨ̄ʼɨ nɛ.
1.
Yei njɛ̄ pwa pishaʼakhɔ Jishɔ, mbɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi. 
Pi nāʼaŋ moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Ishaya ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, ǹshi ntaoŋ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ a, a ghə̄ɨ shhɨ pəɨ mbīri ndaoŋ ni pəɨ, 
Ŋoŋ chəɨ thɔ mfɛ gɛ̀ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó ŋa: ‘Pīri shɛndaoŋ Taathɔ, chwīe pa lɨʼɨ tɔgɔ yi pɔ yi tithi.’ ” 
Nɛnnɛ, Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ni nthɔ mbɔ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó nthɔ mfɛ ŋkhǐ ni ŋgwa, ndɔ nchīi nu ŋa, “Pəɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ, m̀fɛ ŋkhǐ ni pəɨ, Minnwi līʼɛ phɨ yəɨ.” 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa moŋ laʼataoŋ Judia, pugu pa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa Jerushalɛiŋ taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ vi, a kwe vugu ni ŋkhǐ moŋ nɨnəɨ Jodaŋ. Pugu yūa phɨ yugu. 
Jouŋ ni māʼaŋ ndhwí ŋa pi chwīe pi ni ŋgì yichəɨ ŋkwaŋ minyieŋ pi mɛ̄iŋ ni kamela, ni ŋkandaŋ ŋgrào minyieŋ nɔ ntuʼu yi, maoŋ jɨ pi ni mbɔ ŋgwíŋ pugu pa llɔ̌ ŋkǔnu. 
A ni nchīi nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a shi nthɔ njiŋ a nɛ ghaʼo nchaa a, paʼa ǹdɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo ŋoŋ ŋa minthɛ ǹtuʼu noŋ a mfēi ŋkɨ̌ɨ tra yi nɛ. 
Mi ni ŋkwe vəɨ pi ni ŋkhǐ, ndɔ a shi ŋkwe vəɨ pi ni Jijwɛ Minnwi.” 
A ni mbɔ moŋ llɛ́ pighɔ, Jishɔ thɔ llɔ Nasharɛ moŋ Galili, Jouŋ kwe vi ni ŋkhǐ moŋ nɨnəɨ Jodaŋ. 
Jishɔ gha mbɨʼɨ noŋ yi ntaoŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ ghɔ nɛ, njəɨ po ŋaʼaŋ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, Jijwɛ Minnwi shwiʼi nu mbɨŋ yu mbɔ nɔ mintuʼɔlibuŋ. 
Ŋggì taoŋ po, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ɔ muuŋ a ŋa ŋ̀khwā, ǹja mfāʼo pwatua nthɛ ghɔ.” 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, Jijwɛ ghɔ chwīe a ghə̄ɨ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó. 
A ni mbɔ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó ghɔ nɔ khwɛ wuŋ llɛ́, Shata thɔ mōoŋ vi. A ni mbɔ fɔ pugu pa mimaoŋ mooŋ trǔ, ndɔ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi chhɔ ŋgɛ̄rɛ vi. 
Pi ni ŋga ŋkwo wɛ̄iŋ Jouŋ ti mfɨ̄nɨ, Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ Galili nthɔ nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ Minnwi, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Ndɨɨ kwo kāʼo, Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi kwo para, pəɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ, ŋkara mbiŋ pwa pishaʼakhɔ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nyīeŋ nu ŋkɨŋ mmɛ ŋkhǐ Galili, njəɨ Shemu pugu Andru ndǐŋ vi, pugu thɔ māʼaŋ ndáŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ pa ghaŋ ŋgunu. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ yōu njiŋ a, ǹchwīe pəɨ pɔ ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ ŋgwamishua.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ pugu mieŋ ndáŋ pugu njōu njiŋ yi. 
A ni ŋga nyīeŋ ŋgə̄ɨ shɨgɛi, njəɨ Jɛiŋ mbɔ muuŋ Shebedi pugu Jouŋ ndǐŋ vi, pugu pɔ moŋ kikuoŋ yugu ntaʼa pa ndáŋ pugu. 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ vugu, pugu mieŋ tǎa vugu, mbɔ Shebedi, moŋ kikuoŋ pugu pa puoŋ fàʼa, njōu njiŋ Jishɔ. 
Pa Jishɔ ni ŋgə̄ɨ Kapanuŋ, wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, a gha mbɔ llɛ́ ji, a nii moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi nthɔ njɛʼi ŋgwa. 
Pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njaʼo a yɛʼi nu nɛ ghrāo ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ, nthɛ ŋa a ni njɛʼi nɔ mmɛŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo ghrɨ́, a shini ndɔ njɛʼi pi nɔ ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, yichəɨ ŋoŋ ni jijwɛ pɨphɨ nii moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi yugu, ŋkə̄ɨ nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Pia fāʼo pi khɔ Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ? Ɔ thɔ pi nɔ pɨrɨ nu vigi? Ǹji ŋoŋ ŋa ɔ yie nɛ, ɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ llɔ mbhɔ Minnwi.” 
Jishɔ pɨ̄ga vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Lɛrɛ laŋ ndɔ ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu.” 
Jijwɛ pɨphɨ ghɔ shwiʼi miprɨligi mbɨŋ yu, ŋga ŋkə̄ɨ ŋkiɛŋ ni njɨ, ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu kiʼɛ. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pighɔ ghrāo ti mbie noŋ pugu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi khɔ? A pɔ pi yichəɨ ŋkwaŋ yɛʼi yaoŋ fhi! A fɛ gɨ́ nɔ mmɛŋoŋ ni ghrɨ́, njiʼi nthɛ pi ni pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ, pugu yaʼo vi.” 
Nthɛ pa nnu pei, ligi Jishɔ nɔ ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ ni nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ lɨʼɨ moŋ ŋguoŋ Galili ghao. 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ Jishɔ taoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi ŋgə̄ɨ pugu pa Jɛiŋ ni Jouŋ nda Shemu pugu Andru. 
Ndɨɨ ghɔ, ŋguŋ Shemu ni nthɔ ŋgɨ̄nɔ shɨ̀gao, pi shwei Jishɔ nɔ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
A thɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨʼɨ vi tɔthɨ, shɨ̀gao ghɔ kiʼi ndɔ ntaoŋtaoŋ, ŋguŋ shemu ghɔ fɛ maoŋ ni pugu. 
Ni fanaoŋ ghɔ moŋ nii minaoŋ, pi thɔ ni ŋguoŋ ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pugu pa ŋgwa ŋa pa miŋwɛiŋ ni ŋgana vugu nɛ. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa moŋ mmɛ laʼataoŋ ghɔ kɨrɨ chonda ŋa a ni mbɔ fɔ nɛ. 
A yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ntou ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthɔ ŋgɨ̌nɔ ŋkwaŋ ŋkwaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ, mfuʼu ntou pa miŋwɛiŋ. A shini ndɔ mfɛ shɨna ni sheshe miŋwɛiŋ nɔ chrā nu nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nji vi. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ni tutuʼu ki lɨʼɨ lɔ naa nja mfēi shiʼi, Jishɔ lɔllɔ ntaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ ŋa ŋoŋ lɔ njiʼi mbɔ fɔ nɛ, nduoŋ Minnwi. 
Shemu pugu pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɔ kaʼa nɛ taoŋ nthɔ ntāʼa vi. 
Pugu ni ŋga njəɨ vi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa thɔ nɛ ntāʼa ghɔ.” 
Ndɔ a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pia ghə̄ɨ moŋ pichəɨ pa laʼataoŋ, nnɛ ŋa minthɛ ǹchīi chrà ni pugu fɔ ŋkaa pugu, nthɛ ŋa mi ni nthɔ nthɛ pi yie.” 
Nnɛ, a nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ Galili ghao, nthɔ nchīi chrà Minnwi moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi ndɔ mfuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ. 
Ŋgaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ thɔ njəɨ vi, ndɨ̄gəɨ vi, ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɛ nchhu ŋa, “Ɔ̈ ŋkhwā, ɔ chwīe mbɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ.” 
Nthɛ kwoshɨnɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni mfāʼo nɛ, Jishɔ shwīi mbhɔ yi ŋkaoŋ vi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋ̀khwā. Pɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ.” 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ mmɛ mbɨŋ yu, a gū yi taoŋtaoŋ. 
Nnɛ Jishɔ gha ŋkwo shūu tə́nə yi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
Nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nchhu ni shesheŋoŋ, ndɔ ghə̄ɨ nōoŋ noŋ yɔ ni ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi a līi ghɔ, ndɔ mfɛ yaoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɔ haʼaŋ gɨ́ Mushi chhu nɛ, nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa Minnwi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ.” 
Ndɔ a taoŋ njɛ̄ chrā nu nnu pighɔ ki lɔ ŋgīʼɛ, nthɔ nchīi nnu pighɔ. Nchrā ti nchəɨŋ moŋ nthɨŋkwo ŋa Jishɔ kaŋ ni mfɛ paʼa a lɔ nuʼuŋ nii moŋ laʼa shhɛnte, a ni ŋkɨna pi moŋ pa lɨʼɨ ŋa ŋgwa shi ki lɔ mbɔ fɔ nɛ, ŋgwa llɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ ntəʼɨ ŋgə̄ɨ nthɔ njəɨ vi. 
﻿Maaku.
2.
Shɨgɛi llɛ́ ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, Jishɔ pɨ̄nɨ Kapanuŋ pa chrà nyīeŋ ŋa a pɔ laʼa. 
Ntou pa ŋgwa thɔ ŋkɨrɨ ti paʼa shɨ̀na lɔ nuʼuŋ mbɔ, njiʼi nthɛ pi chonda. Jishɔ ni nthɔ nchhu chrà Minnwi ni pugu. 
Ŋgwa chəɨŋ pugu pa ŋkwíni kwò, khwɛ pimbia tiɛŋ vi nthɔ nu ni ju lɨʼɨ yəɨ Jishɔ. 
Shɨ̀na ni ŋga mieŋ ki lɔ mbɔ ni pugu nɔ para nu yəɨ Jishɔ nthɛ yú ŋgwa pighɔ, pugu kuʼɔ thɔnda ŋaʼaŋ mbo fɔ, nshwiʼi ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋkuoŋ kúoŋ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njəɨ fɨʼɨ piŋ yugu, nchhu ni ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋa, “Muuŋ a, pi līʼɛ pa phɨ pɔ.” 
Pichəɨ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi ni nchhɔ fɔ, mbie nu moŋ njùʼɔ pugu ŋa, 
“Ŋoŋ vei kie nɛiŋ nchrā nɛiŋ? Yei pɔ pi chrà nchɨʼəshə! Mimfɛ a līʼɛ gɔ̌ ndīʼɛ phɨ ŋkiɛŋ Minnwi təʼɨ vi?” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, Jishɔ ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi nu moŋ njùʼɔ pugu nɛ moŋ jijwɛ yi, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ kie nɛiŋ nthɔ mbīʼi ŋkwaŋ nnu pei nɛiŋ njùʼɔ pəɨ? 
A yīʼɛ yəɨ, chhu nu ni ŋkwíni ŋa, ‘Pi līʼɛ pa phɨ pɔ,’ ki chhu nu ŋa, ‘Lɔllɔ, lɔ̄gɔ kúoŋ yɔ, nyīeŋ’? 
Ndɔ nɔ chwīe nu pəɨ ji ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua fāʼo ghrɨ́ ŋkuoŋ shhɛ nɔ līʼɛ nu pa phɨ.” A chhu ni ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋa, 
“Ǹchhu vɛ, lɔllɔ, lɔ̄gɔ kúoŋ yɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼa.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, a lɔllɔ, ndɔ̄gɔ kúoŋ yi, ntaoŋ ni vhi ligi ŋguoŋ yugu ghao, nɛnnɛ, ŋguoŋ yugu ghrāo, ŋgaʼo Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pigi lɔ naa ma njəɨ sheshe nnu nɔ yei!” 
Jishɔ pɨnɨ ŋgə̄ɨ ŋkɨŋ mmɛ ŋkhǐ ŋkamuʼɔŋ, ŋguoŋ yú ŋgwa ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu lɨʼɨ yəɨ vi, a thɔ njɛʼi vugu. 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ a ni nyīeŋ nu nɛ, a yəɨ Levi, muuŋ Afioshi, a chhɔ moŋ ntǎa kwe taashi, a chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Yōu njiŋ a.” A yrɛi shhɛ njōu njiŋ yi. 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchhɔ yəɨ taprɛi nthɔ njɨ maoŋ nda Levi nɛ, ntou pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ chhɔ yəɨ yu pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nthɛ ŋa ntou ŋgwa ni nthɔ njōu njiŋ Jishɔ. 
Pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi ŋa pugu ni mbɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi nɛ ni ŋga njəɨ ŋa a thɔ njɨ maoŋ pugu pa ghaŋ chwīe phɨ pugu pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi, nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ a jɨ maoŋ pugu pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ?” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo yei nnu, nchhu ŋa, “Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ shiʼi nɛ lɔ mfāʼo chà ŋgaŋ fhɔ̌, a fāʼo ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ghɨ̌nɔ nu nɛ. Ǹdɔ njiʼi nthɔ pi nɔ gɛ̄ nu pa ŋgwa ndɨndɨ, ǹthɔ nthɛ pi ghaŋ phɨ.” 
Ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ, pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi ni nthɔ njī ŋkhǐ. Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa thɔ mbara Jishɔ mbie vi ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pa ŋgwa Farashi jī ŋkhǐ, ndɔ paʼa pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ lɔ njī?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Mimfɛ pa ghaŋ gɛ̀ lɨʼɨ láŋ jī ŋkhǐ ndɨɨ ŋa pugu pa mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ wuʼɔ mbɔ kaʼa nɛ? Ndɔ haʼaŋ pugu pa mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ wuʼɔ mbɔ kaʼa nɛ, mbaʼa pugu jī ŋkhǐ. 
Ndɔ pa llɛ́ pighɔ shi nthɔ ŋa pi shi mfuʼu mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ moŋ shɨna pugu, nɛnnɛ, pugu shi njī ŋkhǐ moŋ llɛ́ ghɔ. 
“Mbaʼa ŋoŋ taʼa paʼo ŋkuoŋ ndunu ndhwí ni pra ndhwí fhi. Ä nchwīe nɛnnɛ, kaŋ ndhwí fhi ghɔ shi ŋɨnɛiŋ, nshūu ndunu ndhwí ghɔ nshāa mbɨnɨ ŋka chwīe a taoŋ pi mmɛ mbo. 
“A wuʼɔ haʼaŋ a pɔ ni mikei ŋgrào nɛ. Mbaʼa ŋoŋ niʼiŋ làʼo fhi moŋ ndunu mikei ŋgrào, ä nchwīe nɛnnɛ, làʼo ghɔ fāʼo ntūgu mikei ŋgrào ghɔ, nnɛ kaŋ làʼo ghɔ pugu pa mikei ŋgrào ghɔ shi mbɨrɨ gha. A yiʼi ŋa ŋgwa niʼiŋ làʼo fhi moŋ mikei ŋgrào fhi.” 
A ni mbɔ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu chəɨ, Jishɔ nyīeŋ ntɔgɔ nu moŋ nyīeŋ shíe gɛ. Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ki tɔgɔ nu nɛ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ka shíe gɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ, pa ŋgwa Farashi pie ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, a chwīe khɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ thɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa gɨ́ lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ ŋa pi chwīe Llɛ́ Ji nɛ?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ nnu ŋa Devi ni nchwīe ndɨɨ ŋa a ni mbou yaoŋ jɨ, njì ni njia vugu pa ŋgwa pi nɛ? 
Ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nii Nda Minnwi, ndɨɨ ŋa Abiata ni mbɔ taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɛ? A ni nii ŋkru brɛi ŋa pi ni mfɛ ni Minnwi, ndɔ mbɨnɨ mfɛ yi ŋgwa pi, mbɔ yaoŋ ŋa kɨna lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ ŋa a nthɛ shesheŋoŋ kru ŋkiɛŋ ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi.” 
Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “Minnwi ni nūʼɔŋ Llɛ́ Ji nthɛ pi ŋoŋmishua, a lɔ nchwīe ŋoŋmishua nthɛ pi Llɛ́ Ji. 
Nɛnnɛ, Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua taathɔ, njiʼi nthɛ pi Llɛ́ Ji.” 
﻿Maaku.
3.
Jishɔ ni mbɨnɨ ŋkamuʼɔŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi, ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ mfāʼo mbɔ kwikwi. 
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa ni mbɔ fɔ mbɛʼi vi nɔ yəɨ nu ŋa a shi njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋoŋ ghɔ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu, nnɛ ŋa a nthɛ pugu wɛ̄iŋ vi ŋa a chwīe nnu ŋa a lɔ ŋkāʼo. 
Jishɔ chhu ni ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa mbhɔ yi ni ŋkwikwi nɛ ŋa, “Taoŋ nthɔ hɛiŋ.” 
Nɛnnɛ, a pie vugu ŋa, “Gɨ́ piŋ ŋa pi chwīe pi yəɨ Llɛ́ Ji, nnu shiʼi ki nnu pɨphɨ, kwe nu ŋoŋ ki jwi nu ŋoŋ?” Ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ nchhu nnu. 
A kara noŋ yi mbɛʼi vugu moŋ pɨgɨtua, mfāʼo pəʼɨ njùʼɔ nthɛ tɨnɨthɔ yugu, nchhu ni ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Shwīi mbhɔ yɔ.” A shwīi, mbhɔ yi kiʼi ndɔ mbɔ pi shiʼi. 
Pa ŋgwa Farashi taoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ chomilaoŋ ghɔ nyiaŋ ntáŋ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ fùoŋ Hɛrɔ, ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pugu shi njwi Jishɔ nɛ. 
Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shūʼu mbɨnɨ ŋgə̄ɨ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ, mmɛ yú ŋgwa llɔ Galili yōu njiŋ yi pugu pa ŋgwa llɔ Judia, 
pugu pa Jerushalɛiŋ pugu Idumia pugu pa llɔ njiʼa Jodaŋ pugu pa llɔ ŋgei pa laʼataoŋ Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ. Ŋguoŋ mmɛ yú ŋgwa pei ni nthɔ lɨʼɨ yəɨ Jishɔ nthɛ ŋa pugu ni njaʼo pa nnu haʼaŋ a ni nchwīe nu nɛ. 
A chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa pugu pīri pie ghɔ nthɛ yú ŋgwa pighɔ, kiɛŋ nɛnnɛ kaŋ pugu shi nwīʼiŋ vi. 
A ni ŋkwo yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ntou ŋgwa, nɛnnɛ ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ni mfāʼo ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ, ni ŋɨ nu nɔ kāoŋ nu vi. 
Sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ ki yəɨ vi nɛ, pugu gū shhɛ shhɨ yu mbaʼo ŋgòu ŋa, “Ɔ Muuŋ Minnwi!” 
A fɛ tɨtɨnɨ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa kiʼi pugu chwīe pi ji vi. 
Jishɔ kuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra, ŋgɛ̄ pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa a ni ntāʼa nu ŋa pugu thɔ mbara vi nɛ ŋa pugu thɔ, pugu thɔ mbara vi. 
A chuʼɔ paanchrɔ ŋa a ni nchhɔ̄ ligi yugu ni ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi nɛ, ŋa pugu pugu pɔ nu, ŋa a nthɛ a shi ntaoŋ vugu pugu chīi chrà Minnwi, 
ndɔ mfāʼo njɨ nɔ fuʼu nu pa miŋwɛiŋ. 
Yei paanchrɔ ŋgwa pɛ haʼaŋ a ni nchuʼɔ nɛ: Shemu, ŋa a ni nchhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Pita nɛ, 
ni Jɛiŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Shebedi, ni Jouŋ, mbɔ ndǐŋ Jɛiŋ, ŋa a ni nchhɔ̄ ligi yugu ni Boanegeshi, njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, “Puoŋ ŋgwara mbɨ̀” 
ni Andru, pugu Fili, ni Batolomiu, pugu Matio, ni Toma, ni Jɛiŋ mbɔ muuŋ Afioshi, ni Tadio, ni Shemu ŋa a kwìni laʼa nɛ, 
ni Judashi Ishikario ŋa a ni mfīni vi nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ laʼa, yú ŋgwa pɨnɨ ŋkɨrɨ ŋkamuʼɔŋ ti paʼa a lɔ mfāʼo shɨna pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nɔ jɨ nu maoŋ. 
Pa ndaaŋoŋ yi ni ŋga njaʼo, ntaoŋ mbhi lɨʼɨ wɛ̄iŋ vi, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nchhu nu ŋa, “A paapaa.” 
Pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi ŋa pugu ni shwiʼi llɔ Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ chhu ŋa, “Bɛjɛbu pɔ mbɨŋ yu, a fuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ pi ni ghrɨ́ nthishɨ pa miŋwɛiŋ.” 
Nɛnnɛ, Jishɔ gɛ̄ vugu pugu thɔ yəɨ yu, a chrā ni pugu moŋ luʼɔ chrà, “Mimfɛ Shata kie nɛiŋ mfuʼu Shata mbɨŋ ŋoŋ? 
T̈aʼa laʼataoŋ ŋgrā noŋ yi moŋ pa kwíe, nthɔ māʼaŋ nchhɔ̀ ni noŋ pugu, kaŋ mbaʼa laʼataoŋ ghɔ yiʼi ntithi. 
Ti ẗaʼa nda mbɔ pi moŋ minduoŋnduoŋ, kaŋ mbaʼa nda ghɔ yiʼi ntithi. 
Ti S̈hata ndɔllɔ nɔ māʼaŋ nu noŋ yi ni nchhɔ̀, ndɔ mbɔ moŋ minduoŋnduoŋ, kaŋ lūgwi nu mi para. 
Ndɔ mbaʼa yichəɨ ŋoŋ nii nda ŋgaŋ ghrɨ́, ntiɛŋ maoŋ pi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ghɔ, ki lɔ mfǔoŋ ŋkrao ŋgaŋ ghrɨ́ ghɔ. A wuʼɔ kəʼɨ ghɔ ŋa minthɛ a tiɛŋ maoŋ pi ntaoŋ nɔ nda yu. 
“Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ, Minnwi shi ndīʼɛ ŋguoŋ phɨ ŋa ŋgwamishua chwīe nɛ, pugu pa sheshe chrà nchɨʼəshə ŋa a taoŋ nchò pugu nɛ, 
ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chɨ̄ʼə Jijwɛ Minnwi nɛ, mbaʼa Minnwi ma ndīʼɛ phɨ yi, nthɛ ŋa a chwīe phɨ ki līʼɛ.” 
A ni nchhu nnɛ nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nchhu nu ŋa, “A fāʼo jijwɛ pɨphɨ.” 
Mǔuŋ Jishɔ pugu pa lǐŋ pi pi pimbia thɔ nthi mbhi ntaoŋ ŋkɨ̀nɨ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ. 
Yú ŋgwa ni nchɔchhɔ yəɨ yu, nnɛ pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Mǔuŋ ghɔ pugu pa lǐŋ pɔ pi pimbia pɔ nɛ mbhi ntāʼa nu njəɨ ghɔ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Mǔuŋ a pugu pa lǐŋ paŋ pɔ pi pa gɔ̌?” 
A pɛʼi pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu chɔchɔ ŋgɨ̄ŋ vi mbāoŋ nɛ, nchhu ŋa, “Mǔuŋ a pugu pa lǐŋ paŋ pi pimbia pɔ nɛiŋ hɛiŋ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chwīe nnu ŋa Minnwi tāʼa nu nɛ, a ndǐŋ a vi mimbia pugu pa ndǐŋ a vi miŋgwɛ ni mǔuŋ a.” 
﻿Maaku.
4.
Jishɔ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ njɛ̄ yɛʼi nu ŋkɨŋ mmɛ ŋkhǐ ŋkamuʼɔŋ, ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yú ŋgwa kɨrɨ yəɨ yu, nnɛ a ni nii nchɔchhɔ pi moŋ kikuoŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ, yú ŋgwa pighɔ pɔ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ lɨʼɨ yó. 
A ni njɛʼi vugu ni ntou pa nnu moŋ luʼɔ chrà, moŋ pa nnu haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ, a ni nchhu ni pugu ŋa. 
“P̂əɨ yaʼo! Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni ma mbɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni māʼaŋ nu nɛ, pichəɨ gū shhɛmbua, pa mishi shwiʼi ŋkru. 
Pichəɨ gū moŋ shhɛ ŋkwá, lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ntou nchíʼa shi ki lɔ mbɔ nɛ, njiʼa ŋkɛkhɛ nthɛ ŋa nchíʼa shi ki lɔ njiɛŋ fɔ, 
ndɔ minaoŋ ghà nthɛ, ntūoŋ vi, nthɛ ŋa a shini ndɔ mfāʼo ŋǐeŋ yi nɛ, a kāʼo mbraoprao ŋkhu. 
Pichəɨ mbhɛ̌ gū moŋ shishaʼa, shishaʼa yīʼɛ ŋkuʼɔ mfīgi vi, paʼa a lɔ ŋkuʼɔ ti njuŋ ntíɛŋ. 
Ndɔ pichəɨ pa mbhɛ̌ gū moŋ shhɛ shiʼi, ŋkhɛ̄ ŋkuʼɔ njuŋ. Pichəɨ yuŋ trɛi wuŋ, pichəɨ ntɨgao wuŋ, pichəɨ taʼa ŋkɨɨ.” 
Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə nɛ, â yaʼo.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni mbɔ təʼɨ vi nɛ, ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ni mbɔ yəɨ yu nɛ, pugu pa paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi mbie vi ni njiŋ pa luʼɔ chrà pighɔ. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Minnwi tūgu pa nnu ŋa a ni mbɔ yi lə̄ɨŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ yi ni pəɨ, ndɔ ni ŋgwa nduoŋ ŋa pugu lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ nɛ, ŋguoŋ nnu pɔ pi moŋ pa luʼɔ chrà, 
nnɛ ŋa, ‘Pugu shi nja ndīi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ, Pugu shi nja njwɛrɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njaʼo nji kiɛŋ nɛnnɛ, kaŋ pugu shi mbāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ, Minnwi līʼɛ phɨ yugu.’ ” 
Jishɔ pie vugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ nji njiŋ luʼɔ chrà yei? Ti pəɨ shi ŋkie pi nɛiŋ nji njiŋ ŋguoŋ pa luʼɔ chrà? 
Ŋgaŋ māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌ māʼaŋ pi chrà Minnwi. 
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi nɛ pɔ pi nɔ mbhɛ̌ ŋa a gū shɛmbua. Pugu gha njaʼo, Shata kāʼo ndɔ ntɔthɔ mfuʼu chrà ghɔ ŋa pi chhu ni pugu nɛ. 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, pichəɨ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi nɛ pɔ nɔ pɛ mbhɛ̌ ŋa a gū moŋ shhɛ ŋkhwā nɛ. Pugu gha njaʼo chrà Minnwi, ŋkiʼi mbiŋ piŋ ni pwatua. 
Ndɔ paʼa ŋǐeŋ yugu lɔ ntɨnɨ, piŋ yugu wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nɔ kuo ndɨɨ, nnɛ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgəʼɨ pugu pa mōoŋ nu thɔ nthɛ chrà Minnwi nɛ, pugu kāʼo mbāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu paʼa nɔ ghɔ. 
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi nɛ pɔ nɔ pɛ mbhɛ̌ ŋa pi māʼaŋ a gu moŋ shishaʼa nɛ, 
ndɔ pa ghaghana nthɛ maoŋ nɔ yru nu moŋ yei chɔmbhi, pugu pa mifɨɨ ŋa pa fāʼo ghà nthɔ nɔ nɛ pugu pa shɔ̄rɔ nu pichəɨ pa maoŋ nduoŋ, nii njùʼɔ pugu mfīgi chrà ghɔ pugu kara mbɔ nɔ thɨ ki yuŋ ntíɛŋ. 
Ndɔ pɛ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ ŋa pi ni māʼaŋ moŋ shhɛ shiʼi nɛ pɛ ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi, mbiŋ ndɔ njuŋ ntíɛŋ, pichəɨ trɛi wuŋ, pichəɨ ntɨgao wuŋ, pichəɨ taʼa ŋkɨɨ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nchhu ŋa, “Yichəɨ ŋoŋ pɔ fɔ ŋa a ghà nii ni truka nda niʼiŋ laʼo mikru, ki laʼo kúoŋ, ki lɔ nūʼɔŋ pi ŋkuoŋ lɨʼɨ thi truka? 
“Yichəɨ yaoŋ lɔ mbɔ fɔ ŋa pi lə̄ɨŋ ŋa mbaʼa pi ma mieŋ ki nōoŋ lɨʼɨ wo, ki nnu ŋa pi kuru ŋa mbaʼa a ma mieŋ ki taoŋ lɨʼɨ liʼɛ.” 
Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “S̈hesheŋoŋ mfāʼo tə́nə, â yaʼo.” 
A pɨnɨ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ywɛrɛ nnu haʼaŋ pəɨ yaʼo nɛ shiʼi. Yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ fɨʼɨ yaoŋ nɔ ghɔ mfɛ ni ŋoŋ nɛ, Minnwi shi ŋguʼɔ mfɨ̄ʼɨ pi moŋ ghɔ mfɛ ni pəɨ, ndɔ ŋguʼɔ mbɨnɨ mbīgi ntou yi ni pəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ni ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ, Minnwi shi mbīgi ntou yi, ndɔ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ mfāʼo nɛ, Minnwi shi ŋkwe shɨgɛi yɛ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ mbhɔ yu.” 
Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nchhu ŋa, “Yei nɔ haʼaŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pɔ nɛ. Ŋoŋ lɔ̄gɔ mbhɛ̌ yaoŋ māʼaŋ, 
ndhɛ nu ŋgūʼu nu moŋ pa tuʼu pugu pa naoŋchɨ, moŋ ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ, mbhɛ̌ ghɔ khɛ̄ ŋkuʼɔ ndɔ paʼa a lɔ nji ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a kie nɛ. 
Shhɛ ghɔ chwīe mbhɛ̌ ghɔ kuʼɔ njuŋ, fǔoŋ yaoŋ pɔ ŋa a tua, mbra yi pɔ ŋa ŋkwéi yi taoŋ, nɛnnɛ ntíɛŋ yuŋ ŋkuoŋ ŋkwéi yi ghɔ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ntíɛŋ ghɔ tɨnɨ nɛ, a kāʼo njɛ̄ pi kwōo nu nthɛ ŋa ndɨɨ kwōo kāʼo.” 
Jishɔ pie ŋa, “Mimfɛ pia māʼaŋ fɨʼɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pi ni khɔ, pia shi mfɨ̄ʼɨ pi ni yəɨ luʼɔ chrà? 
A pɔ pi nɔ mbhɛ̌ yaoŋ mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ yi gɛ, ŋa ndɨɨ ŋa pi thɔ mbhī vi nɛ, a pɔ ndugwi mbhɛ̌ ŋa a yi gɛ nɛ ŋkuoŋ mbhi. 
Ndɔ ti ndɨɨ ŋa pi phi vi nɛ, a kuʼɔ ŋgū ŋkiɛŋ ndugwi mmɛ thɨ, ŋgāʼo nchaa ŋguoŋ maoŋ phi ghao moŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ, mfuʼu mɛmmɛ mbhɔ pi, nnɛ pa mishi thɔ ŋkrao nda pugu ŋkuoŋ pa mbhɔ pi.” 
Jishɔ shwei chrà Minnwi ni pugu moŋ ntou pa luʼɔ chrà nɔ pei, nɔ fɨʼɨ haʼaŋ a nthɛ pugu yaʼo nji nɛ. 
Jishɔ ni nshwei chrà Minnwi ni yú ŋgwa wuʼɔ moŋ pa luʼɔ chrà, ndɔ ndɨɨ ŋa a ni ŋguʼɔ mbɔ pi pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nɛ, a fɨ̄ʼɨ ŋguoŋ nnu ntūgu ni pugu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni fanaoŋ llɛ́ ghɔ, Jishɔ chhu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pia shāʼa ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ.” 
Pugu mieŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ ndɔ̄gɔ vi wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni mbɔ nɛ moŋ kikuoŋ pugu pugu ghə̄ɨ. Pichəɨ pa kikuoŋ nduoŋ ni mbɔ fɔ. 
Mmɛ fiŋ gū moŋ ŋkhǐ, ntuŋ ŋkhǐ niʼiŋ moŋ kikuoŋ ti kikuoŋ thɔ ndɨnaoŋ lɨnaoŋ. 
Jishɔ ni mbɔ laʼo kikuoŋ, nūʼɔŋ thɔ yi ŋkuoŋ nuʼɔŋthɔ nthɔ ndhɛ nu, pugu thɔ ŋgūʼu vi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, pia ŋkhu paʼa a lɔ mbɔ nnu vɛ?” 
Jishɔ lɔllɔ tɔthɨ mbɨ̄ga fiŋ ghɔ, nchhu ni ŋkhǐ ŋa, “Ghɨghrɨ pɔ! Tithi!” Fɨfrəɨ ghɔ tithi, lɨʼɨ ya njū. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ pɔgɔ pi gu khɔ? Pəɨ wuʼɔ mbiʼi ki lɔ mfāʼo piŋ?” 
Pɔgɔ gu nii vugu, pugu chhu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei pɔ pi gɔ̌ kiʼɛ ŋa fiŋ pugu pa ŋkhǐ yaʼo nchò yi nɛ?” 
﻿Maaku.
5.
Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shāʼa ŋkhǐ Galili ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hini moŋ krao ŋgei laʼataoŋ pa ŋgwa Gerasha. 
A ni ŋga ntaoŋ moŋ kikuoŋ ghɔ nchəɨŋ mbhi, mbāoŋ pugu ŋoŋ chəɨ chomilaoŋ ghɔ ni jijwɛ pɨphɨ mbɨŋ yu. Ŋoŋ ghɔ ni ntaoŋ moŋ pa lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ pi ghà ntwei ŋgwa nɛ. 
Ŋoŋ ghɔ ni ndaʼa pi moŋ lɨʼɨ twei ŋgwa. A kaŋ ni mfɛ paʼa yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ ŋkrao vi, njiʼi nthɛ pi ni chɛiŋ, 
nthɛ ŋa moŋ yiɛŋ ndɨɨ pi ni nthɔ ŋkrao mbhɔ mi ni chɛiŋ, ŋgwɛ kipaʼo nɔ kwò mi, ndɔ a tɨnɨ chɛiŋ ghɔ, mbɨnɨ mbəʼɨ kipaʼo ghɔ kɨkrɨ, ndɔ paʼa yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ mbɔ ŋa a kaŋ ni mfɛ a wɛ̄iŋ vi. 
A ni nthɔ mbaʼo ŋgòu ni tuʼu pugu pa naoŋchɨ moŋ pa lɨʼɨ twei ŋgwa pugu pa ŋkuoŋ mbra, nthɔ nshe noŋ yi ni ŋgùʼɔ. 
A ni ŋga njəɨ Jishɔ fie hiŋ, ntei ŋgə̄ɨ ŋgū ni kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ yu. 
Mbaʼo ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ ŋgòu nchhu ŋa, “Pia fāʼo pi khɔ, Jishɔ Muuŋ Minnwi ŋa a chaapifuoŋ nɛ, m̀baʼo mbhɔ shhɨ ghɔ ni ligi Minnwi, kiʼi niʼiŋ moŋ ŋgəʼɨ.” 
Nthɛ ŋa Jishɔ ni nthɔ nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, “Taoŋ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ vei, ma gɔ̀ jijwɛ pɨphɨ yei.” 
Jishɔ pie vi ŋa, “Ligi yɔ khɔ?” A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ligi a Káʼa Yi, nthɛ ŋa pigi ntou yigi.” 
A ghə̄ɨ shhɨ ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi ŋa kiʼi a fuʼu vugu moŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ. 
Ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ kwíe ŋkunyaŋ ni njɨ nu ŋkɨŋ mbra fɔ. 
Nɛnnɛ, pugu lɨ̄gəɨ Jishɔ ŋa, “Ntaoŋ vigi ni pa ŋkunyaŋ pinɛ, pigi nii mbɨŋ pugu”. 
Nɛnnɛ, a fɛ shɨna ni pugu, pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ pighɔ taoŋ nii mbɨŋ pa ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ. Ŋguoŋ kwíe ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ, pugu ni mbɔ yaoŋ nɔ paa ŋkaŋ yugu, ntei ntaoŋ thɔ mbra ghɔ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ nɛ nshwiʼi ŋgū moŋ ŋkhǐ, ŋkhu. 
Pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ tei ŋgə̄ɨ nchhu moŋ laʼa pugu pa moŋ ŋgunu. Ŋgwa taoŋ lɨʼɨ thɔ njəɨ nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. 
Pugu thɔ mbara Jishɔ, njəɨ ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ pighɔ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ yu nɛ a chhɔ fɔ, māʼaŋ ndhwí, lɨna yi pɔ shiʼi, mbɔ ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa a ni mfāʼo kaʼa jijwɛ pɨphɨ pighɔ nɛ, pugu fāʼo pɔgɔ gu. 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njəɨ nnu ŋa a ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ fɨ̄ʼɨ nnu ŋa a ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋgaŋ miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ pugu pa ŋkunyaŋ nɛ ni pugu. 
Pugu jɛ̄ nthɔ ndɨ̄gəɨ Jishɔ ŋa a mieŋ krao lɨʼɨ yugu ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ni vhi. 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ndɔllɔ nii nu moŋ kikuoŋ nɛ, ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa a ni mfāʼo miŋwɛiŋ nɛ lɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a mieŋ a thɔ pugu yu ghə̄ɨ kaʼa. 
Jishɔ lāa, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ghə̄ɨ mbara pa taannu pɔ laʼa, nshwei vugu ni fɨʼɨ nnu ŋa Taathɔ chwīe mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ, pugu pa fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ vɛ nɛ.” 
Ŋoŋ ghɔ lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ Dekapoli nthɔ nchīi fɨʼɨ nnu ŋa Jishɔ chwīe mbɨŋ yu nɛ, ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ghrāo. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ŋkwo pɨnɨ shāʼa moŋ kikuoŋ ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ, ŋkiɛŋ ntou yú ŋgwa kɨrɨ yəɨ yu. 
A gha ndara, Jairu, mbɔ taʼa mmɛŋoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi chəɨŋ. A ni ŋga njəɨ Jishɔ, ŋgū shhɛ shhɨ yu, 
ndɨ̄gəɨ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Muuŋ a yi miŋgwɛ chhɔ ŋkhu nu. Thɔ nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yɔ mbɨŋ yu, nnɛ ŋa a nthɛ ghɨ̌nɔ yi mmɛ a pɔ yi maoŋ.” 
A ghə̄ɨ pugu yu. Ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yú ŋgwa yōu njiŋ yi, nthɔ mfra vi moŋ ŋguoŋ ŋgei ghao. 
Shɨna ŋgwa pei, miŋgwɛ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋa a ki yəɨ ndɨɨ yi ni njɨ nɔ paanchrɔ ŋgaʼo. 
A ni ŋkwo yəɨ ŋgəʼɨ ntou yi mbhɔ ntou pa ghaŋ fhɔ̌, ŋkwo tūoŋ ŋguoŋ mbɨŋ yi ghao, paʼa noŋ yi lɔ njo, a ka wɛʼiwɛʼi. 
A ni ŋkwo yaʼo pa nnu nɔ ligi Jishɔ, nthɔ njiŋ Jishɔ moŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋkāoŋ ndhwí yi. 
Nthɛ ŋa a ni chhu ŋa, “M̈i njiʼi ŋguʼɔ ŋkaoŋ pi ndhwí yi, noŋ a tɔgɔ.” 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, ndɨɨ yi ghɔ kāʼo ti pi thi, a yaʼo moŋ noŋ yu ŋa ghɨ̌nɔ yi tɔgɔ. 
Jishɔ yaʼo moŋ noŋ yu ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ghrɨ́ taoŋ mbɨŋ yu nɛ, ŋkiʼi nshrī noŋ yi shrī moŋ yú ghɔ mbie ŋa, “A kāoŋ gɔ̌ ndhwí a?” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ yəɨ yú ŋgwa thɔ mfra ghɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ ŋgei, ɔ pɨnɨ mbie nu ŋa, ‘A kāoŋ gɔ̌ ŋkāoŋ a?’ ” 
A kara ligi yi ndīi nɔ yəɨ nu ŋa a chwīe gɔ̌ nnu ghɔ. 
Miŋgwɛ ghɔ gha njaʼo nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ moŋ noŋ yu nɛ, ntaoŋ nthɔ shhɨ Jishɔ moŋ pɔgɔ gu ndɔ ŋgrū nu, nshwei vi ni ŋguoŋ nnu shini ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ, Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Muuŋ a, piŋ yɔ chwīe ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ tɔgɔ, ghə̄ɨ ni gɔ̀ moŋ ghɨghrɨ Minnwi, pi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ.” 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ a ni ŋguʼɔ nchrā nu nɛ, ŋoŋ llɔ nda mmɛŋoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi ghɔ thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Muuŋ ghɔ kwo khu. Ɔ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋgana Masha ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ pi ŋa?” 
Ndɔ paʼa Jishɔ lɔ mfāʼo ndɨɨ ni nnu ŋa pugu chhu nɛ, ŋka chhu ni mmɛŋoŋ ghɔ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi nɛ pi ŋa, “Kiʼi mbɔgɔ, wuʼɔ nthɔ mfāʼo pi piŋ.” 
Paʼa a lɔ mbiŋ shesheŋoŋ thɔ njiŋ yu ŋkiɛŋ Pita, ni Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ ndǐŋ Jɛiŋ ghɔ. 
Pugu ni ŋga nchəɨŋ moŋ nda mmɛŋoŋ ghɔ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi nɛ, Jishɔ yəɨ vuvuʼu fiŋthɔ pugu pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ŋkə̄ɨ nu ndɔ njūa nu ŋkiɛŋ ni njɨ. 
Jishɔ gha nii nda, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ pəɨ thɔ fāʼo vuvuʼu fiŋthɔ ndɔ ŋkə̄ɨ nu, muuŋ ghɔ lɔ ŋkukhu, a lɛllɛ.” 
Pugu gwɛ̄ vi, ndɔ a fuʼu vugu ghao mfɛ mbhi, ndɔ̄gɔ wuʼɔ tǎa muuŋ ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ vi pugu pa trɛi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pugu ni nthɔ nɛ, pugu pugu nii moŋ njiɛŋ nda ŋa muuŋ ghɔ ni nūaŋ nɛ. 
A wɛ̄iŋ mbhɔ yi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Talita kumi,” njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, “Miyaa, ǹchhu vɛ ŋa lɔllɔ.” 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ ŋa a ni mbɔ paanchrɔ ŋgaʼo nɛ lɔllɔ njɛ̄ nyīeŋ nu. Yei nnu ni ŋga ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ, ŋguoŋ yugu ghao ghrāo. 
Ndɔ Jishɔ shūu tə́nə yugu ŋkiɛŋ yie ghɔ ŋa kiʼi pugu chwīe shesheŋoŋ ji, ndɔ nchhu ni pugu ŋa pi fɛ yaoŋ ghɔ a jɨ. 
﻿Maaku.
6.
Jishɔ lɔllɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ yugu laʼataoŋ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi yōu njiŋ yi. 
A gha mbɔ llɛ́ ji pa Juu, a jɛ̄ yɛʼi nu moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi, ntou ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni njaʼo vi nɛ ghrāo, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei yɛʼi yei nnu pi hɨŋ? A fāʼo fɨʼɨ shiethɔ yei pi llɔ hɨŋ? A fāʼo yei ghrɨ́ pi hɨŋ nɔ chwīe nu pa nnu ghraoghrao pei nɔ ghɔ? 
Yei lɔ mbɔ kaminda, mbɔ muuŋ Meri, mbɔ ndǐŋ Jɛiŋ ni Joshɛshi ni Judashi ni Shemu? Pia pa lǐŋ pi pi piŋgɛ lɔ mbɔ hɛiŋ kaʼa?” Nnɛ pugu lāa vi. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pi shiʼa nchɨ̄ʼə njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ŋkiɛŋ laʼa pugu shɨna ŋgwa pi, pugu pa ji ndaaŋoŋ.” 
A kaŋ ni nthɛ paʼa a lɔ njiʼi nchwīe pa nnu ghraoghrao fɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋa a ni nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ shɨgɛi ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
A ni ŋgrāo nthɛ fɨʼɨ ki piŋ ŋa pugu ni mfāʼo nɛ. A ni nyīeŋ njīŋ moŋ laʼa nthɔ njɛʼi nu. 
Jishɔ gɛ̄ paanchrɔ pighɔ, ntaoŋ vugu ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ pa pi paa, mfɛ njɨ ni pugu nɔ fuʼu nu pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ. 
Mfɛ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ sheshe yaoŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nu nɛ, ŋkiɛŋ mbìe, kiʼi pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ brɛi, ki pìɛŋ kra, ki ntuo mbɨŋ moŋ pìɛŋ pəɨ.” 
Mbɨnɨ mbīgi ŋa, “Pəɨ gwɛ tra ndɔ kiʼi pəɨ tuo kwri ndhwí.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Sheshe nda ŋa pəɨ nii fɔ nɛ, pəɨ laʼa fɔ ti shi nuʼuŋ ntaoŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ. 
Sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa pi lɔ mbiŋ vəɨ fɔ nɛ, ki njwɛrɛ nnu ŋa pəɨ chhu nu nɛ, pəɨ ŋga ntaoŋ nu fɔ, pəɨ krū kwò məɨ nɔ nōoŋ nu ni pugu ŋa Minnwi pɨ̄na nnu ŋa pugu chwīe nɛ.” 
Pugu ni ntaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ, nchīi nu ŋa ŋgwamishua pāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ. 
Pugu ni nthɔ mfuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ ŋgwa, njùʼɔ wru mbɨŋ ntou ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ, nthɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
Fùoŋ Hɛrɔ ni njaʼo nnu yei, nthɛ ŋa ligi Jishɔ ni nyīeŋ ŋguoŋ lɨʼɨ. Ŋgwa chhu nu ŋa, “Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu, a chwīe yie a fāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ chwīe nu pa nnu ghraoghrao pei.” 
Ndɔ pichəɨ chhu nu ŋa, “A Elaija.” Pichəɨ ni nthɔ nchhu yugu ŋa, “A njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, nɔ taʼa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi llɛshhɨ.” 
Ndɔ Hɛrɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu pei, nthɔ nchhu nu ŋa, “Jouŋ, ŋa mi ni njaʼa thɔ yi nɛ, pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkuʼɔ!” 
Nduthɔ Hɛrɔ ni ŋkwo taoŋ ŋgwa pugu ghə̄ɨ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ Jouŋ mfɨ̄nɨ moŋ chə́ɨŋ nthɛ nnu Herodia mbɔ ŋgwɛ Fili ndǐŋ vi, nthɛ ŋa Hɛrɔ ni ŋgugwɛi vi. 
Jouŋ ni nthɔ shwei Hɛrɔ ŋa, “A lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo vɛ nɔ wugwɛi nu ŋgwɛ ndǐŋ ghɔ.” 
Herodia ni mfāʼo kipɨna njùʼɔ yu nthɛ Jouŋ, nthɔ ntāʼa shɛndaoŋ nɔ jwi nu vi, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo shɨna, 
nthɛ ŋa Hɛrɔ ni mbɔgɔ Jouŋ nthɛ ŋa a ni nji ŋa Jouŋ ŋoŋ taoŋtaoŋ, nnɛ, nūʼɔŋ vi nɔ haʼaŋ mbaʼa kàʼa kēe vi nɛ. A ni ŋkhwā nɔ yaʼo nu pa nnu mbhɔ Jouŋ, njiʼi nthɛ pi nɔ haʼaŋ sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa a ni njaʼo vi nɛ, nnu pighɔ tāra vi ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi nɛ. 
Ndugwi yi shɨna taoŋ llɛ́ ŋa Hɛrɔ ni nthɔ njɨ llɛ́ phí yi pugu pa kúŋ pi, ni pa thishɨ pa shoogɛ pi, pugu pa mɛmmɛ ŋgwa moŋ Galili. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa muuŋ Herodia yi miŋgwɛ ni ntaoŋ shhɨ mbini pini nɛ, a pwa Hɛrɔ pugu pa ghaŋ gɛ̀ pi, fùoŋ chhu ni muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ ŋa, “Pie sheshe yaoŋ ŋa ɔ khwā nɛ vəɨ m̀fɛ vɛ.” 
Nshwrɛ̄i pa kɨna shhɨ yu ŋa, “Sheshe yaoŋ ŋa ɔ shi mbie nɛ, njiʼi nthɛ ä nchəɨŋ pi ghrà laʼataoŋ a ǹshi mfɛ vɛ.” 
Muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ taoŋ mbhi, nchhu ni mǔuŋ vi ŋa, “Mi shi mbie pi khɔ?” A chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Thɔ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ.” 
A kiʼi mbɨ̄nɨ pɨ̄nɨ moŋ kɔkɔnɔ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ njəɨ fùoŋ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹtāʼa nu ŋa ɔ fɛ thɔ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ vəɨ wuʼɔ ndwɛ ŋkuoŋ pashinja yei.” 
Fùoŋ ni nja mbɔ ni tuʼuthɔ, ndɔ nthɛ kɨ̀na ŋa a ni ŋkwo shwrɛ̄i shhɨ ghaŋ gɛ̀ pi nɛ, a shini ndɔ ntāʼa nu mbəʼɨ chrà ŋa a ni ŋkwo fɛ ghɔ nɛ. 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ fùoŋ taoŋ taʼa ŋkɛ̄ʼi vi, mfɛ gɨ́ ghɔ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ nthɔ ni thɔ Jouŋ. A ghə̄ɨ njaʼa thɔ yi moŋ chə́ɨŋ, 
nthɔ ni thɔ yi ghɔ ŋkuoŋ pashinja, mfɛ ni muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ, muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ fɛ ni mǔuŋ vi. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ ni ŋga njaʼo yei nnu, nthɔ ndɔ̄gɔ khu yi ŋgə̄ɨ niʼiŋ moŋ fúŋ moŋ ŋgùʼɔ. 
Pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Jishɔ gha mbɨnɨ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni ntaoŋ vugu nɛ, ŋkɨrɨ yəɨ yu, nshwei vi ni ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa pugu ni nchwīe ndɔ ntɨgɨ. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ taʼa lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ŋgwa lɔ mbɔ fɔ nɛ, pia ghə̄ɨ fɔ mfɛrɛ noŋ nɔ kuo ndɨɨ.” Nthɛ ŋa ntou ŋgwa ni nthɔ nu ndɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu pugu shini ndɔ mfāʼo shɨna fɛrɛ noŋ ti njɨ maoŋ. 
Pugu nii moŋ kikuoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ŋgwa lɔ mbɔ nɛ nɔ pɔ nu fɔ təʼɨ vugu. 
Ndɔ ntou ŋgwa ni njəɨ vugu nji ŋa a pugu, ntei yugu ŋkuoŋ shhɛ llɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ghao, mfǔoŋ pugu nchəɨŋ fɔ shhɨ Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ntaoŋ ŋkaoŋ mbhi, njəɨ ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yú ŋgwa, mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pugu nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ nɔ pa minjɨɨ ki ŋkɛ̄ʼi yugu. Nnɛ a jɛ̄ nthɔ njɛʼi vugu ni ntou nnu. 
Njiʼa ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ njəɨ vi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Yei lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ŋgwa lɔ mbɔ, ndɨɨ lɔ ŋkwo ya ntɔgɔ. 
Chhu ŋgwa pei ghə̄ɨ, nnɛ ŋa a nthɛ pugu ghə̄ɨ moŋ pa mbàŋ mbambara pugu pa moŋ laʼa njuoŋ yaoŋ fɔ njɨ.” 
Ndɔ a khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fɛ yaoŋ pugu jɨ.” Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pigi shi ŋgə̄ɨ njuoŋ brɛi ni fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa mimfɛ ŋoŋ fāʼa nɔ paa ŋkɨɨ llɛmbhi nɛ nthɔ mfɛ ni pugu pugu kru?” 
A pie ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo ndigi brɛi yi khɔ? Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ ndīi!” Pugu ni ŋga ndīi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ndigi yi tiɛŋ ni paa shhu.” 
Jishɔ fɛ gɨ́ ŋa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pighɔ chɔchɔ ŋkuoŋ trǔ moŋ pa kwiekwie. 
Pugu chɔchɔ moŋ pa kwíe, pichəɨ pɔ taʼa ŋkɨɨ, pichəɨ pɔ tiɛŋ wuŋ. 
Nɛnnɛ a lɔ̄gɔ kəɨŋ brɛi ghɔ ni paa shhu, mbɨʼɨ ligi yi ndīi po, ntōo Minnwi, mbəʼɨ brɛi ghɔ mfɛ ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa pugu fɛ ni pa ŋgwa pighɔ, ŋgrā paa shhu ghɔ shɨna pugu ghao. 
Ŋguoŋ yugu kru ti njru. 
Pugu ni ndɨ̄ga pa pəʼɨ pəʼɨ pɨgəɨ brɛi, pugu pa shhu a lɨnaoŋ paanchrɔ mikuo. 
Fɨʼɨ pa pimbia haʼaŋ pugu ni ŋkru brɛi ghɔ nɛ ni mbɔ tiɛŋ ŋkaŋ yi. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ Jishɔ chwīe pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nii moŋ kikuoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ nɔ shāʼa nu ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ moŋ Beshaida, a lara shɨgɛi nɔ chhu nu ni yu ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ laʼa. 
A gha ŋkwo chaʼa vugu, ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra lɨʼɨ luoŋ Minnwi. 
A ni ŋga nchəɨŋ ni fanaoŋ, kikuoŋ ni mbɔ titri ŋkhǐ, Jishɔ ni mbɔ mbhi təʼɨ vi. 
Jishɔ yəɨ ŋa pugu paʼo nu ni prǎ nɔ chhwi nu kikuoŋ a ghə̄ɨ shhɨ, nthɛ ŋa fɨfrəɨ ni ntaoŋ pi shhɨ pugu. A gha mbɔ ni ndaʼa mbhi laŋ, moŋ shɨna trɛi minaoŋ pugu ntɨgao minaoŋ, a nyīeŋ nu ŋkuoŋ ŋkhǐ nthɔ nu yəɨ pugu, ntāʼa nu mfərə vugu. 
Ndɔ pugu gha njəɨ vi a nyīeŋ nu ŋkuoŋ ŋkhǐ, pugu gɛ̄ ŋa a pɔ pi ŋkhushɛ, mbaʼo ŋgòu. 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ yugu ni njəɨ vi, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu, ndɔ a chrā ni pugu nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ, a mmu, kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu.” 
Nɛnnɛ, a nii moŋ kikuoŋ mbara vugu, fɨfrəɨ ghɔ tithi, nnu ghɔ llwi nchò yugu. 
Nthɛ ŋa thɔ yugu shini ndɔ njiʼi nshie ni nnu kugwi nu ŋgwa ni brɛi, ndɔ pugu ni mbɔ pa fɨ̄nɨ thɔ nɔ ji nu. 
Pugu ni ŋga nshāʼa, ntaoŋ mbhi lɨʼɨ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Gɛnɛsharɛ nɛ, nchu kikuoŋ yugu ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ. 
Pugu gha ntaoŋ moŋ kikuoŋ, pa ŋgwa yəɨ vi ŋkiʼi njiji, 
ntei moŋ ŋguoŋ yie krao lɨʼɨ ghao, nthɔ nu ni ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋkuoŋ pa kúoŋ pugu nɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa pugu ni njaʼo ŋa Jishɔ pɔ nɛ. 
Sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa a ni ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ, moŋ puoŋ mi laʼataoŋ pugu pa mɛmmɛ laʼataoŋ pugu pa mooŋ ŋgunu, pugu nūʼɔŋ pa ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ moŋ pa taŋ, ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a mieŋ pa ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pighɔ kāoŋ pi wuʼɔ muuŋ thɔ ndhwí yi. Ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋkāoŋ nɛ, ghɨ̌nɔ yugu tɔgɔ. 
﻿Maaku.
7.
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi ŋa pugu ni ndhɔ Jerushalɛiŋ ni ŋkɨrɨ yəɨ Jishɔ. 
Pugu ni njəɨ ŋa pichəɨ ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ thɔ njɨ yaoŋ ni mbhɔ ki shɨ̄gao moŋ ŋkwaŋ shɛndaoŋ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ chhu nɛ. 
Pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa Juu ghao shiʼa njɨ yaoŋ ki lɔ nshɨ̄gao mbhɔ yugu ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a pie nɛ, nnɛ nchhɔ nūʼɔŋ nùʼɔŋ pa thishɨ pugu, 
ki njɨ sheshe yaoŋ ki lɔ nshɨ̄gao noŋ nɔ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ chhu nɛ ndɨɨ ŋa pugu kwəɨ taŋ nɛ. Ntou pichəɨ pa nùʼɔŋ pɔ fɔ ŋa pugu ghà nūʼɔŋ, nɔ shɨ̄gao nu pa ndua pugu pa kɨ̌ŋ pugu pa pichəɨ kɨ̌ŋ tɨ́nɨ pugu pa ŋgrào ŋa pi ghà nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ njɨ maoŋ nɛ. 
Pa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pie vi ŋa, “A ghà nchwīe khɔ paʼa pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ lɔ nchhɔ chɔmbhi yugu ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ pa thishɨ chhu nɛ, nthɔ njɨ yaoŋ ni mbhɔ ki shɨ̄gao?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “A ŋkiɛŋ nnu shini nɔ haʼaŋ Minnwi ni nōoŋ ni Ishaya a chhu nthɛ vəɨ ma pa ghaŋ mifɨɨ pei, wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nāʼaŋ ŋa, ‘A chhu ju Minnwi ŋa, Ŋgwa pei ghà ŋgaʼo a pi ni nchò yugu ndɔ paʼa njùʼɔ yugu lɔ mbara yəɨ mu, 
Ghɛ̀rɛ lɔ mbɔ ni ŋgwa pei moŋ ghaʼo nu ma, nthɛ ŋa pugu yɛʼi nùʼɔŋ ŋgwamishua, pi nɔ haʼaŋ a pɔ pi gɨ́ a.’ 
Pəɨ mieŋ kɨ̀na Minnwi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ pi nùʼɔŋ ŋgwamishua.” 
A pɨnɨ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo ŋkiɛŋ shɛndaoŋ nɔ lāa nu kɨ̀na Minnwi nnɛ ŋa pəɨ nūʼɔŋ yəɨ nùʼɔŋ. 
Mushi ni nchhu ŋa, ‘Yaʼo nchò tǎa ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ ghɔ,’ ndɔ ‘Ŋoŋ ŋa a wɛʼi tǎa ki mǔuŋ vi nɛ, yiʼi ŋa pi shi njwi vi.’ 
Ndɔ pəɨ chhu yəɨ ŋa, ‘Ŋ̈oŋ nchhu ni mǔuŋ vi ki tǎa vi ŋa yaoŋ ŋa m̀fāʼo nɔ ghɛ̄rɛ nu ghɔ nɔ nɛ pɔ pi Kobaŋ (njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa yaoŋ fɛ́ ni Minnwi)’, 
nnɛ pəɨ lɔ nuʼuŋ mbiŋ ŋa a ghɛ̄rɛ tǎa vi ki mǔuŋ vi. 
Nnɛ nthɔ ndāa chrà Minnwi ni nùʼɔŋ yəɨ ŋa pəɨ tɨgɨ ŋgwrɛiŋgwa pəɨ nɔ ghɔ nɛ. Pugu pa pichəɨ ntou ŋkwaŋ nnu pi nɛ ŋa pəɨ chwīe.” 
Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ ŋgwa pighɔ pugu thɔ njəɨ vi, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “P̂əɨ ywɛrɛ nnu ŋa ǹchhu nu nɛ ndɔ njaʼo. 
Yichəɨ yaoŋ lɔ mbɔ fɔ ŋa ä nii mbɨŋ ŋoŋ llɔ mbhi a fuo vi, a ka pɔ pi yaoŋ ŋa a taoŋ moŋ noŋ ŋoŋ nɛ ŋa minthɛ a fuo vi.” 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə yaʼo.” 
A ni ŋga mieŋ yu ŋgwa pighɔ nii nda, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chhu ghɔ ŋa a shwei njiŋ luʼɔ chrà ghɔ. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ wuʼɔ mbou pi lɨna ŋkaa pəɨ? Pəɨ lɔ naa njəɨ ŋa sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a llɔ mbhi nii mbɨŋ ŋoŋ nɛ nthɛ paʼa a lɔ mfuo vi. 
Nthɛ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi ŋgə̄ɨ pi njùʼɔ yu, a ghə̄ɨ pi puŋ yu ntiri ntaoŋ nii moŋ krao.” (Nnɛ nchīi ŋa ŋguoŋ maoŋ jɨ yi taoŋtaoŋ.) 
Nchhu ŋa, “A yaoŋ ŋa a taoŋ moŋ noŋ ŋoŋ nɛ ŋa a fuo vi. 
Nthɛ ŋa llɔ moŋ ghɔ, moŋ njùʼɔ ŋoŋmishua, pa kwàʼa pɨphɨ ghà ntaoŋ, nɔ pa kwoshuoŋ, ŋgɨna, jwi nu ŋoŋ, 
shúoŋ mbhɔ ghaŋ láŋ, lúa, mbha nnu pɨphɨ, mifɨɨ, pa nnu tɔtrɔ, kighɨʼə, chhu nu phɨ thɔ ŋgwa, ntitaʼo, mbha nnu na. 
Ŋguoŋ pa nnu pɨphɨ pei ghà ntaoŋ pi moŋ noŋ ŋoŋ, mfuo ŋgaŋ vi.” 
Jishɔ ni ndhɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ krao ŋgei Tairɛ. A ni nii moŋ nda paʼa ndɔ ntāʼa nu ŋa shesheŋoŋ ji, ndɔ paʼa shɛndaoŋ lɔ mbɔ ŋa a kaŋ ni mfɛ a lɛrɛ. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, miŋgwɛ chəɨ ŋa jijwɛ pɨphɨ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ muuŋ vi yi miŋgwɛ nɛ ni njaʼo ŋa a pɔ, nthɔ ŋgū laʼo kwò Jishɔ. 
Miŋgwɛ vei ni mbɔ miŋgwɛ taoŋ nduoŋ, llɔ krao ŋgei Fonishia moŋ Shiria. Ndɨ̄gəɨ Jishɔ ŋa a fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ muuŋ vi. 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “A pie ŋa pi fǔoŋ kugwi pa puoŋ ŋkaoŋ nthɛ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɔ lɔ̄gɔ nu maoŋ jɨ puoŋ māʼaŋ ni pa miŋgu.” 
Miŋgwɛ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ooŋ, ma Taathɔ, ndɔ njiʼi nthɛ pi pa miŋgu ghà njɨ ŋkuʼu maoŋ puoŋ laʼo taprɛi.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Nthɛ yinɛ ndigi chrà, minthɛ ɔ ghə̄ɨ ni gɔ, miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ kwo taoŋ mbɨŋ muuŋ ghɔ.” 
A pɨ̄nɨ laʼa, njəɨ muuŋ ghɔ a nūaŋ kúoŋ, miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ kwo taoŋ mbɨŋ yu. 
A pɨ̄nɨ llɔ moŋ krao ŋgei Tairɛ, nyīeŋ ntiri moŋ Shidoŋ nchəɨŋ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ Galili, moŋ krao ŋgei Dekapoli. 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa lɔ̄gɔ yichəɨ ŋoŋ ŋa a ni mbɔ fhɨtənə ndɔ ki lɔ nchrā nu shiʼi, nthɔ mbara vi ni ju, ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ yu. 
Jishɔ lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ lɨʼɨ təʼɨ vi, niʼiŋ mbhɔ yi tə́nə yu, ŋga nthu thwɛ, ŋkaoŋ lɨŋ yi. 
Jishɔ pɨʼɨ ligi yi ndīi po, nshɔnɔ nchhu ni ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Ɛfata”, njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, “Chuʼɔ!” 
Tə́nə yi chuʼɔ, lɨŋ yi kɨ̄gɛi, a chrā ki kɔ̀rɔ. 
Jishɔ fɛ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa kiʼi pəɨ chhu ni shesheŋoŋ. Ndɔ fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni mbīgi gɨ́ ŋa kiʼi pugu chhu ni ŋgwa nɛ, wuʼɔ mbɔ fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pugu ni nchhu mbīgi nɛ. 
Pa ŋgwa ni ŋgrāo ti a ghaʼa, nchhu nu ŋa, “A chwīe ŋguoŋ pa nnu ghao shishiʼi. A chwīe fhɨtənə yaʼo lɨʼɨ, fhɨncho chrā.” 
﻿Maaku.
8.
Moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ghɔ, ntou yú ŋgwa ni ŋga mbɨ̄nɨ ŋkɨrɨ ki lɔ mfāʼo yaoŋ nɔ jɨ nu, Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nchhu ni pugu ŋa, 
“M̀fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ ŋgwa pei nthɛ ŋa pigi pugu kwo chhɔ nɔ trɛi llɛ́ ki lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo yaoŋ nɔ jɨ nu. 
M̈i mfɛ vugu laʼa ni njì, pugu taoŋ shɛndaoŋ njì māʼaŋ vugu, nthɛ ŋa pichəɨ llɔ a shɨga.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ shi njəɨ maoŋ jɨ pi hɨŋ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó yei nɔ kugwi nu fɨʼɨ ŋgwa pei nɔ ghɔ?” 
Jishɔ pie vugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo pi ndigi brɛi yi khɔ?” Pugu chhu ŋa, “Yi khwachəɨ.” 
A fɛ gɨ́ ni ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu chɔchɔ shhɛ. Ndɔ̄gɔ khwachəɨ brɛi ghɔ ŋga ntōo Minnwi, mbəʼɨ mfɛ ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa pugu fɛ ni pugu. Nnɛ pugu fɛ ni ŋgwa pighɔ. 
Pugu ni mfāʼo shɨgɛi puoŋ mi shhu, Jishɔ gha ŋkwo tōo Minnwi nɔ ghɔ, mbɨnɨ mfɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi fɛ ni pugu. 
Pugu kru ti njru, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi lɨ̄ga pa pəʼɨ pɨgəɨ pi a lɨnaoŋ moŋ khwachəɨ mɛmmɛ mikuo. 
Yaoŋ nɔ khwɛ ŋkaŋ ŋgwa ni mbɔ fɔ. Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ laʼa. 
Ŋkiʼi ndɔ nii nii ndɨɨ ghɔ moŋ kikuoŋ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nshāʼa ntaoŋ Dalmanuta. 
Pa Farashi thɔ njɛ̄ lōu nu pugu pa Jishɔ, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa a nōoŋ lì llɔ pɔ, nnɛ nɔ mōoŋ nu mi. 
A shɔnɔ ŋkiɛŋ yie ghɔ moŋ njùʼɔ yu, nchhu ŋa, “Ŋgwrɛiŋgwa pei tāʼa lì nthɛ khɔ? Shishini ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa mbaʼa pi nōoŋ taʼa lì ni pugu.” 
A mieŋ vugu ŋga mbɨnɨ nii moŋ kikuoŋ ŋkamuʼɔŋ nshāʼa ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ līʼɛ nɔ lɔ̄gɔ nu brɛi, ŋguʼɔ mfāʼo pi taʼa yi mbhɔ pugu moŋ kikuoŋ. 
Jishɔ shūu tə́nə yugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɨna yishi llɔ mbhɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa Hɛrɔ.” 
Pugu jɛ̄ nthɔ nchrā nu shɨna pugu nthɛ nnu brɛi ŋa pugu shini ndɔ mfāʼo nɛ. 
Jishɔ ji nnu ŋa pugu ni nchrā nu nɛ, nɛnnɛ mbie vugu ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ pəɨ chrā nu ŋkuoŋ nnu pou brɛi? Pəɨ lɔ nji, ki mfāʼo shiethɔ pa nnu yaʼa? Thɔ yəɨ kweikwei? 
Pəɨ fāʼo ligi ki lɔ njəɨ lɨʼɨ, mfāʼo tə́nə ki lɔ njaʼo lɨʼɨ? Pəɨ shiʼa ŋkwiŋ nnu? 
Ndɨɨ ŋa mi ni mbəʼɨ tiɛŋ brɛi ŋkugwi tiɛŋ ŋkaŋ ŋgwa nɔ ghɔ nɛ, pɨgəɨ pəʼɨ brɛi ŋa pəɨ ni ŋkɨrɨ nɛ ni mbɔ mikuo yi khɔ?” Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Paanchrɔ.” 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa ŋki pəʼɨ yi khwachəɨ ŋkugwi khwɛ ŋkaŋ ŋgwa nɔ ghɔ nɛ, pɨgəɨ pəʼɨ brɛi ŋa pəɨ ni ŋkɨrɨ nɛ ni mbɔ njòu yi khɔ?” Pugu khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Yi khwachəɨ.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Thɔ yəɨ wuʼɔ mbiʼi ki lɔ naa nshie?” 
Pugu ghə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ Beshaida, pichəɨ ŋgwa lɔ̄gɔ nchriligi nthɔ njəɨ vi ni ju ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a kāoŋ vi. 
A wɛ̄iŋ mbhɔ nchriligi ghɔ, ntaoŋ ni ju moŋ laʼa, ŋga kwo thu thwɛ nɔ ligi yi ndɔ mbɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ yu mbie vi ŋa, “Ɔ yəɨ sheshe yaoŋ?” 
A pɨʼɨ ligi yi tɔthɨ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Njəɨ pa ŋgwa ndɔ pugu fhi pi pa thɨ nyīeŋ nu.” 
Nnɛ Jishɔ pɨnɨ nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ mi nɔ ligi yi, a fēi ligi yi, ligi yi shie, a yəɨ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ shishiʼi. 
Jishɔ chhu kiʼɛ a ghə̄ɨ nda yu, mfɛ gɨ́ ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nii moŋ laʼa.” 
Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ghə̄ɨ moŋ pa laʼataoŋ moŋ Kaisharia Filipai. Pugu pugu ni ŋga mbɔ shɛndaoŋ, a pie pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pa ŋgwa ghà nchhu ŋa mi pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ, pichəɨ chhu ŋa ɔ Elaija ndɔ pichəɨ chhu ŋa ɔ yichəɨ taʼa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi.” 
A ghə̄ɨ shhɨ mbie vugu ŋa, “Ti pəɨ chhu yəɨ ŋa mi pɔ pi gɔ̌?” Pita khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ.” 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ shūu tə́nə yugu ŋa kiʼi pugu shwei shesheŋoŋ nɔ ghɔ. 
Jishɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ njɛʼi vugu ŋa a yiʼi ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ nthɛ ntou pa nnu, pa thishɨ pa Juu pugu pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi lāa vi, pi jwi vi, a gha ndaʼa trɛi llɛ́, a pɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ. 
Nchwīe thɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ya nshie ni yei nnu. Pita lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ njiŋnjiŋ nthɔ mbɨ̄ga vi. 
Jishɔ gha ŋkara noŋ yi, mbɛʼi ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, mbɨ̄ga Pita nchhu ŋa, “Lɔllɔ yəɨ mu, ma Shata! Ɔ lɔ njiʼi nūʼɔŋ kwāʼa nu mɔ pi ŋkuoŋ nnu Minnwi, ɔ ka nūʼɔŋ pi ŋkuoŋ pa nnu ŋgwamishua.” 
Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ kɨrɨ ŋgwa pighɔ fɔ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “S̈hesheŋoŋ ntāʼa nu njōu njiŋ a, a mieŋ phi nnu haʼaŋ a khwā nɛ, ntiɛŋ wáʼa yi, njōu njiŋ a. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu ndūgu ni chɔmbhi yi nɛ shi shiɛŋ chɔmbhi yi ghɔ, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a mīʼaŋ chɔmbhi yi nthɛ a pugu pa nthɛ pwa pishaʼakhɔ Minnwi nɛ shi ndūgu ni chɔmbhi yi ghɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋmishua shi nshei pi khɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ä mfāʼo ŋguoŋ mbhi ghao ndɔ shiɛŋ chɔmbhi yi? 
Minthɛ ŋoŋ fɛ pi khɔ nɔ kwri nu chɔmbhi yi nɔ ghɔ? 
S̈hesheŋoŋ mfāʼo lrithɔ nthɛ a pugu pa chrà a moŋ mbhi ŋgwrɛiŋgwa ki fāʼo pɔgɔ Minnwi, pugu pa ŋgwrɛiŋgwa pɨphɨ yei, kaŋ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mfāʼo lrithɔ nthɛ vi ndɨɨ ŋa a thɔ moŋ ndighaʼo Tǎa vi pugu pa yi ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi pi taoŋtaoŋ nɛ.” 
﻿Maaku.
9.
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa pichəɨ ŋgwa thi hɛiŋ ŋa mbaʼa pugu khu ki lɔ njəɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi thɔ moŋ ghrɨ́.” 
Ntɨgao llɛ́ ni ŋga ntɔgɔ Jishɔ lɔ̄gɔ Pita, pugu Jɛiŋ ni Jouŋ, pugu pugu kuʼɔ təʼɨ vugu ŋkuoŋ mmɛ ntaaŋ mbra. Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni mbɛʼi vi nɛ, a kwri ligi pugu, 
ndhwí yi gu yi fufhu, nchīa ti ŋgaʼa, mfugu nchaa fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ minthɛ shesheŋoŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi shɨ̄gao nɛ. 
Elaija pugu Mushi nōoŋ noŋ yugu ni trɛi ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ pighɔ, nthɔ nchrā nu pugu pa Jishɔ. 
Pita chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Masha, a pwa ŋa pia pɔ hɛiŋ nɛ. Pigi shi ŋkrao trɛi ntǎa, taʼa yi vɛ, taʼa yi ni Mushi, taʼa yi ni Elaija.” 
Nthɛ ŋa a shini ndɔ nji nnu ŋa a nthɛ a chhu nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pɔgɔ gu ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu ŋgaʼa. 
Lúluŋ kuru vugu, ŋggì taoŋ moŋ lúluŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Yei ŋkiɛŋ Muuŋ a ŋa ŋ̀khwā, p̂əɨ yaʼo mbhɔ yu.” 
Pugu gha ndīi nɛ, ŋgwīʼi ki lɔ nuʼuŋ njəɨ shesheŋoŋ ŋkiɛŋ Jishɔ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nthɔ nshwiʼi mbra ghɔ nɛ, Jishɔ fɛ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa kiʼi pugu shwei shesheŋoŋ ni nnu ŋa pugu yəɨ, ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu nɛ. 
Pugu wɛ̄iŋ ndigi chrà ghɔ, nthɔ nchrā nu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Njiŋ kuʼɔ nu moŋ gu yei pɔ pi ŋa?” 
Pugu pie Jishɔ ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi chhu nu ŋa Elaija shi fǔoŋ nthɔ ŋkaoŋ?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini Elaija shi fǔoŋ nthɔ nɔ pīri nu pa nnu a kāʼo. Ndɔ a chwīe khɔ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi chhu ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi njəɨ ntou ŋgəʼɨ, ndɔ pi lāa vi? 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa Elaija kwo thɔ ŋgwa fāʼa mbɨŋ yu nɔ haʼaŋ pugu khwā nɛ, nɔ haʼaŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi chhu nthɛ vi nɛ.” 
Pugu ni ŋga mbɨnɨ, njəɨ pɨgəɨ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pugu pa ntou yú ŋgwa pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi lōu nu. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, ŋguoŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ gha njəɨ Jishɔ, ŋgrāo ti a ghaʼa, ntei ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ vi nchrā ghɔ. 
A pie ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pəɨ pugu lōu pi khɔ?” 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ moŋ yú ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Masha, ǹthɔ ni muuŋ a, njəɨ ghɔ nɔ ghɔ, ŋa miŋwɛiŋ pɔ mbɨŋ yu, nchwīe ŋa kiʼi a chrā. 
Sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa a ghà ncho vi nɛ, a ghà māʼaŋ vi shhɛ, faʼofaʼo taoŋ nu nchò yu, a kru shua yi, noŋ yi tii. Ǹchhu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ ŋa pugu fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ, pugu paʼo kie.” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Yo ŋgwrɛiŋgwa ki fāʼo piŋ, mi shi mbɔ pia pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Mi shi mfāʼo wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ ni pəɨ pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Pəɨ thɔ ni ju mfɛ vəɨ.” 
Pugu thɔ ni muuŋ ghɔ njəɨ vi nɔ, jijwɛ ghɔ gha njəɨ Jishɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ muuŋ ghɔ ni miprɨligi, a gū shhɛ ŋkə̄nə nu faʼofaʼo taoŋ nu nchò yu. 
Jishɔ pie tǎa muuŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Nnu yei kwo lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ mbɨŋ yu nɔ fɨʼɨ ndɨɨ nɛiŋ?” A khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Jɛ̄ kəʼɨ prɔ. 
A ghà njiɛŋ māʼaŋ vi kíe pugu pa mooŋ ŋkhǐ nɔ jwi nu mi. Ndɔ ä mbɔ ŋa minthɛ ɔ chwīe nnu, ɔ fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pigi ŋgɛ̄rɛ vigi!” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ chhu vəɨ ŋa, ‘Ä mbɔ ŋa minthɛ ɔ chwīe nnu?’ Sheshe nnu yīʼɛ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo piŋ nɛ.” 
Tǎa muuŋ ghɔ kiʼi ŋkəɨkəɨ ni njɨ ŋa, “Ooŋ m̀biŋ, ghɛ̄rɛ ki piŋ a!” 
Jishɔ gha njəɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ntou yú ŋgwa tei nthɔ nu taʼa lɨʼɨ nɛ, a pɨ̄ga jijwɛ ghɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Jijwɛ fhɨncho pugu pa fhɨtənə, taoŋ mbɨŋ yu ki lɔ ma nuʼuŋ nii mbɨŋ yu ŋkamuʼɔŋ.” 
Nɛnnɛ jijwɛ ghɔ kə̄ɨ ni njɨ, māʼaŋ vi moŋ ŋkiɛŋ miprɨligi, ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu. Muuŋ ghɔ pɔ nɔ khu ŋoŋ, nnɛ ntou yugu ni nchhu ŋa, “A khu!” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ wɛ̄iŋ vi ŋgɛ̄rɛ vi, a lɔllɔ tɔthɨ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nii nda, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ mbie vi ŋa, “A ni nchwīe khɔ pigi fuʼu kikie?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Yaoŋ ŋa minthɛ a fuʼu yei ŋkwaŋ nɛ wuʼɔ luoŋ.” 
Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi lɔllɔ fɔ ntiri moŋ Galili. Paʼa a lɔ njiʼi ntāʼa nu ŋa shesheŋoŋ ji, 
nthɛ ŋa a ni nthɔ njɛʼi ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pi shi nchaʼa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua mfɛ liɛŋ mbhɔ ŋgwamishua pugu njwi vi. Pi gha njwi vi, a laʼa trɛi llɛ́, a kuʼɔ.” 
Ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ njiʼi nji njiŋ chrà yei, ndɔ mbɔgɔ nɔ pie nu vi nɔ ghɔ. 
Pugu ghə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ Kapanuŋ, a gha nii nda, mbie ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pəɨ ni nthɔ nchrā pi khɔ shɛndaoŋ?” 
Pugu lɛrɛ pi laŋ nthɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋga mbɔ shɛndaoŋ, ndōu nu ni noŋ pugu ŋa a gɔ̌ mbɔ ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ nchaa pichəɨ ghao. 
A chɔchɔ shhɛ, mɛ̄iŋ paanchrɔ pighɔ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “S̈hesheŋoŋ vəɨ ntāʼa nu mbɔ nthishɨ, a pie ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ noŋ yi nɔ miŋkwasha, mbɔ nɔ muuŋ fàʼa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ghao.” 
A lɔ̄gɔ muuŋ mbrɔ ntigi vi shɨna pugu, mbaŋ vi, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ taʼa mikəʼɨ nɔ yei nthɛ a nɛ piŋ pi mmu, ki shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ a nɛ lɔ mbiŋ pi mmu, a piŋ pi ŋoŋ ŋa a taoŋ a nɛ.” 
Jouŋ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, pigi yəɨ yichəɨ ŋoŋ a fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ ni ligi yɔ, pigi ka nɔ lāa nu ghɔ nthɛ ŋa pigi pugu lɔ nthɔ njōu njiŋ yɔ kaʼa.” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ lāa ghɔ, nthɛ ŋa mbaʼa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chwīe nnu ghraoghrao ni ligi a nɛ pɨnɨ ŋkara nchrā nnu pɨphɨ nthɛ a. 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ ndāa via nɛ, pɔ ŋgei pia. 
Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a fɛ ndua ŋkhǐ ŋa pəɨ nnu nthɛ ŋa pəɨ yi Krishto nɛ, nthɛ paʼa a lɔ shiɛŋ kɨ̀nɛiŋ yi. 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chwīe muuŋ mi muuŋ vei ŋa a piŋ a nɛ gū moŋ phɨ nɛ, a nì mbwa pi chu mmɛ ŋgùʼɔ wuʼɔ yaoŋ nɔ mmi yi njīe vi ŋkhǐ, nchaa ŋa a thi sháʼa shhɨ Minnwi. 
Ti m̈bhɔ yəɨ nchwīe pəɨ gū moŋ phɨ, pəɨ yaʼa mīʼaŋ. A pwa pəɨ nii moŋ chɔmbhi nɔ ŋkwíni nchaa fāʼo nu paa mbhɔ yɔ ndɔ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ, mbɔ móŋoŋ ki phɛ, 
lɨʼɨ ŋa mbaʼa nthrɨshie khu, ndɔ mbaʼa móŋoŋ lɛ ma mbhɛ nɛ. 
Ti k̈wo yɔ nchwīe ɔ gū moŋ phɨ, ɔ yaʼa mīʼaŋ, nthɛ ŋa a pwa ɔ nii moŋ chɔmbhi nɔ ŋkwíni nchaa ŋa pi māʼaŋ ghɔ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ ni paa kwò yɔ, 
lɨʼɨ ŋa mbaʼa nthrɨshie khu, ndɔ mbaʼa móŋoŋ lɛ ma mbhɛ nɛ. 
Ti l̈igi yɔ nchwīe ɔ gū moŋ phɨ, ɔ fīʼa mfuʼu mīʼaŋ, a pwa nɔ nii nu moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi ni taʼa ligi nchaa ŋa pi māʼaŋ ghɔ moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ ni paa ligi yɔ, 
lɨʼɨ ŋa mbaʼa nthrɨshie khu, ndɔ mbaʼa móŋoŋ lɛ ma mbhɛ nɛ. 
“Pi shi niʼiŋ móŋoŋ mbɨŋ shesheŋoŋ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pi ghà niʼiŋ khí moŋ yaoŋ nɛ. 
Khí pwa, ndɔ g̈hrɨ́ yi nɔ chwīe nu yaoŋ pwa mbhɛ, ɔ pɨnɨ ŋkwəɨ ni ghrɨ́ yi ghɔ pi nɛiŋ? A yiʼi ŋa pəɨ pɔ nɔ khí ni noŋ pəɨ, nchhɔ moŋ taʼaŋggi pəɨ pa ŋgwa.” 
﻿Maaku.
10.
Jishɔ lɔllɔ Kapanuŋ ŋgə̄ɨ krao ŋgei Judia, ntiri Jodaŋ, yú ŋgwa pɨnɨ ŋkɨrɨ yəɨ yu ŋkamuʼɔŋ. Nɔ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ yi ni mbɔ nɛ, a jɛ̄ nthɔ njɛʼi vugu. 
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa Farashi thɔ mbara Jishɔ ntāʼa nu mōoŋ vi, mbie ŋa, “Gɨ́ Mushi piŋ ŋa ŋoŋ nthɛ a shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Mushi ni nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa moŋ gɨ́?” 
Pugu chhu, “Mushi ni mieŋ ŋa ŋoŋ nāʼaŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ shāaŋ láŋ mfɛ ni ŋgwɛ vi, mfuʼu vi ŋa a ghə̄ɨ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “A ni nāʼaŋ yie kɨ̀na mfɛ ni pəɨ nthɛ pi ŋa thɔ yəɨ tɨnɨ ni njɨ. 
Ndɔ nɔ njɛ̄ ndɨɨ ŋa pi ni mbuoŋ mbhi nɛ, ‘Minnwi ni nchwīe pi mimbia pugu miŋgwɛ.’ 
‘Nthɛ yie ghɔ, mimbia shi mieŋ tǎa vi pugu mǔuŋ vi, nchīni pugu ŋgwɛ vi. 
Paa ŋgwa pighɔ chīni ŋgū taʼa frɛinoŋ.’ Nnɛ pugu lɔ nuʼuŋ mbiʼi yi paa, pugu pɔ pi taʼa yi. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, yaoŋ ŋa Minnwi chīni nɛ, kiʼi ŋoŋ shɛ̄rɛ.” 
Pugu pugu gha mbɨnɨ nda pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pɨnɨ mbie vi ni nnu yei. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi ndaŋ yi nduoŋ nɛ chwīe phɨ mbɨŋ ŋgwɛ vi. Mbɔ phɨ shúoŋ. 
Ti m̈iŋgwɛ nshāaŋ láŋ pugu ndaoŋ vi, ndaŋ ŋoŋ nduoŋ kaŋ a kwo shúoŋ.” 
Pa ŋgwa ni nthɔ nu ni pa puoŋ ŋa a kāoŋ vugu, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pɨ̄ga ŋgwa pighɔ. 
Jishɔ gha njəɨ, mbɨgɨ túa nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ mieŋ puoŋ pighɔ thɔ njəɨ a, kiʼi pəɨ pɔ kɨʼɨŋgɨnɨ ni pugu nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pɔ pi ni ŋkwaŋ ŋgwa pei. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi moŋ chɔmbhi yi nɔ muuŋ mbrɔ nɛ nthɛ paʼa a lɔ nii moŋ ghɔ.” 
A paŋ vugu nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ shesheŋoŋ vugu, mfɛ mbɔrɔ ni pugu. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ndhɔ nyìeŋ nɛ, ŋoŋ chəɨ tei ŋkuʼɔ ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ yu, mbie vi ŋa, “Ŋkiɛŋ Masha, a yiʼi ŋa ǹchwīe khɔ nɔ fāʼo nu chɔmbhi ki mmɛ?” 
Jishɔ pie ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ mɛ̄iŋ a ni ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ nthɛ khɔ? A wuʼɔ Minnwi mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ. 
Ɔ ji yaoŋ ŋa pa kɨ̀na chhu nɛ, ‘Kiʼi njwi ŋoŋ, kiʼi ŋgaŋ láŋ kwoshuoŋ, kiʼi njōo, kiʼi ŋkwe ntie ŋoŋ ni mbe, kiʼi nchīgi, yaʼo nchò tǎa ghɔ pugu muuŋ ghɔ.’ ” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Masha, ŋguoŋ kɨ̀na pei ŋ̀kwo nūʼɔŋ llɔ ndɨɨ ŋa mi ni mbɔ maʼaŋ mikhwa nɛ.” 
Jishɔ līi vi, mfāʼo khwā mbɨŋ yu, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ pou taʼa yaoŋ. Ghə̄ɨ fīni ŋguoŋ maoŋ pɔ ghao ŋgrā ni ghaŋ pou, kaŋ fāʼo yɔ shi mbɔ po, nnɛ nthɔ njōu njiŋ a.” 
A ni ŋga njaʼo yei nnu, noŋ yi shwiʼi, a ghə̄ɨ moŋ pəʼɨ njùʼɔ nthɛ ŋa a ni mfāʼo ŋgaʼa. 
Jishɔ kara ligi mbɛʼi pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “A ya ŋgaʼa ni ghaŋ fàʼo nɔ mieŋ nu Minnwi shaʼa fùoŋ yi moŋ chɔmbhi yugu.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ghrāo pa chrà pi pei ndɔ Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nchhu ŋa, “Pa puoŋ paŋ, a ya ŋgaʼa nɔ nii nu moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi. 
A yīʼɛ ni minyieŋləɨ nɔ tɔgɔ nu moŋ mbo mitaʼa nchaa ŋgaŋ fàʼo nɔ mieŋ nu Minnwi shaʼa fùoŋ yi moŋ chɔmbhi yi.” 
Pugu ghrāo ti a ghaʼa, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ti minthɛ a lūgu gɔ̌ kiʼɛ?” 
Jishɔ pɛʼi vugu nchhu ŋa, “Minthɛ paʼa a lɔ mfāʼa ni ŋgwamishua ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋgaʼa pi ni Minnwi. Ŋguoŋ pa nnu ghao yīʼɛ ni Minnwi.” 
Pita jɛ̄ nthɔ nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, pigi mieŋ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ghao njōu njiŋ yɔ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ njiʼi mbɔ fɔ ŋa ä mieŋ mbaanda yi, ki lǐŋ pi pi pimbia pugu pa piŋgɛ, ki mǔuŋ vi, ki tǎa vi, ki puoŋ pi, ki nyìeŋ yi, nthɛ a pugu pa nthɛ ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ, 
ŋa mbaʼa a yiʼi mieŋ ki fāʼo pa nda, pa lǐŋ pi pi pimbia pugu pa piŋgɛ, pa mǔuŋ, pa puoŋ, pa nyìeŋ, a yiɛŋ ti mbɔ ŋkɨɨ ŋgɛ́ moŋ yei chɔmbhi ndɔ mbɨnɨ mfāʼo ŋgəʼɨ ŋa pi shi mfɛ ghɔ nthɛ a. Moŋ mbhi yɛ ŋa a thɔ nu nɛ, a pɨnɨ mfāʼo chɔmbhi ki mmɛ. 
Ndɔ ntou ŋgwa ŋa pugu thi shhɨ nɛ shi mbɔ ndugwi njiŋ, pa ndugwi njiŋ thi shhɨ.” 
Pugu ni mbɔ shɛndaoŋ ŋkuʼɔ nu Jerushalɛiŋ, Jishɔ nyīeŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ pugu. Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ghrāo, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthɔ nu njiŋ pugu nɛ. Ŋkamuʼɔŋ Jishɔ kɨrɨ paanchrɔ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi lɨʼɨ təʼɨ vugu, nchhu pa nnu ŋa a shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ mbɨŋ yu nɛ ni pugu, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ līi njəɨ, pia kuʼɔ nu Jerushalɛiŋ pi chaʼa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua mfɛ mbhɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi, pi fɛ njɔ́ gu ghɔ nchaʼa vi mfɛ ni ŋgwa taoŋ nduoŋ. 
Pugu lɛ māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ, nthu thwɛ mbɨŋ yu, ŋgwie vi, njwi vi, a gha ndaʼa trɛi llɛ́, a pɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ.” 
Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ, mbɔ pa puoŋ Shebedi thɔ njəɨ Jishɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, pigi tāʼa nu ŋa ɔ chwīe nnu yɛ ŋa pigi shi mbie vɛ nɛ ni pigi.” 
A pie vugu ŋa, “Pəɨ tāʼa nu ŋa ǹchwīe khɔ mfɛ ni pəɨ?” 
Pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Fɛ shɨna ni pigi, pigi chhɔ yəɨ ghɔ, taʼa ŋoŋ vigi ŋgei mbɔ yɔ yi jɨ, yichəɨ taʼa yi ŋgei mbɔ ŋkwrɛi yɔ, ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ pɔ moŋ ndighaʼo yɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ nji yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ pie nu nɛ. Minthɛ pəɨ nnu ndua ŋgəʼɨ ŋa shi nnu nɛ? Ki ŋkwe ŋkwaŋ kwe ŋkhǐ yɛ ŋa a yiʼi ŋa ŋkwe nɛ?” 
Pugu khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ooŋ, pinthɛ pigi tɔgɔ moŋ ghɔ.” Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ndua ŋgəʼɨ ŋa ǹshi nnu nɛ pəɨ shi nnu, kwe ŋkhǐ ŋa ǹshi ŋkwe nɛ pəɨ kwe. 
Ndɔ nɔ chhɔ nu ŋgei mbhɔ a yi jɨ ki ŋgei ŋkwrɛi, a lɔ njiʼi mbɔ lɨʼɨ a nɔ fɛ nu. A pɔ pi ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa Minnwi kwo pīri ni pugu nɛ.” 
Ndɔ pɨgəɨ wuŋ ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, mfāʼo pɨgɨtua mbɨŋ Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ. 
Jishɔ gɛ̄ vugu pugu thɔ njəɨ vi, a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ji ŋa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi ji vugu ŋa a ghaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa moŋ mbhi nɛ ghà nshaʼa ŋgwa pugu shaʼa, pa mɛmmɛ ŋgwa pugu nōoŋ pi nnu ghrɨ́ ni pugu. 
Ndɔ mbaʼa a yiʼi mbɔ pi nnɛ ni pəɨ. Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu nɔ pɔ nu ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ shɨna pəɨ nɛ fāʼo nɔ pɔ nu muuŋ fàʼa vəɨ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu mbɔ nthishɨ shɨna pəɨ nɛ fāʼo nɔ pɔ nu ŋkǔna ŋguoŋ ŋgwa. 
Nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shini ndɔ njiʼi nthɔ pi ŋa pi fāʼa mbɔ yu, a ni nthɔ pi nɔ fāʼa nu mbhɔ ŋgwa, ndɔ mfɛ chɔmbhi yi nɔ nchúoŋ thɔ ntou ŋgwa.” 
Pugu thɔ Jeriko, Jishɔ lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pugu pa mmɛ yú ŋgwa, ŋgaŋ luoŋ chəɨ mbɔ nchriligi, ligi yi pɔ Batimau, muuŋ Timau, chhɔ ŋkɨŋ shɛndaoŋ. 
A ni ŋga njaʼo ŋa a Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ ntɔgɔ nu, a jɛ̄ paʼo nu ŋgòu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Jishɔ, Muuŋ Devi, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu!” 
Ntou ŋgwa pɨ̄ga vi, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa a lɛrɛ laŋ. A ka mīʼɛŋ mbaʼo pi ŋgòu ni njɨ mbīgi, “Muuŋ Devi, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu!” 
Jishɔ tithi nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ mɛ̄iŋ vi hɛiŋ.” Nɛnnɛ pugu mɛ̄iŋ nchriligi ghɔ, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, “Wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ yɔ, lɔllɔ tɔthɨ, a thɔ nɛ mɛ̄iŋ ghɔ.” 
A mīʼaŋ mmɛ ndhwí yi, ndhi tɔthɨ nthɔ njəɨ Jishɔ. 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa ǹchwīe nɛiŋ vɛ?” Nchriligi ghɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, ǹtāʼa nu mbɨnɨ njəɨ lɨʼɨ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ghə̄ɨ ni gɔ, piŋ yɔ chwīe ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ tɔgɔ.” Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, ligi yi chuʼɔ a yōu njiŋ Jishɔ shɛndaoŋ. 
﻿Maaku.
11.
Pugu ni ŋga mbara nu Jerushalɛiŋ, ŋkɨŋ Bɛfɛgɛ pugu Betani ŋkuoŋ Mbra pa Thɨ Olive nɛ, Jishɔ taoŋ paa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, 
nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ muuŋ laʼataoŋ yinɛ shhɨ pəɨ nɛ, wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ nii nɛ, pəɨ shi njəɨ muuŋ mi ŋkwɛ́iŋ pi chu ŋa ŋoŋ shi lɔ naa nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ yu. Pəɨ fēi nthɔ nɔ ghɔ. 
S̈hesheŋoŋ nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ fēi nu ŋa?’ pəɨ chhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ fāʼo fàʼa nɔ ghɔ, a shi mbɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nduʼu hɛnɛiŋ nɔ kuo ndɨɨ.’ ” 
Pugu lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ, njəɨ muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ pi chu chonda mbhi ŋkɨŋ shɛndaoŋ, pugu fēi. 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ pie ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ chwīe pi khɔ? Pəɨ fēi pi ŋkwɛ́iŋ yinɛ?” 
Pugu chhu nnu ŋa Jishɔ ni nshwei vugu nɛ ni pugu, ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu ni nju fɔ nɛ mieŋ vugu pugu ghə̄ɨ. 
Pugu thɔ ni muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ ghɔ mfɛ ni Jishɔ, māʼaŋ pa mɛmmɛ ndhwí pugu ŋkuoŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ ghɔ, Jishɔ chhɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ. 
Ntou ŋgwa shɛ̄iŋ pa mɛmmɛ ndhwí pugu shɛndaoŋ, pichəɨ shɛ̄iŋ pa mbhɔthɨ ni fhɔthɨ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ ŋa pugu ni njaʼa moŋ pa nyìeŋ. 
Pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ shhɨ nɛ pugu pa pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ njiŋ nɛ paʼo ŋgòu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ndighaʼo pɔ ni Minnwi, mbɔrɔ pɔ ni ju ŋa a thɔ nɔ ligi Taathɔ nɛ! 
Minnwi nūʼɔŋ mbɔrɔ yi ŋkuoŋ Shaʼafuoŋ fùoŋ Devi tǎa via, ŋa a thɔ nu nɛ. Ndighaʼo pɔ ni Minnwi ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ.” 
A nii Jerushalɛiŋ, ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ Nda Minnwi, ŋga ndīi ŋguoŋ yaoŋ nɔ haʼaŋ njiʼa ni ŋkwo tɔgɔ nɛ, ntaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ Betani pugu pa paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi. 
Mbhi ni ŋga ndaŋ, nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni ŋkwəɨ nu llɔ Betani nɛ, njì yia Jishɔ. 
A thi hini njiʼɛ njəɨ thɨ ŋa a ghà njuŋ nɛ a ya ntəʼɨ, a ghə̄ɨ nɔ yəɨ nu ŋa minthɛ a fāʼo ntíɛŋ llɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ. A gha nthɔ nchəɨŋ yəɨ thɨ ghɔ, paʼa ndɔ njəɨ sheshe yaoŋ ŋkiɛŋ pa fhɔthɨ, nthɛ ŋa a shini ndɔ mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pa thɨ ghɔ ghà njuŋ nɛ. 
A chhu ni thɨ ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi ŋoŋ ma nuʼuŋ njɨ ntíɛŋ llɔ mbɨŋ ghɔ.” Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi yaʼo. 
Pugu ni ŋga nchəɨŋ Jerushalɛiŋ, Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ Nda Minnwi njōu ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni mfīni yaoŋ pugu pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njuoŋ nu Nda Minnwi nɛ, nshrī taprɛi ghaŋ kwri mbɨŋ pugu pa ghaŋ fīni mintuʼɔlibuŋ, 
paʼa ndɔ nuʼuŋ mbiŋ ŋa shesheŋoŋ mfɛ a tiɛŋ yaoŋ ntiri nɔ yɨna Nda Minnwi. 
A ni nthɔ njɛʼi vugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pi shi lɔ nāʼaŋ ŋa, ‘Pi shi mɛ̄iŋ nda a ni nda luoŋ Minnwi ni ŋguoŋ pa taoŋ taoŋ ghao,’ ndɔ pəɨ kara a gū pùo pa ŋgɨna minwi.” 
Nnɛ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi yaʼo nthɔ ntāʼa shɛndaoŋ njwi vi, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔgɔ vi, nthɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ fɔ nɛ ni ŋgrāo ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ. 
Fanaoŋ ni ŋga nthɔ, pugu taoŋ moŋ laʼa. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni ntɔgɔ nu ni tutuʼu nɛ, pugu yəɨ thɨ wùnu yɛ, a kwo yaoŋ ti nshwiʼi nchəɨŋ moŋ ŋǐeŋ pi. 
Pita kwiŋ, nchhu ŋa, “Masha, līi njəɨ! Thɨ wùnu yɛ ŋa ɔ ni nchɔ̄nɔ nɛ kwo yaoŋ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo piŋ mbɨŋ Minnwi. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shi nchhu ni mbra yei ŋa, ‘Lɔllɔ tɔthɨ ŋgū moŋ ŋkhǐ’, ki lɔ mfāʼo khuthɔ moŋ njùʼɔ yu nɛ, ndɔ mbiŋ ŋa nnu ŋa a chhu nɛ shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, pi shi nchwīe mfɛ ghɔ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹshwei vəɨ, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ pie moŋ luoŋ Minnwi nɛ, pəɨ mfāʼo piŋ ŋa pəɨ kwo fāʼo yaoŋ ghɔ, kaŋ a shi mbɔ yəɨ. 
Ndɔ sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ tithi nduoŋ Minnwi nɛ, ɔ̈ mfāʼo sheshe yaoŋ moŋ njùʼɔ ghɔ nthɛ yichəɨ ŋoŋ, ɔ līʼɛ phɨ yi, nnɛ ŋa Tǎa ghɔ ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ ŋkaa yu nthɛ a līʼɛ jɔ phɨ.” 
Ndɔ p̈əɨ mieŋ ki lɔ njiʼi ndīʼɛ phɨ yichəɨ ŋoŋ, kaŋ mbaʼa Tǎa vəɨ po līʼɛ pa yəɨ phɨ. 
Pugu pɨnɨ nthɔ Jerushalɛiŋ. Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nyīeŋ nu Nda Minnwi nɛ, pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi thɔ mbara vi, 
nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ fāʼo pi yəɨ ghrɨ́ nɔ chwīe nu pa nnu pei ki a fɛ gɔ̌ ghrɨ́ yei vɛ nɔ chwīe nu pa nnu pei nɔ ghɔ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ǹshi mbie vəɨ ni taʼa píe, p̈əɨ mfɛ khwɛ̀ vəɨ, ǹshwei vəɨ ni yɛ ghrɨ́ ŋa ǹchwīe nnu pei nɔ nɛ. 
Pəɨ shwei a, Jouŋ ni ŋkwe ghrɨ́ nɔ fɛ nu ŋkhǐ pi llɔ mbhɔ Minnwi ki ŋgwamishua?” 
Pugu chrā nnu ghɔ ni noŋ pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “P̈ia nchhu ŋa, ‘Llɔ mbhɔ Minnwi’, a chhu ŋa, ‘Ti a ni nchwīe khɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ mbiŋ Jouŋ?’ 
Ti p̈ia nchhu ŋa, ‘A llɔ pi mbhɔ ŋgwamishua?’ ” nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nthɔ mbɔgɔ pa ŋgwa nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ni nji ŋa Jouŋ ni nja mbɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi. 
Nnɛ pugu khwɛ̄ ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Pigi lɔ nji.” Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kaŋ mbaʼa mummu ŋkaa mu shwei vəɨ ni lɨʼɨ ŋa ghrɨ́ a lɔ nɛ.” 
﻿Maaku.
12.
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ nchrā nu ni pugu moŋ luʼɔ chrà. “Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni ma mbhī faaŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ yi, ŋkrao ŋkaʼa ŋgɨ̄ŋ nɔ ghɔ, ntou ŋkuʼɔ nɨ̄ɨ ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ ŋkhǐ yi taoŋ nɔ chwīe nu laʼo, ndɔ ŋkrao muuŋ nda tɔthɨ nɔ chhɔ nu fɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi nyìeŋ. Nnɛ mfɛ ni ghaŋ fàʼa ŋa pugu lɨna nɔ ghɔ ŋga ŋkwōo maoŋ pugu pugu ghrā, ndhɔ kiʼɛ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼataoŋ nduoŋ. 
Ndɨɨ ni ŋga ŋkāʼo nɔ kwōo nu ntíɛŋ thɨ yɛ, Ŋoŋ ghɔ taoŋ muuŋ fàʼa ni pa ghaŋ fàʼa pɛ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ ŋkwe ji ghrà ntíɛŋ thɨ ghɔ. 
Ndɔ pa ghaŋ fàʼa pighɔ wie muuŋ fàʼa yi ghɔ nduʼu vi ni mbhɔ yó. 
“A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ntaoŋ muuŋ fàʼa nduoŋ, pugu wie vi nɔ thɔ yi, nchwīe nnu lrithɔ mbɨŋ yu. 
A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ntaoŋ yichəɨ pugu jwi vi, ŋguʼɔ nchwīe mbɨŋ ntou pichəɨ pi nɛnnɛ, ŋgwie pichəɨ, njwi pichəɨ. 
A pɨnɨ mfāʼo taʼa ŋoŋ ŋa a nthɛ a taoŋ, mbɔ muuŋ vi ŋa a khwā nɛ, ndugwi yi a taoŋ vi ni pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Pugu shi mfāʼo pɔgɔ yɔ.’ 
“Ndɔ ghaŋ fàʼa pighɔ chhu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, ‘Yei njɨnda yi, pia chīri njwi vi maoŋ pi gū yia!’ 
Pugu wɛ̄iŋ vi, njwi vi, mfuʼu khu yi moŋ nyìeŋ mīʼaŋ. 
“Ti ŋgaŋ nyìeŋ ghɔ shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ kiʼɛ? A shi nthɔ njwi pa ghaŋ fàʼa pighɔ, mfɛ faaŋ ghɔ ni ŋgwa nduoŋ. 
Pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ lɨʼɨ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi yei ŋa a chhu ŋa, ‘Ŋgùʼɔ yɛ ŋa ghaŋ nūʼɔŋ nda ni ndāa ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo ghɛ̀rɛ nɛ pɨnɨ nɛ ŋkara ju mbɔ ndugwi ŋguʼɔ shiʼi nchaa ŋguoŋ yi. 
Yei fàʼa Taathɔ ndɔ mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ nnu ghraoghrao ligi pigi’?” 
Pa thishɨ ŋgwa Juu pighɔ ni nthɔ ntāʼa shɛndaoŋ nɔ wɛ̄iŋ nu mi, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nji ŋa a chhu luʼɔ chrà yei nthɛ pi pugu, ndɔ pugu fāʼo pɔgɔ gu nthɛ yú ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni mbɔ fɔ nɛ, nnɛ mieŋ vi ŋgə̄ɨ ni vugu. 
Pugu taoŋ pa pichəɨ ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa pichəɨ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Hɛrɔ, ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ mbīri Jishɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi ni pa nnu ŋa a shi nchhu nɛ. 
Pugu thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, pigi ji ŋa ɔ ghà nchrā nnu shini ki lɔ ndīi pi nnu ŋa ŋgwa pīʼi nu nɛ, ɔ shiʼa nōoŋ shieligi ni shesheŋoŋ, ɔ ghà njɛʼi nnu ŋa Minnwi tāʼa nu ŋa ŋgwa chwīe nɛ moŋ ndɨndɨ. A kāʼo ŋa pi pe taashi ni Kaisha ki ŋga? Pigi pe ki kiʼi pigi pe?” 
Ndɔ Jishɔ kwo yəɨ mbe yugu, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ mōoŋ a ŋa? Pəɨ thɔ ni taʼa ndigi mbɨŋ nōoŋ njəɨ.” 
Pugu thɔ ni taʼa yi. A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Yei thɔ gɔ̌ pugu ligi gɔ̌ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ?” Pugu khwɛ̄ ŋa, “A yi Kaisha.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ fɛ yaoŋ ŋa a yi Kaisha nɛ ni Kaisha, mfɛ yi Minnwi ni Minnwi.” 
Pa ŋgwa Shadushi, ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi ŋa ŋoŋ shiʼa ŋkhu mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ thɔ mbara Jishɔ, mbie vi ŋa, 
“Masha, Mushi ni nāʼaŋ gɨ́ yei mfɛ ni pigi ŋa, ŋoŋ ŋkhu mieŋ ŋgwɛ vi ki lɔ mfāʼo muuŋ, a yiʼi ŋa ndǐŋ vi, yi mimbia, tiʼi ndɔ̄gɔ ŋkugu ghɔ mbhi puoŋ nɔ ghɔ nɔ ligi ndǐŋ vi. 
Pa lǐŋ pichəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ pi khwachəɨ mbɔ pimbia, fǔoŋ yi laŋ, ŋkhu ki lɔ mfāʼo puoŋ, 
mbra yi laŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ, ŋkhu ki lɔ mfāʼo puoŋ. Yichəɨ mbra yi wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ. 
Ti ŋguoŋ yugu pi khwachəɨ khu ki lɔ mfāʼo puoŋ. Ndugwi yi miŋgwɛ ghɔ khu ŋkaa yu. 
Ndwɛ, a lɛ ŋga mbɔ ndɨɨ yɛ ŋa ŋgwa lɛ mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ, miŋgwɛ ghɔ pɔ pi yi gɔ̌, ŋa ŋguoŋ yugu pi khwachəɨ ni ŋkwo laŋ vi nɛ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Yei lɔ mbɔ nnu ŋa a chwīe pəɨ fāaŋ nɛ? Nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɔ nji Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nji ghrɨ́ Minnwi. 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋgwa ghà ŋga ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu paʼa ndɔ ndaŋ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋgə̄ɨ láŋ, mbɔ pi nɔ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi po. 
“Ndɔ nthɛ nnu ŋgwa nɔ khu nu mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ moŋ gu, pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Mushi moŋ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ a chrà nɔ nnu móŋoŋ thɔ muuŋ thɨ yuyuʼu nɛ, ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Minnwi ni nchrā ni Mushi fɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Mi Minnwi Abrahaŋ, mbɔ Minnwi Aiji, ni Minnwi Jakɔ?’ 
A lɔ njiʼi mbɔ pi Minnwi ŋgwa khu, a pɔ pi yi ŋgwa maoŋ. Pəɨ ya fāaŋ.” 
Yichəɨ taʼa masha pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi, ŋa a ni nthi fɔ njaʼo nnu ŋa pugu ni nchrā nu nɛ, gha njəɨ ŋa Jishɔ ŋkhwɛ̄ pa nnu pighɔ shiʼi, mbie vi ŋa, “A yəɨ kɨ̀na ŋa a chaa ŋguoŋ yi ghao?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Yei kɨ̀na ŋa a chaa ŋguoŋ yi nɛ, ‘Yaʼo, ma Ishrae, Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yia wuʼɔ ju təʼɨ vi mbɔ Taathɔ. 
A yiʼi ŋa ɔ khwā Taathɔ, mbɔ Minnwi yɔ, ni ŋguoŋ njùʼɔ yɔ ghao, ni ŋguoŋ nchə̌ɨ yɔ ghao, ni ŋguoŋ kwāʼa nu yɔ ghao, ni ŋguoŋ ghrɨ́ yɔ ghao.’ 
Mbra yi pɔ yei, ‘Ɔ shi ŋkhwā taakuo yɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ khwā noŋ yɔ nɛ.’ Yichəɨ kɨ̀na nduoŋ lɔ nuʼuŋ mbɔ fɔ ŋa a chaa pa pei.” 
Ŋgaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ chhu a kāʼo, ma Masha. Ɔ ya nchhu shini ŋa Minnwi wuʼɔ ju təʼɨ vi ndɔ paʼa yichəɨ lɔ mbɔ nɔ Ju. 
A yiʼi ŋa ɔ khwā vi ni ŋguoŋ njùʼɔ yɔ pugu pa ŋguoŋ kwāʼa nu mɔ, ni ŋguoŋ ghrɨ́ yɔ ndɔ ŋkhwā taakuo yɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ khwā noŋ yɔ nɛ. A pwa paa kɨ̀na yei nchaa fɛ nu minyieŋ ŋkuoŋ lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa maoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nduoŋ ni Minnwi.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njəɨ ŋa a khwɛ̄ ni shiethɔ, a chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ kwo para mieŋ nu Minnwi shaʼa fùoŋ yi moŋ chɔmbhi yɔ.” Jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ghɔ, paʼa shesheŋoŋ lɔ nuʼuŋ moŋ mbie vi ni sheshe píe. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni njɛʼi nu Nda Minnwi nɛ, a ni mbie ŋa, “Mimfɛ pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi kie pi nɛiŋ nchhu ŋa Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ pɔ pi muuŋ Devi? 
Jijwɛ Minnwi ni ŋkaoŋ njùʼɔ Devi a chhu ŋa, ‘Minnwi Taathɔ chhu ni Taathɔ a ŋa, “Chhɔ hɛiŋ ŋgei mbhɔ a yi jɨ ti ǹshi nuʼuŋ nchwīe pa mbɨ̌na pɔ gū yaoŋ tigi kwò yɔ.” ’ 
Nduthɔ Devi mɛ̄iŋ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ ni Taathɔ vi, a nthɛ a kie pi nɛiŋ mbɔ muuŋ vi?” Mmɛ kɨrɨ ŋgwa pighɔ yaʼo nnu ŋa Jishɔ ni nchhu nɛ ni pwanjuʼɔ. 
Moŋ nnu ŋa Jishɔ ni njɛʼi nu nɛ, a ni nchhu ŋa, “P̂əɨ lɨna pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi a pwa, pugu khwā nɔ nyīeŋ nu moŋ pa mɛmmɛ ndrawaʼa ndɔ ŋkhwā ŋa pi tuʼu noŋ nchrā ni pugu lɨʼɨ kaʼa, 
ŋkhwā chhɔ nu nɔ pa lɨʼɨ liɛŋ moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi pugu pa lɨʼɨ jɨ. 
Pugu ghà nchīgi pa piŋgɛ kugu ŋkwe maoŋ pugu, luoŋ Minnwi yugu shɨga ni njɨ nnɛ ŋa ŋgwa yəɨ vugu nɔ pa ŋgwa taoŋtaoŋ. Yugu ŋgəʼɨ shi mbɔ yi wuwuru.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchhɔ yəɨ ŋkùŋ niʼiŋ pa yaoŋ fɛ́ Nda Minnwi nɛ, a ni chhɔ mbɛʼi ŋgwa nɔ haʼaŋ pugu niʼiŋ mbɨŋ moŋ ŋkùŋ niʼiŋ pa yaoŋ fɛ́ nɛ. 
Ntou pa ghaŋ fāʼo ni nthɔ niʼiŋ ntou mɛmmɛ mbɨŋ moŋ ŋkùŋ ghɔ. Miŋgwɛ ŋkugu chəɨ ŋa a ki ya mbou niʼiŋ paa puoŋ mi mbɨŋ ŋa p̈i nchīri a pɔ nɔ taʼa ndola. 
A mɛ̄iŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi yəɨ yu nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, miŋgwɛ ŋkugu vei ŋa a pɔ pi mbou nɛ, fɛ nchaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu niʼiŋ pa mbɨŋ moŋ ŋkùŋ yaoŋ fɛ́ nɛ, 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa nduoŋ fuʼu maoŋ fɛ yugu shɨna ntou maoŋ ŋa pugu fāʼo nɛ, ndɔ miŋgwɛ vei moŋ pou yi fɛ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ŋa a fāʼo nɔ yru nu ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nɛ.” 
﻿Maaku.
13.
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni ntaoŋ nu Nda Minnwi nɛ, taʼa pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, līi njəɨ pa ŋgùʼɔ pwapwa pugu pa nda pwapwa njəɨ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ yəɨ mbwambwa nda pei? Mbaʼa taʼa ŋgùʼɔ nuʼuŋ nūaŋ ŋkuoŋ ndǐŋ vi ki pi lɔ mbūo mfɛ shhɛ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nchɔchhɔ ŋkuoŋ Mbra pa Thɨ Olive njiɛŋ pɨprəɨ llɔ yəɨ Nda Minnwi nɛ, Pita ni Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ ni Andru pie vi njiŋnjiŋ ŋa, 
“Shwei vigi pa nnu pei shi mbɔ pi ndɨɨ khɔ? Pa lì nɔ nōoŋ nu ndɨɨ ŋa nnu pei shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ pɔ pa khɔ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɨna nu, kiʼi ŋoŋ fɨ̄ɨ vəɨ. 
Ntou ŋgwa shi nthɔ nɔ ligi a, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘A mmu mbɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ!’ mfɨ̄ɨ ntou ŋgwa. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ yaʼo pi thɔ māʼaŋ nchhɔ ki pa pishaʼakhɔ nnu nchhɔ̀, kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu. A yiʼi ŋa ŋkwaŋ nnu pei shi ŋguʼɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ndɔ a lɔ naa mbɔ ndugwi mbhi yaʼa. 
Pa laʼataoŋ shi ndɔllɔ māʼaŋ pichəɨ ni nchhɔ̀, ŋgwa yichəɨ taʼa fùoŋ māʼaŋ ŋgwa yichəɨ ni nchhɔ̀. Shhɛ shi nchɨʼɨ ti shɨna moŋ pa lɨʼɨlɨʼɨ, njì gū. Pa nnu pei pɔ pi nɔ haʼaŋ muuŋ ghà njɛ̄ naoŋ nu miŋgwɛ shūu nɛ. 
“Ndɔ p̂əɨ chhɔ ni lɨna məɨ. Nthɛ ŋa pi shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ shhɨ pa kúŋ, ŋgwie vəɨ moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi, ntigi vəɨ pəɨ thi sháʼa shhɨ pa ghaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa pugu pa fùoŋ nthɛ a ŋa pəɨ pɔ pa miŋkwentie paŋ shhɨ pugu. 
Ndɔ pi shi ŋguʼɔ mfǔoŋ nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ ni ŋguoŋ taoŋ taoŋ ghao ndugwi mbhi ma nthɔ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pi wɛ̄iŋ vəɨ nchaʼa mfɛ lɨʼɨ sháʼa nɛ, kiʼi njùʼɔ yəɨ ghana vəɨ ni nnu ŋa pəɨ shi nchhu nɛ, ndɔ pəɨ chhu sheshe nnu ŋa pi fɛ ni pəɨ nɛ ndɨɨ ghɔ, nthɛ ŋa a lɔ nchrā pəɨ, a chrā Jijwɛ Minnwi. 
“Ŋoŋ shi nchaʼa ndǐŋ vi mfɛ ŋa pi jwi, tǎa fɛ muuŋ vi ŋa pi jwi, pa puoŋ kara mbara pa tǎa pugu pa maa ni nchhɔ̀ nchwīe pi jwi vugu. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa shi mbɨ̄na vəɨ nthɛ a. Ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a tīi shii ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ nɔ ndugwi yi nɛ shi ndūgu. 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ shi njəɨ nnu wuwuru ŋa a shi nchwīe pi tei Nda Minnwi thi lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ a shini ndɔ mfāʼo nɔ thi nu nɛ (shesheŋoŋ ŋa a mɛ̄iŋ yaoŋ yei nɛ pīʼi, nji ŋa a shi nji njiŋ nnu yei!) nnɛ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ moŋ laʼataoŋ Judia nɛ tei ŋkuʼɔ thɔ mbra. 
Kiʼi ŋoŋ ŋa a chhɔ thɔnda nɛ nuʼuŋ shwiʼi shhɛ ki nii nda yu nɔ lɔ̄gɔ nu sheshe yaoŋ ntaoŋ nɔ. 
Kiʼi shesheŋoŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ nyìeŋ nɛ nuʼuŋ mbɨnɨ lɨʼɨ lɔ̄gɔ mmɛ ndhwí yi. 
Ndɔ a shi mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ wuwuru ŋgəʼɨ ni pa piŋgɛ shūu pugu pa mapuoŋ haʼaŋ pugu thɔ nuʼɔŋ puoŋ moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ghɔ nɛ! 
Pəɨ luoŋ ni Minnwi ŋa kiʼi nnu pei lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ pi moŋ mbɨ̀, 
nthɛ ŋa moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ pighɔ, ŋgəʼɨ shi mbɔ ti nchəɨŋ fɨʼɨ haʼaŋ a lɔ naa ma mbɔ jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ŋa Minnwi ni mbuoŋ mbhi nɛ ti nthɔ nchəɨŋ ndwɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mbiʼi piʼi ma nuʼuŋ mbɔ. 
Ndɔ a kaŋ mieŋ ki pɔ ŋa Taathɔ kɛrɛ fɨʼɨ llɛmbhi pighɔ, yichəɨ ŋoŋmishua shi kaŋ ndɔ ndūgu, ndɔ, nthɛ pi pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa a chuʼɔ vugu nɛ, a kɛrɛ llɛmbhi pighɔ. 
“Nɛnnɛ s̈hesheŋoŋ nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ līi njəɨ, Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ pɔ nɛiŋ hɛnɛiŋ!’ ki ŋa, ‘Pəɨ līi njəɨ, a pi ni hini,’ kiʼi pəɨ piŋ. 
Nthɛ ŋa pa ŋgwa shi nthɔ ndɛʼi ŋgiɛŋ ŋa pugu Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, pa njəɨlɨʼɨ mifɨɨ shi nōoŋ noŋ yugu, nōoŋ ntou pa lì pugu pa nnu ghraoghrao, nɔ fɨ̄ɨ nu pa ŋgwa ti mfɨ̄ɨ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ Minnwi chuʼɔ nɛ, nɔ haʼaŋ a njiʼɛ ni pugu. 
Ndɔ pəɨ chhɔ ni lɨna məɨ! Ŋ̀kwo chhu ŋguoŋ nnu ni pəɨ ŋkaoŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ ma nthɔ. 
“Ndɔ moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ghɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋgəʼɨ pei shi ŋkwo tɔgɔ nɛ, ‘Minaoŋ shi ŋgū njiŋnjiŋ, ndɔ paʼa fhú lɔ nuʼuŋ nthɛ. 
Pa fɨ́nəɨ shi ŋgū nu shhɛ llɔ po, pa njɨ ŋa a pɔ moŋ tɔthɨ nɛ chɨ̄ʼɨ.’ 
“Nɛnnɛ, pi shi njəɨ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua, a thɔ nu moŋ lúluŋ ni mmɛ ghrɨ́ pugu pa ndighaʼo. 
A shi ntaoŋ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi, pugu kɨrɨ pa ŋgwa pi ŋa a chuʼɔ nɛ llɔ moŋ khwɛ ghaa mbhi ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ moŋ ndugwi tɔthɨ. 
“Yɛʼi ntɨ́gɨ llɔ ŋkuoŋ thɨ wùnu, nɔ haʼaŋ fhɔ̌ yi nuʼuŋ njɛ̄ tua nu ŋkuoŋ mbhɔ yi nɛ, ɔ ji ŋa ŋkwəɨ mbɨ̀ para. 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ yəɨ pa nnu pei thɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, pəɨ ji ŋa a kwo para ti mbɔ chonda. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei yiʼi ntɔgɔ ki ŋguoŋ pa nnu pei lɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. 
Po pugu shhɛ shi ntɔgɔ, ndɔ mbaʼa pa chrà paŋ yiʼi ntɔgɔ gha. 
“Ndɔ a mbɔ pi nɔ llɛ́ ghɔ pugu pa ndɨɨ ghɔ, yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ nji, njiʼi nthɛ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi po, ki Muuŋ, a wuʼɔ nji Tǎa təʼɨ vi. 
Pəɨ lɨna nu, mbīri noŋ yəɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɔ nji ndɨɨ ŋa ndɨɨ ghɔ shi nthɔ nɛ. 
“A pɔ pi nɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a chhɔ ŋgə̄ɨ kra, ŋga ndɔllɔ laʼa, nūʼɔŋ puoŋ fàʼa pi ŋa pugu tiʼi ndɨna ni pa yaoŋ, shesheŋoŋ fāʼo ji fàʼa, mfɛ gɨ́ ni ŋgaŋ lɨna ni chonda ŋa kiʼi a llɛ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ pīri noŋ pəɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɔ nji ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgaŋ nda ghɔ shi ŋkwəɨ nɛ. Ki a pɔ pi ni fanaoŋ, ki ni ntuŋ mbhi, ki moŋ ŋkhwɛmiŋkəʼɨ, ki ni tutuʼu. 
Ä ŋgwīʼi nchəɨŋ, kiʼi a yəɨ ghɔ ɔ llɛ nu. 
Nnu ŋa ǹchhu ni pəɨ nɛ, ǹchhu ni ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa nduoŋ: P̂əɨ pīri noŋ pəɨ.” 
﻿Maaku.
14.
A ni mbiʼi paa llɛ́, llɛ́ Lli Njiʼa pugu llɛ́ Jɨ Brɛi ki Kuʼɔ kāʼo. Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi thɔ ntāʼa shɛndaoŋ nɔ wɛ̄iŋ nu Jishɔ njiŋnjiŋ njwi vi. 
Pugu ni nchhu ŋa, “Mbaʼa a yiʼi mbɔ pi moŋ ndɨɨ jɨ yei kaŋ ŋgwa shi mbaʼo ŋgòu.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mbɔ Betani nda Shemu ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋgaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ nɛ, nɔ haʼaŋ a ni njɨ maoŋ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi nɛ, miŋgwɛ chəɨ nii ni nchɨ́ŋ ŋa pi chwīe ni ŋgùʼɔ, laminda taoŋtaoŋ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni nadi, mbɔ yi tɨnɨnchuoŋ lɨnaoŋ moŋ ghɔ. A pəʼɨ cho nchɨ́ŋ ghɔ, nshāʼo laminda ghɔ thɔ Jishɔ. 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa chhu ni noŋ pugu fɔ moŋ pɨgɨtua ŋa, “A pɨrɨ wru laminda yei nɛnɛiŋ ŋa? 
P̈i ka nì mfīni wru ghɔ, a tɔgɔ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋoŋ mfāʼa a tɔgɔ trɛi ŋkɨɨ llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ ghɔ nɛ, mfɛ mbɨŋ ghɔ ni ghaŋ pou.” Nnɛ pugu fɛ̄ʼi vi. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ mieŋ vi, pəɨ ghana vi ŋa? A chwīe pi nnu shiʼi vəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa pəɨ pa ghaŋ pou shi ŋguʼɔ mbɔ nu kaʼa, ti sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ khwā nɛ, pinthɛ pəɨ chwīe shiʼi ni pugu, ndɔ mbaʼa pia pɔ pi ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ. 
A chwīe nnu ŋa a kaŋ nthɛ a chwīe nɛ. A pīri noŋ a nɔ twei nu ŋkaoŋ ndɨɨ maa ŋkāʼo. 
Ndɔ shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa pi chīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ fɔ moŋ mbhi nɛ, yaoŋ ŋa miŋgwɛ vei chwīe nɛ pi shi nchhu nɔ kwiŋ nu vi.” 
Nnɛ Judashi Ishikario, ŋa a ni mbɔ taʼa ŋoŋ shɨna paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ nɛ, ghə̄ɨ mbara pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nnɛ nɔ fīni nu Jishɔ ni pugu. 
Pugu ni ŋga njaʼo mfāʼo pwatua, ŋkāʼa nɔ fɛ nu mbɨŋ ghɔ. Nnɛ a tāʼa shɨna nɔ fīni nu vi ni pugu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ fǔoŋ llɛ́ Jɨ Brɛi ki Kuʼɔ, mbɔ llɛ́ ŋa pi ghà njwi muuŋ minjɨɨ Jɨ Lli Njiʼa nɛ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pie ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa pigi ghə̄ɨ mbīri maoŋ jɨ Lli Njiʼa vɛ pi hɨŋ?” 
A taoŋ paa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nchhu nu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ laʼa, pəɨ shi mbāoŋ pəɨ pa mimbia, a tiɛŋ kɨ̌ŋ ŋkhǐ thɔ yu, pəɨ yōu njiŋ yi. 
Sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa a nii nɛ, pəɨ chhu ni ŋgaŋ nda ghɔ ŋa, ‘Masha chhu ŋa, njiɛŋ nda pa ghɨ̀nɨ hɨŋ, mbɔ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ a nthɛ ǹjɨ maoŋ Lli Njiʼa fɔ pigi pa ghaŋ younjiŋ paŋ nɛ?’ 
A shi nōoŋ mmɛ njiɛŋ nda tɔthɨ ni pəɨ pi kwo chwīe ti a kāʼo, pəɨ pīri fɔ.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ laʼa, njəɨ wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a nì nuʼuŋ nchhu ni pugu nɛ, mbīri maoŋ jɨ Lli Njiʼa ghɔ fɔ. 
A gha mbɔ ni fanaoŋ, Jishɔ thɔ pugu pa paanchrɔ ghɔ fɔ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nchɔchhɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi njɨ maoŋ nɛ, Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, taʼa ŋoŋ vəɨ shi mfīni a, taʼa ŋoŋ ŋa pigi yu jɨ maoŋ kaʼa nɛ.” 
Pugu jɛ̄ nthɔ mfāʼo pəʼɨ njùʼɔ, nchhu nu ghɔ pa taʼa taʼa ŋa, “A lɔ njiʼi mbɔ mmu, ki khɔ?” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “A taʼa ŋoŋ shɨna paanchrɔ yei, yɛ ŋa pigi yu chrū brɛi moŋ pɛiŋ kaʼa nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi ŋguʼɔ ŋgə̄ɨ pi nɔ haʼaŋ pi nāʼaŋ nthɛ vi nɛ, ndɔ ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a fīni vi nɛ. A ni mbwa ghɔ ŋa kiʼi pi phi vi.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni njɨ nu nɛ, a lɔ̄gɔ brɛi, ŋga ŋkwo tōo Minnwi, mbəʼɨ mfɛ ni pugu, nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ kwe, yei frɛinoŋ a.” 
A lɔ̄gɔ ndua làʼo ŋga ŋkwo tōo Minnwi, mfɛ ni pugu, ŋguoŋ yugu nnu. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Yei chhǐ a, mbɔ yi kɨ̀na ŋa a shi ŋkwrī nthɛ ntou ŋgwa nɛ. 
Shishini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, mbaʼa ma nuʼuŋ nnu làʼo yei ŋkamuʼɔŋ ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ llɛ́ yɛ ŋa ǹshi nnu fifhi moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi nɛ.” 
Pugu gha njrāo taʼa ŋkhǐ, ntaoŋ kəʼɨ ghɔ ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ Mbra pa Thɨ Olive. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ shi ntei njiŋ a ghao nthɛ ŋa pi nāʼaŋ ŋa, ‘Ǹshi njwi ŋkɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ, pa minjɨɨ sha.’ 
Ndɔ pi shi ŋga ŋkwo kuʼɔ ni mmu moŋ gu, ŋ̀gə̄ɨ shhɨ pəɨ Galili.” 
Ndɔ Pita chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Njiʼi nthɛ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa shi ntei njiŋ yɔ ghao nɛ, m̀baʼa njiʼi ntei.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei ghɔ, ni tuʼu yei ŋkaoŋ miŋkəʼɨ ma ŋkhwɛ̄ ni paa ŋgɛ́, ɔ shi ŋkwo lāa ni trɛi ŋgɛ́.” 
Ndɔ Pita chhu tɨtɨnɨ ŋa, “Ä njiʼi mbɔ pi ŋa pɔgɔ khu paʼa ǹdɔ njiʼi ndāa ghɔ.” Ŋguoŋ yugu ghao wuʼɔ nchhu pi taʼa nnu ghɔ. 
Pugu ghə̄ɨ nɔ lɨʼɨ chəɨ pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Geshemani. Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pəɨ chɔchɔ hɛiŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ǹduoŋ Minnwi nɛ.” 
A lɔ̄gɔ Pita, Jɛiŋ ni Jouŋ pugu pugu ghə̄ɨ. Ghaghana pugu pa yuʼɔ njùʼɔ shwiʼi mbɨŋ yu. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Njùʼɔ a ya mbəʼɨ ti minthɛ ŋka kukhu. Pəɨ kɨna hɛiŋ njra nu.” 
Nchənə noŋ yi ŋgə̄ɨ shɨgɛi shhɨ, nshāoŋ ni puŋ yi shhɛ nduoŋ Minnwi ŋa a njiʼɛ, ndɨɨ ŋgəʼɨ ghɔ tɔgɔ vi. 
Nchhu ŋa, “Baba, Tǎa a, ŋguoŋ nnu yīʼɛ mbhɔ ghɔ. Pɨʼɨ ndua ŋgəʼɨ yei ki ǹdɔ nnu. Ndɔ ti kiʼi a pɔ pi nɔ haʼaŋ ǹtāʼa nu nɛ, a pɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa a pɔ nɛ.” 
Nthɔ njəɨ vugu pugu llɛ nu, a chhu ni Pita ŋa, “Shemu, ɔ lɛllɛ? A nthɛ paʼa ɔ lɔ nchhɔ tɔthɨ nɔ taʼa awa? 
Pəɨ chhɔ tɔthɨ nduoŋ Minnwi nnɛ ŋa kiʼi pəɨ gū moŋ mōoŋ nu. Jijwɛ yəɨ khwā nu ndɔ frɛinoŋ yəɨ pou ghrɨ́.” 
Mbɨnɨ ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nduoŋ Minnwi, ŋguʼɔ mbiʼi pi nnu yɛ ŋa a ŋkwo luoŋ nɛ. 
A gha mbɨnɨ ŋkamuʼɔŋ njəɨ vugu pugu llɛ nu, nthɛ ŋa lɔgɔ ni ndɨnaoŋ ligi pugu, paʼa pugu lɔ nji nnu ŋa minthɛ pugu khwɛ̄ ghɔ nɛ. 
A gha mbɨnɨ nthɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ nɔ trɛi ŋgɛ, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ wuʼɔ nthɔ ndhɛ nu mfɛrɛ noŋ yəɨ? A kāʼo, ndɨɨ ghɔ kāʼo nɛ. Pi fīni Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua liɛŋ mbhɔ pa ghaŋ phɨ. 
Pəɨ lɔllɔ pia ghə̄ɨ. Pəɨ līi njəɨ, ŋoŋ ŋa a fīni a nɛ pɔ nɛiŋ!” 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, nɔ haʼaŋ a ni ŋguʼɔ nchrā nu nɛ, Judashi, mbɔ taʼa ŋoŋ shɨna paanchrɔ ghɔ thɔ pugu pa yú ŋgwa, pugu tuo kafa pugu pa wrɛ́i llɔ mbhɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ, pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa pichəɨ thishɨ. 
Ŋoŋ ŋa a ni mfīni vi nɛ ni ŋkwo fɛ lì ni pugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa ǹshi mbaŋ vi nɛ, ju. Pəɨ wɛ̄iŋ vi, ŋkɛ̄ʼi vi ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju.” 
Judashi ni ŋga nthɔ nchəɨŋ, ŋkuʼɔ mbara vi wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, nchhu ŋa, “Masha!” Mbaŋ vi. 
Nɛnnɛ pugu wɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ, nshīŋ vi ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju. 
Ndɔ yichəɨ taʼa ŋoŋ ŋa a ni nthi fɔ nɛ shua kafa yi, nchhwi muuŋ fàʼa taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɔ ghɔ, nche tə́nə yi. 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “M̀bɔ pi ŋgɨna minwi ŋa pəɨ thɔ nu ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ni pa kafa pugu pa wrɛ́i? 
Pa lɛllɛ pia ghà ŋguʼɔ mbɔ Nda Minnwi, ǹjɛʼi nu, ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ a. Ndɔ nnu pei lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɔ chwīe nu chrà Minnwi thi nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nchhu nɛ.” 
Ndɔ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi kwiɛŋ ghao ntei. 
Muuŋ chəɨ pɔrɔ njōu njiŋ yi ki lɔ māʼaŋ sheshe yaoŋ ŋkiɛŋ mbhɔ ndhwí ŋa a ni ŋgwara mbɨŋ yu, pugu wɛ̄iŋ vi. 
A shrāo mbhɔ ndhwí ghɔ mieŋ mbhɔ pugu ntei ntontii. 
Pi lɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ shhɨ taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ. Ŋguoŋ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa thishɨ ni pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi kɨrɨ. 
Pita ni njōu njiŋ yi mbɔ fie hini, nii moŋ yɨna taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ. Nchhɔ pugu pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi lɨʼɨ nthɔ njɨgɔ móŋoŋ. 
Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ŋguoŋ pa kúŋ ghao thɔ ntāʼa thɔ nnu haʼaŋ minthɛ pugu wɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ nɔ nnɛ ŋa minthɛ pugu jwi vi, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo. 
Nthɛ ŋa ntou pa ŋgwa ni nthɔ nchhu pa nnu mbe thɔ yu. Ndɔ pa nnu pighɔ ŋa pugu ni nchhu nɛ taoŋ pi nduoŋnduoŋ. 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa lɔllɔ ndɛʼi ŋgiɛŋ yei thɔ yu, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Pigi ni njaʼo a chhu ŋa, ‘Ǹshi nshāʼa Nda Minnwi yei ŋa pi chwīe pi ni mbhɔ nɛ, ndɔ̄gɔ trɛi llɛ́ ŋkrao yi nduoŋ, ki lɔ mbɔ yi krao ni mbhɔ.’ ” 
Ndɔ njiʼi nthɛ pi nɔ yei nnu, paʼa nchò yugu lɔ mbɔ taʼa yi. 
Taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ lɔllɔ ntithi shhɨ mbie Jishɔ ŋa, “Ɔ lɔ ŋkhwɛ̄ nnu pei ŋa ŋgwa pei chhu nthɛ ghɔ nɛ?” 
Jishɔ wuʼɔ ndɛrɛ pi laŋ ki lɔ nchrā kaŋ taʼa nnu. Taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ghɔ pɨnɨ mbie vi ŋa, “A gɔ̀ mbɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, mbɔ Muuŋ Ŋoŋ ŋa pigi ghà ŋgaʼo nɛ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “MI JU! Pəɨ shhi njəɨ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua pi chərə vi ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ Ŋoŋ ŋa a Fāʼo Ŋguoŋ Ghrɨ́ nɛ, a thɔ nu pugu pa lúluŋ po.” 
Taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ shāa ndhwí yi nchhu ŋa, “Pia nuʼuŋ ntāʼa pa miŋkwentie nchwīe khɔ nɔ? 
Pəɨ yaʼo chrà nchɨʼəshə yei. Nthí məɨ pɔ pi ŋa?” Pugu kwaʼa nchhu ŋa, “A ŋgushaʼa, mbie ŋa pi jwi vi.” 
Pichəɨ jɛ̄ thu nu thwɛ mbɨŋ yu, mbūoŋ ligi yi nchwi vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Tha ŋa a chhwi gɔ̌ nchhwi ghɔ.” Pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi lɨʼɨ lɔ̄gɔ vi nchrə̄ɨ lrì thɔ yu. 
Pita ni ŋguʼɔ mbɔ mbɛmbiɛŋ moŋ yɨna. Yichəɨ taʼa muuŋ fàʼa, mbɔ miŋgwɛ mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ thɔ, 
njəɨ Pita thɔ njɨgɔ móŋoŋ. Mbɛʼi Pita nchhu ŋa, “Gɔgɔ ŋkaa ghɔ ni mbɔ pəɨ Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ.” 
Ndɔ a lāa, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ǹdɔ nji, ndɔ paʼa thɔ a lɔ nshie ni nnu ŋa ɔ chhu nu nɛ.” Ndɔ Pita ghɔ lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ŋkuoŋ shɛndaoŋ ŋa a taoŋ choŋkaʼa nɛ. Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ miŋkəʼɨ khwɛ. 
Muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ pɨnɨ njəɨ vi njɛ̄ chhu nu ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei taʼa ŋoŋ vugu.” 
Ndɔ a pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ndāa ŋkamuʼɔŋ. A gha ndara shɨgɛi, ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ jɛ̄ chhu nu ni Pita ŋa, “Shishini, ɔ taʼa ŋoŋ vugu. Ɔ ŋoŋ Galili.” 
A jɛ̄ chɔ̄nɔ nu noŋ yi nshwrɛ̄i nu ŋa, “Ndɔ nji ŋoŋ vei ŋa pəɨ chrā nu nthɛ vi nɛ.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, miŋkəʼɨ pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkhwɛ. Pita kwiŋ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋkaoŋ miŋkəʼɨ ma ŋkhwɛ̄ ni paa ŋgɛ, ɔ shi ndāa a ni trɛi ŋgɛ.” Pita wɛ̄iŋ noŋ yi kie nshaʼa ni kə̄ɨ. 
﻿Maaku.
15.
A ni ŋga mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ni tutuʼu, pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa pichəɨ thishɨ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi ni ŋguoŋ pa kúŋ ghao paoŋ mbini. Ŋkrao Jishɔ ndɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ nchaʼa vi mfɛ ni Pailɛ. 
Pailɛ pie vi ŋa, “Ɔ fùoŋ pa Juu?” A khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “A haʼaŋ ɔ chhu nɛ.” 
Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ tigi ntou pa nnu thɔ yu. 
Pailɛ pɨnɨ mbie vi ŋa, “Ɔ lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo khwɛ̀ nɔ fɛ nu? Līi njəɨ fɨʼɨ pa nnu ŋa pugu chhu nthɛ ghɔ nɛ.” 
Ndɔ paʼa Jishɔ lɔ nuʼuŋ ŋkhwɛ̄ sheshe nnu, nnɛ Pailɛ ghrāo. 
A ghà mbɔ llɛ́ Jɨ Lli Njiʼa, Pailɛ chuʼɔ taʼa ŋgaŋ chəɨŋ ŋa ŋgwa pie ghɔ nɛ. 
Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ moŋ chə́ɨŋ shɨna pa ghaŋ tɨnɨthɔ pɛ ŋa pugu ni njwi ŋoŋ ndɨɨ ŋa minduoŋnduoŋ ni ŋgū moŋ laʼa nɛ, ligi yi pɔ Baraba. 
Pa yú ŋgwa pighɔ ghə̄ɨ mbara Pailɛ, mbie vi ŋa a chwīe nɔ haʼaŋ a ghà mbīgi nchwīe nɛ ni pugu. 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ tāʼa nu ŋa nchuʼɔ ‘Fùoŋ pa Juu’ mfɛ ni pəɨ?” 
Nthɛ ŋa a ni nji ŋa pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi nthɔ mfɛ ghɔ nthɛ pi kighɨʼə. 
Ndɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ kāoŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa pugu pie ŋa Pailɛ chuʼɔ pi Baraba. 
Pailɛ pɨnɨ nchhu ŋa, “Ti mi shi mbɔ pi nɛiŋ ni ŋoŋ ŋa pəɨ mɛ̄iŋ vi ni Fùoŋ pa Juu nɛ?” 
Pugu paʼo ŋgòu ni njɨ ŋa, “Kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa!” 
Pailɛ pie ŋa, “Nthɛ khɔ? Nnu pɨphɨ ŋa a chwīe nɛ pɔ pi khɔ?” Ndɔ pugu pɨnɨ mbaʼo ŋgòu mbīgi ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ, “Kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa!” 
Nnɛ Pailɛ tāʼa nu nchwīe ŋa túa yú ŋgwa pighɔ pwa, nchuʼɔ Baraba mfɛ ni pugu, ŋga ŋkwo wie Jishɔ, nchaʼa vi mfɛ ŋa pi kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa. 
Pa shoogɛ lɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ nii nɔ moŋ yɨna ntuʼɔ ŋgaŋ shaʼa ŋgwa, mɛ̄iŋ ŋguoŋ kwíe ntɨgao ŋkɨɨ shoogɛ ghao lɨʼɨ muʼɔŋ. 
Pugu māʼaŋ pɨ̀rɨ mbɨŋ yu, mbaʼa ŋkie ni pa michwɛʼichwɛʼi shhɔ̄ thɔ yu. 
Pugu jɛ̄ nthɔ ŋgɨnɔ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Nduunya! Ma Fùoŋ pa Juu!” 
Nthɔ ŋkwāʼa thɔ yi ni muuŋ thɨ, nthɔ nthu thwɛ mbɨŋ yu, ŋkwi kwɛ́rɛ yugu ŋgaʼo vi. 
Pugu ni ŋga ŋkwo māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ ti mīʼɛŋ, nshrāo pɨ̀rɨ ghɔ mbɨŋ yu, māʼaŋ ji ndhwí mbɨŋ yu, ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju lɨʼɨ kwīŋ ŋkuoŋ wáʼa. 
Pugu ŋɨ ŋoŋ chəɨ ŋa ligi ni mbɔ Shemu llɔ Shiriŋ ŋa tiɛŋ wáʼa yi. Ŋoŋ ghɔ ni mbɔ tǎa Alɛshanda pugu Rufushi, ŋa a ni nii nu moŋ tri laʼa llɔ moŋ ŋgunu. 
Pugu lɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ pi mɛ̄iŋ ŋa Gogota. Njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, “Lɨʼɨ Kwéi Thɔ.” 
Pugu fɛ làʼo ghɔ ŋa pi nyāaŋ ni yichəɨ fhɔ̌ yúʼɔ pi mɛ̄iŋ ni məə, ndɔ a lāa ki lɔ nnu. 
Pugu kwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa, ŋgrā ndhwí yi shɨna pugu, māʼaŋ yaoŋ nɔ pɛʼi, nɔ yəɨ nu ŋa shesheŋoŋ vugu shi njɨ pi yəɨ pra ndhwí yi. 
A ni mbɔ ndipuʼu minaoŋ ni tutuʼu ŋa pugu ni ŋkwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa. 
Pi nāʼaŋ nnu ŋa pugu ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi nɔ ŋkwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa nɛ ŋa, “Fùoŋ pa Juu.” 
Pi kwīŋ vi pugu pa paa ŋgɨna. Taʼa yi ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ, taʼa yi ŋgei mbhɔ ŋkwrɛi. 
Nɛnnɛ chrà Minnwi yɛ ŋa pi ni nāʼaŋ ŋa pi ni shia vi shɨna ghaŋ chwīe phɨ nɛ ni ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ntɔgɔ nu nɛ ni nthɔ ŋgwɛʼi vi, nchɨʼɨ thɔ yugu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Hoho! Ɔ ni ntāʼa nu shāʼa Nda Minnwi mbɨnɨ ŋkrao moŋ trɛi llɛ́. 
Kwe nɛ noŋ yɔ nshwiʼi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa pia.” 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ shɨna pugu ni noŋ yugu nchhu ŋa, “A ni ŋkwe ŋgwa nduoŋ, ndɔ minthɛ paʼa a lɔ ŋkwe noŋ yi. 
Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe, mbɔ Fùoŋ ŋgwa Ishrae, shwiʼi nɛ ŋkuoŋ wáʼa, nnɛ ŋa minthɛ pigi yəɨ mbiŋ vi.” Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi ni ŋkwīŋ vugu pugu kaʼa nɛ māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ ŋkaa pugu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ moŋ ntuŋ minaoŋ, njiŋnjiŋ gū moŋ ŋguoŋ laʼa ghao ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ moŋ trɛi minaoŋ ni naoŋchɨ. 
A gha mbɔ moŋ trɛi minaoŋ ghɔ, Jishɔ chhu ŋkiɛŋ ni njɨ ŋa, “Eloi, Eloi, lema shabatani?” njiŋ yi pɔ ŋa, “Minnwi a, Minnwi a, ɔ mīʼaŋ a ŋa?” 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ gha njaʼo nnu ghɔ nchhu ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, a chhɔ mɛ̄iŋ pi Elaija.” 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ tei ŋgə̄ɨ niʼiŋ kusha moŋ làʼo chəchɨgəɨ, nchwɛʼi thɔ muuŋ thɨ, mfɛ ghɔ ŋa a nnu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ tithi pia yəɨ ŋa Elaija shi nthɔ nshwiʼi vi shhɛ!” 
Jishɔ paʼo ŋgòu ndɔ ŋkhu. 
Ndhwí kɨʼɨ lɨʼɨ Nda Minnwi shāa ntaoŋ yi paa, llɔ tɔthɨ nshwiʼi mfɛ shhɛ. 
Nthishɨ pa taʼa ŋkɨɨ shoogɛ ŋa a ni nthi fɔ nthɔ mbɛʼi vi nɛ, gha njəɨ ŋa yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a khu nɛ, nchhu ŋa, “Shishini, ŋoŋ vei ni mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi!” 
Pichəɨ piŋgɛ ni nthi hini njiʼɛ mbɛʼi nu. Shɨna piŋgɛ pighɔ ni mbɔ Meri Madaliŋ pugu Meri mǔuŋ Jɛiŋ mikəʼɨ pugu Joshɛshi, ni Shalome. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa a ni mbɔ Galili nɛ, pugu yōu njiŋ yi ŋgɛ̄rɛ vi. Ntou pa piŋgɛ nduoŋ ŋa pugu pa Jishɔ ni ŋkuʼɔ Jerushalɛiŋ kaʼa ni mbɔ fɔ. 
Fanaoŋ ni ŋkwo thɔ nu, yichəɨ ŋoŋ ligi yi pɔ Joshɛ llɔ Arimatia chəɨŋ. A ni mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ nda pa kúŋ, ni nthɔ njwɛrɛ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi ŋa a thɔ. A ni mbɔ llɛ́ pīri nu noŋ (mbɔ llɛ́ ŋa a fɛ ni llɛ́ Ji pa Juu nɛ). Joshɛ wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ yi, ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ Pailɛ nduoŋ khu Jishɔ mbhɔ yu. 
Pailɛ ni ŋgrāo nɔ yaʼo nu ŋa Jishɔ kwo khu. Mɛ̄iŋ nthishɨ pa taʼa ŋkɨɨ shoogɛ mbie vi ŋa Jishɔ kwo khu. 
A ni ŋga njaʼo mbhɔ nthishɨ pa taʼa ŋkɨɨ shoogɛ ghɔ ŋa a kwo khu, mfɛ khu yi ni Joshɛ. 
Joshɛ yuoŋ mbhɔ ndhwí fhu, nshwiʼi khu Jishɔ shhɛ, ndiŋ vi moŋ ndhwí fhu ghɔ, niʼiŋ moŋ fúŋ ŋa pi fīʼi moŋ ŋgùʼɔ nɛ. Ŋkə̄nə ŋgùʼɔ nchri chofuŋ ghɔ nɔ. 
Meri Madaliŋ, ni Meri mǔuŋ Joshɛshi yəɨ lɨʼɨ ŋa pi ni ntwei vi nɛ. 
﻿Maaku.
16.
Llɛ́ Ji ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, Meri Madaliŋ pugu Meri muuŋ Jɛiŋ ni Shalome yuoŋ pa wru laminda, nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu nshāʼo mbɨŋ Jishɔ. 
A gha mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ni muuŋ tutuʼu ndɨɨ ŋa minaoŋ ni ŋkwo shaʼa moŋ fǔoŋ llɛmbhi, mbɔ Shonde, pugu ghə̄ɨ chofuŋ Jishɔ. 
Pugu chhu nu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “A shi ŋkə̄nə gɔ̌ ŋgùʼɔ mbɨʼɨ chofuŋ mfɛ ni pia?” 
Ŋga ndīi nu nɛ, njəɨ pi kwo ŋkə̄nə ŋgùʼɔ ghɔ. A ni mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ ŋgùʼɔ. 
Pugu gha nii moŋ fúŋ ghɔ, njəɨ yichəɨ maʼaŋ mikhwa chhɔ fɔ ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ, māʼaŋ shalaoŋ fhu, pugu ghrāo. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ nuʼuŋ ŋgrāo, pəɨ tāʼa pi Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ ŋa pi ni ŋkwīŋ vi ŋkuoŋ wáʼa nɛ. A kwo kuʼɔ, a lɔ njiʼi mbɔ hɛiŋ. Līi njəɨ, yei lɨʼɨ yɛ ŋa pi ni nūʼɔŋ vi nɛ. 
Ndɔ pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, pugu pa Pita ŋa, ‘A ghə̄ɨ nu nɛ shhɨ pəɨ moŋ Galili. Pəɨ shi njəɨ vi fɔ, wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nshwei vəɨ nɛ.’ ” 
Thɔ yugu ni fiŋ, pugu wrū nu nthɛ pɔgɔ gu, ntaoŋ moŋ fúŋ ghɔ ntei. Pugu shini ndɔ nchhu kaŋ taʼa nnu ni shesheŋoŋ nthɛ ŋa pɔgɔ gu ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu. Pichəɨ pa fǔoŋ ndunu Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi llɛshhɨ lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo jɛ̄ moŋ ghrà ndipuʼu ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ nɔ ndugwi yi. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni ŋkwo kuʼɔ ŋkiɛŋ ni muuŋ tutuʼu ni Shonde nɛ, mfǔoŋ nōoŋ noŋ yi pi ni Meri Madaliŋ, mbɔ miŋgwɛ yɛ ŋa a ni mfuʼu khwachəɨ miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ yu nɛ. 
A ghə̄ɨ nshwei ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pa Jishɔ ni mbɔ nu kaʼa nɛ, ŋa pugu ni nthɔ ŋkə̄ɨ nu ndɔ njūa nu nɛ. 
Pugu ni ŋga njaʼo ŋa Jishɔ yi maoŋ, Meri Madaliŋ ghɔ kwo yəɨ vi nɛ, paʼa ndɔ mbiŋ. 
Pa nnu pei ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, Jishɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi moŋ shɛndaoŋ nduoŋ ni paa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ndɨɨ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ shɛndaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu moŋ laʼa nɛ. 
Pugu pɨnɨ nchhu ni pichəɨ, ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ mbiŋ nnu ŋa pugu ni nchhu nɛ. 
Pa nnu pei gha ntɔgɔ, Jishɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi ni taʼanchrɔ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi ndɨɨ ŋa pugu ni njɨ maoŋ nɛ, mbɨ̄ga vugu nthɛ pou piŋ yugu pugu pa tɨnɨthɔ nɔ piŋ nu nnu ŋa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu yəɨ vi a pɔ yi maoŋ chhu nɛ. 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ ŋguoŋ mbhi ghao, nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ ni ŋguoŋ ŋgwamishua ghao. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ ndɔ ŋkwe ŋkhǐ nɛ shi ndūgu. Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ mbiŋ nɛ shi mfāʼo njɔ́ nɔ ŋgushaʼa. 
Pa lì pei shi njōu njiŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu piŋ nɛ. Ni ligi a pugu shi mfuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ, nchrā moŋ pa chrà fhi. 
Pugu shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ pa mitwɛʼi, ti p̈ugu nnu sheshe njɨʼɨ, paʼa kàʼa lɔ ŋkēe vugu. Pugu shi nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yugu ŋkuoŋ pa ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ, noŋ yugu tɔgɔ.” 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ Taathɔ ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ chrā nu ni pugu, pi lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋkuʼɔ nɔ po, nchərə ŋgei mbhɔ Minnwi yi jɨ. 
Pugu taoŋ chhu chrà Minnwi ŋguoŋ lɨʼɨ, Taathɔ fāʼa pugu pugu nōoŋ ŋa chrà ŋa pugu chhu nu nɛ yi shini ntɔgɔ pi ŋkuoŋ pa lì.
﻿Pwa Pishaʼakhɔ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Luka fɨ̄ʼɨ nɛ.
1.
Ndɔ haʼaŋ ntou ŋgwa paʼo nɔ nāʼaŋ nu pa nnu pɛ ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ shɨna pia nɛ, 
wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pia nuʼuŋ njaʼo mbhɔ ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ni mbɔ nɔ njɛ̄ yi, njəɨ mbɨnɨ nuʼuŋ nchīi chrà Minnwi, 
nthɛ ŋa ŋ̀kwo ya ntou ŋguoŋ pa nnu shishiʼi ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ki kie llɔ nɔ njɛ̄ yi nɛ, a pwa ŋa ǹāʼaŋ nnu pighɔ mfɛ vɛ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ki ya ntɔgɔ nɛ, ma Tiofilu ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ, 
nɛnnɛ ŋa mimfɛ ɔ ya nji shishiʼi pa nnu haʼaŋ pi shwei ghɔ nɔ nɛ. 
A ni mbɔ thɔ Hɛrɔ, mbɔ fùoŋ Judia, yichəɨ ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi ni mbɔ fɔ, ligi yi pɔ Shakaria. A ni ndhɔ moŋ ghrà ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi, llɔ moŋ ndaaŋoŋ Abija. A ni mfāʼo ŋgwɛ vi llɔ moŋ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ Ɛroŋ, ligi yi ni mbɔ Ɛlishabe. 
Ŋguoŋ vugu ni mbɔ ŋgwa ndɨndɨ shhɨ Minnwi, nthɔ nūʼɔŋ ŋguoŋ kɨ̀na pugu pa gɨ́ Taathɔ ndɔ ki lɔ mfāʼo ntəɨ. 
Ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ njiʼi fāʼo muuŋ, nthɛ ŋa Ɛlishabe ni mbɔ pi ŋkhwɛ̄, ndɔ pugu ni ŋkwo ya ndunu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ llɛ́ chəɨ, a pɔ ndɨɨ ghrà pa Shakaria nɔ fāʼa nu nɔ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi, Shakaria fɛ̄ʼi nu, 
ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Nda Minnwi ni mbɔ nɛ, pugu māʼaŋ yaoŋ nɔ yəɨ nu ŋoŋ ŋa Minnwi chuʼɔ ŋa a tūoŋ *lěi nɛ. A gū mbɨŋ yu ŋa a nii ju Nda Minnwi lɨʼɨ tūoŋ yichəɨ ŋkwaŋ lěi nɔ ghaʼo nu Minnwi. 
Ntou ŋgwa ni mbɔ mbhi nchhɔ nduoŋ Minnwi moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ ŋa pi ni nthɔ ntūoŋ lěi nɛ. 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi yəɨ yu, nthi ŋgei mbhɔ jɨ lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ŋa pi ni ntūoŋ lěi nɛ. 
Shakaria ni ŋga njəɨ vi, njùʼɔ yi taoŋ, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vi. 
Ndɔ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ chhu ŋa, “Kiʼi mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu, ma Shakaria. Minnwi yaʼo luoŋ yɔ. Ɛlishabe ŋgwɛ ghɔ shi mbhi muuŋ mimbia ɔ chhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Jouŋ. 
Muuŋ vei shi mbɔ pwanjuʼɔ ni pwatua vɛ, ntou ŋgwa pɨnɨ mfāʼo pwanjuʼɔ ŋa pi phi vi. 
A shi mbɔ mmɛŋoŋ shhɨ Taathɔ. Kiʼi a ma nnu làʼo ki sheshe làʼo tɨtɨnɨ. A shi ndɨnaoŋ ni Jijwɛ Minnwi llɔ ndɨɨ ŋa a pɔ moŋ puŋ nɛ. 
A shi nchwīe ntou puoŋ Ishrae pɨ̄nɨ mbara Taathɔ vugu, mbɔ Minnwi. 
A shi ŋgə̄ɨ ju nɔ likiɛŋ Taathɔ moŋ jijwɛ pugu pa ghrɨ́ nɔ yi njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi mbɔ Elaija, nɔ chīni nu njùʼɔ pa tǎa pugu pa yi puoŋ, ŋkara pa ntɨnɨthɔ pugu kwəɨ ŋkuoŋ mbha shiethɔ ŋgwa ndɨndɨ nɛnnɛ nɔ nchwīe nu ŋgwa ŋa pugu pīri noŋ yugu ni Taathɔ.” 
Shakaria pie ni ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Mi shi ŋkie pi nɛiŋ mfāʼo tɨnɨnjuʼɔ ni nnu pei ŋa ŋ̀kwo lulunu ŋgaʼa, ŋgwɛ a kwo lulunu ŋkaa yu nɛ?” 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Mi Gabreya. Ǹthi shhɨ Minnwi, ŋa a taoŋ a ŋa ǹchrā vɛ ndɔ nshwei ghɔ ni pwa pishaʼakhɔ yei. 
Līi njəɨ, nthɛ ŋa ɔ lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ chrà a nɛ, ɔ shi ŋgū fhɨncho ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ llɛ́ yɛ ŋa nnu pei shi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ.” 
Pa ŋgwa ni nchhɔ njwɛrɛ Shakaria, nthɔ ŋgrāo nu ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a yiyiri Nda Minnwi nɛ. 
A gha ntaoŋ mfɨfhɨ, pugu yəɨ kiʼɛ ŋa a yəɨ pi nnu Nda Minnwi, a thɔ nōoŋ nnu pi ni mbhɔ ŋkɨna mbɔ fhɨncho. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ndɨɨ fàʼa yi Nda Minnwi ni mmɛ nɛ, a pɨ̄nɨ laʼa. 
Pa llɛ́ gha ntɔgɔ, Ɛlishabe ŋgwɛ vi shūu, ndə̄ɨŋ noŋ yi nɔ tiɛŋ nàoŋ, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Yei nnu ŋa Taathɔ fāʼa mbɨŋ mu, Taathɔ līi a ni pwapuŋ nɔ pɨʼɨ nu lrithɔ mbɨŋ mu shɨna ŋgwamishua.” 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa Ɛlishabe ni ŋkwo shūu nɔ ntɨgao nàoŋ nɛ, Minnwi taoŋ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ vi, mbɔ Gabreya, ŋa a ghə̄ɨ Nasharɛ, mbɔ yichəɨ lɨʼɨ Galili, 
njəɨ muuŋ miŋgwɛ chəɨ, ligi yi pɔ Meri, ŋa a shi yaʼa ji mimbia nɛ. Pi ni nōoŋ vi ni Joshɛ nɔ ŋgwɛ vi. Joshɛ ni mbɔ ŋoŋ llɔ moŋ ndaaŋoŋ fùoŋ Devi. 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ ghə̄ɨ nchhu ni Meri ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹchrā vɛ, ma mbrɔthɔ miŋgwɛ, Taathɔ pɔ pəɨ yu kaʼa!” 
Meri fāʼo fiŋthɔ, mbɨnɨ ŋgrāo ŋa yei pɔ pi yəɨ ŋkwaŋ chrā nu nɛiŋ. 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu, ma Meri, Minnwi lɔ̄gɔ nthi mi nɔ nōoŋ nu pwapuŋ vɛ. 
Līi njəɨ, ɔ shi nshūu mbhi muuŋ mimbia nchhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Jishɔ. 
A shi mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ mmɛŋoŋ ndiɛŋ, pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ni Muuŋ Minnwi ŋa a Chaapifuoŋ nɛ. Minnwi Taathɔ shi nchərə vi ŋkuoŋ faaŋ tǎa vi, mbɔ Devi. 
A shi nshaʼa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ Jakɔ nɔ ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ, mbaʼa ndugwi Shaʼafuoŋ yi ma njiʼi mbɔ.” 
Meri pie ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Mimfɛ a kie pi nɛiŋ mbɔ nnɛ, ŋa ǹdɔ naa nji mimbia nɛ?” 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Jijwɛ Minnwi shi nshwiʼi mbɨŋ ghɔ. Njɨ ju ŋa a Chaapifuoŋ nɛ kuru ghɔ. Nthɛ yie ghɔ, muuŋ ŋa ɔ shi mbhi nɛ, shi mbɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ. Pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ŋa Muuŋ Minnwi. 
Līi njəɨ, ndǐŋ ghɔ Ɛlishabe pɔ ni shūu muuŋ mimbia ŋkaa yu nɔ ntɨgao nàoŋ moŋ ndilunu, mbɔ ju ŋa pi ni mɛ̄iŋ vi ni ŋkhwɛ̄ nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa yichəɨ nnu shiʼa ŋgaʼa Minnwi.” 
Meri chhu ŋa, “M̀bɔ nɛiŋ, mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa Taathɔ, a pɔ vəɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ɔ chhu nɛ.” Nɛnnɛ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ ghə̄ɨ ni vhi. 
A gha ndaʼa shɨgɛi llɛ́, Meri lɔllɔ ŋkɔnɔ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ moŋ Juda, laʼataoŋ ntou mbra. 
A ghə̄ɨ nii nda Shakaria nchrā ni Ɛlishabe. 
Ɛlishabe ni ŋga njaʼo chrà Meri, muuŋ ŋāna ni njɨ moŋ puŋ yu. Ɛlishabe ni ndɨnaoŋ ni Jijwɛ Minnwi, 
nɛnnɛ nchhu ni njɨ ŋa, “Ɔ mbrɔthɔ shɨna ŋguoŋ piŋgɛ ghao, ndɔ mbrɔthɔ pɔ muuŋ ŋa ɔ shi mbhi nɛ! 
Mi pɔ pi gɔ̌, ŋa yei ŋkwaŋ nnu chwīe a, ŋa mǔuŋ Taathɔ a thɔ ŋkra a? 
Nthɛ ŋa ndɨɨ ŋa mi nì njaʼo ɔ chrā vəɨ nɛ, muuŋ ŋa a pɔ puŋ mu nɛ ŋāna ni njɨ nthɛ pwatua. 
Mbɔrɔ pɔ vɛ nthɛ ŋa ɔ piŋ nnu ŋa Taathɔ chhu vɛ nɛ!” 
Meri khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ǹchhu ni ŋguoŋ njùʼɔ a ŋa ndighaʼo pɔ ni Taathɔ. 
Mbɨnɨ mfāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ Minnwi mbɔ ŋkwe a, 
nthɛ ŋa a kwiŋ muuŋ fàʼa yi, yi juju. Līi njəɨ, llɔ ndwɛ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ ŋguoŋ ŋgwrɛiŋgwa shi mɛ̄iŋ a ni mbrɔthɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ju ŋa a tɨnɨ ŋgaʼa nɛ, chwīe pa mɛmmɛ nnu vəɨ, ligi yi pɔ Ŋoŋ Ki Fhi Yi. 
Llɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ nshwiʼi ŋkuoŋ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ, a nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔgɔ vi nɛ. 
A chwīe pa nnu tɨtɨnɨ ni mbhɔ mi, nshāaŋ pa ghaŋ ntitaʼo moŋ pa kwāʼa nu muŋu. 
A shwiʼi pa mɛmmɛ fùoŋ llɔ ŋkuoŋ faaŋ yugu, ŋkə̄rə pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa yugu lɔ mbɔ nɛ tɔthɨ. 
A nɨʼɨŋ pa ghaŋ njì ni pa maoŋ shiʼi, njōu pa ghaŋ fāʼo pugu ghə̄ɨ ni mbhɔ yó. 
A ghɛ̄rɛ muuŋ fàʼa vi mbɔ Ishrae, nthɔ ŋkwiŋ pi kwoshɨnɨ yi, 
ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni ŋkāʼa ni pa tǎa pia, ni Abrahaŋ pugu pa mbhɛ̌ ŋoŋ yi nɔ ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ghao nɛ.” 
Meri chhɔ pugu Ɛlishabe nɔ trɛi nàoŋ, maa mbɨnɨ kiʼɛ laʼa yu. 
Ndɨɨ phi Ɛlishabe ni ŋga ŋkāʼo, a phi muuŋ mimbia. 
Pa taakuo pi pugu pa ndaaŋoŋ yi ni ŋa njaʼo fɨʼɨ ntou kwoshɨnɨ ŋa Taathɔ nōoŋ ni Ɛlishabe nɛ, pugu pugu fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ. 
Fúoŋ llɛmbhi ni ŋga ŋkāʼo, pi thɔ lɨʼɨ niʼiŋ vi ŋgunu mbrɛi, ntāʼa nu nchhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Shakaria, mbɔ ligi tǎa vi. 
Mǔuŋ vi lāa, nchhu ŋa, “Pi fāʼo nɔ mɛ̄iŋ nu vi pi ŋa Jouŋ.” 
Ndɔ pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Yichəɨ ndaaŋoŋ yɔ lɔ mbɔ fɔ ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ vi ni ligi yi nɛ.” 
Nɛnnɛ, pugu nōoŋ ni mbhɔ nɔ pie nu tǎa vi ni ligi ŋa a khwā ŋa muuŋ ghɔ fāʼo nɛ. 
Shakaria chhu pi thɔ ni yaoŋ nāʼaŋ yaoŋ, a nāʼaŋ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Ligi yi Jouŋ.” Nnu ghɔ ghrāo vugu. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, nchò Shakaria chuʼɔ, lɨŋ yi kɨ̄gɛi, a chrā, njɛ̄ ghaʼo nu Minnwi. 
Pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ pa taakuo pugu. Shaaŋga nnu pei nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ laʼataoŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ Judia, mbɔ laʼataoŋ mbra. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a ni njaʼo nnu yei nɛ ywɛrɛ moŋ njùʼɔ yu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Muuŋ vei ma mbɔ pi ŋkwaŋ khɔ? Nthɛ ŋa mbhɔ Taathɔ ni nja mbɔ mbɨŋ yu.” 
Shakaria tǎa Jouŋ ni ndɨnaoŋ ni Jijwɛ Minnwi, nɛnnɛ nchhu nnu ŋa Minnwi nōoŋ ghɔ nɛ: 
“Ghaʼo Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi Ishrae, nthɛ ŋa a kra ŋgwa pi nɔ njaʼandiʼi yugu, 
Mfɛ tɨtɨnɨ Ŋkwe ni pia llɔ moŋ nda Devi muuŋ fàʼa vi. 
Wuʼɔ ndɔ haʼaŋ a ni mfɛ kàʼa yi ni pa njəɨlɨʼɨ pi pi taoŋtaoŋ llɔ llɛshhɨ ŋa pugu chīi ni ŋgwa, 
ŋa pia shi ndūgu mbhɔ pa mimbɨna pia pugu pa ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu pɨ̄na via nɛ. 
A ni ŋkāʼa ŋa a shi nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ ni pa tǎa pia ndɔ mbɨnɨ ŋkwiŋ kɨ̀na yi yi taoŋtaoŋ, 
kɨ̀na ŋa a ni nshwrɛ̄i ni tǎa via Abrahaŋ nɛ. 
A ni ŋkāʼa ŋa a shi ŋkwe via mbhɔ pa mimbɨna pia, nɛnnɛ ŋa mimfɛ pia fāʼa fàʼa yi ki lɔ mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu, 
moŋ taoŋtaoŋ pugu pa ndɨndɨ shhɨ yu moŋ ŋguoŋ chɔmbhi yia ghao. 
Ndɔ gɔ̀, muuŋ a, ɔ shi mbɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ŋa a Chaapifuoŋ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa ɔ shi ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ Taathɔ mbīri ndaoŋ yi. 
Ɔ shi nshwei ŋgwa pi, mbɔ ŋgwa Juu ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ mimfɛ pugu kie ndūgu nɛ, ŋa Minnwi shi ndīʼɛ phɨ yugu. 
Nthɛ pi juju kwoshɨnɨ Minnwi ni pia, ndɨɨ ŋa líʼɛ llɔ tɔthɨ shi nthɛ mbɨŋ pia, 
nɔ fɛ nu líʼɛ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu chhɔ moŋ njiŋnjiŋ pugu pa miliʼi gu nɛ, ŋkɛ̄ʼi via ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ shɛndaoŋ ghɨghrɨ.” 
Jouŋ muuŋ ghɔ ni ŋkuʼɔ ntɨnɨ moŋ jijwɛ, ndaʼa pi moŋ pa ŋkǔnu njó ti nchəɨŋ ndɨɨ ŋa a ni njɛ̄ chīi nu chrà Minnwi ni ŋgwa Ishrae nɛ. 
﻿Luka.
2.
A ni ŋga mbɔ moŋ pɨɨ ndɨɨ ghɔ, Kaisha Agɔshtu pɔ fùoŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ mbhi Roma, mfɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi nāʼaŋ ligi ŋguoŋ ŋgwa Roma ghao nɔ nnu shia ŋgwa. 
Yei ni mbɔ fǔoŋ nāʼaŋ nu ligi nɔ nnu shia ŋgwa ndɨɨ ŋa Kwirinu ni nthɔ shaʼa Shiria nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ni mbɨnɨ moŋ ji laʼataoŋ nɔ nāʼaŋ nu ligi yi nɔ nnu shia ŋgwa ghɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Joshɛ ni mbɔ pi ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ fùoŋ Devi nɛ, a kuʼɔ llɔ Nasharɛ moŋ Galili, ŋgə̄ɨ Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ moŋ Judia mbɔ laʼataoŋ Devi. 
A ghə̄ɨ fɔ lɨʼɨ nāʼaŋ ligi yugu Meri ŋa pi ni nōoŋ vi ghɔ nɔ ŋgwɛ vi, a ni mbɔ ni shūu nɛ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni mbɔ fɔ nɛ, muuŋ kāoŋ vi. 
A phi fǔoŋ muuŋ vi, mbɔ muuŋ mimbia, mbara vi moŋ ndhwí, niʼiŋ moŋ ŋkuʼɔ jɨ khí pa minjɨɨ, nthɛ ŋa lɨʼɨ shi ki lɔ mbɔ ni pugu moŋ nda ghɔ ŋa pa ghɨ̀nɨ ghà nthɔ ndaʼa nɛ. 
Moŋ ŋkǔnu moŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ pa ŋkɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ ni mbɔ fɔ nthɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi pa minjɨɨ pugu ni tuʼu. 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Taathɔ nōoŋ noŋ yi shɨna pugu, ndighaʼo Taathɔ thɛ ŋgɨ̄ŋ vugu, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu. 
Ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ ghɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu, ǹthɔ ni ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ pwatua, mbɔ yi ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ghao. 
Shiʼa moŋ laʼataoŋ Devi pi phi ŋkwe vəɨ mbɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe, ŋa a Taathɔ nɛ. 
Yei shi mbɔ lì ni pəɨ: Pəɨ shi njəɨ muuŋ pi para vi moŋ ndhwí, a nūaŋ moŋ ŋkuʼɔ jɨ khí pa minjɨɨ.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, yú pichəɨ shoogɛ llɔ po wīʼi nchəɨŋ, pugu pa yie ghɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ ŋgaʼo Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa: 
“Ndighaʼo pɔ ni Minnwi ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ fie moŋ ndugwi po, ghrɨnjuʼɔ pɔ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋkuoŋ shhɛ ŋa pwapuŋ Minnwi pɔ mbɨŋ pugu nɛ.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pighɔ mieŋ vugu mbɨnɨ po nɛ, pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ pighɔ chhu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Pia ghə̄ɨ Bɛtɛlɛhɛiŋ njəɨ nnu yei ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ Taathɔ chwīe pia ji nɛ.” 
Nnɛ pugu kɔnɔ ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ Meri ni Joshɛ, ni muuŋ ghɔ a nūaŋ moŋ ŋkuʼɔ jɨ khí pa minjɨɨ. 
Pugu ni ŋga njəɨ muuŋ vei nchīi nnu ŋa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pighɔ ni nchhu nthɛ muuŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a ni njaʼo nnu ghɔ nɛ ghrāo nnu ŋa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ pighɔ ni ǹchhu nɛ. 
Meri lə̄ɨŋ ŋguoŋ nnu pei njùʼɔ yu nthɔ njwɛrɛ nu. 
Pa ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ pɨ̄nɨ ni vugu, nthɔ ŋgaʼo Minnwi ndɔ mbɨnɨ ntōo vi nthɛ ŋguoŋ nnu pɛ ŋa pugu yaʼo ndɔ njəɨ wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pi shwei vugu nɛ. 
Fúoŋ llɛmbhi ni ŋga ŋkāʼo, pi niʼiŋ muuŋ ghɔ ŋgunu mbrɛi nchhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Jishɔ, mbɔ ligi ŋa ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi ni mfɛ ŋkaoŋ pi maa nshūu vi nɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa fɨʼɨ llɛmbhi ŋa a ni mbie ŋa Joshɛ pugu Meri chwīe mbɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ gɨ́ Mushi chhu nɛ ni ŋkāʼo nɛ, pugu kuʼɔ ni Jishɔ Jerushalɛiŋ lɨʼɨ fɛ vi ni Taathɔ. 
Yei ni mbɔ wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pi nāʼaŋ moŋ gɨ́ Taathɔ nɛ, “Sheshe fǔoŋ phi ŋa a mimbia nɛ, pi nūʼɔŋ vi lɨʼɨ təʼɨ vi ni Taathɔ.” 
Ndɔ mbɨnɨ nuʼuŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ gɨ́ Taathɔ chhu nɛ, “mbɔ paa minthɔ ki paa puoŋ mintuʼɔlibuŋ.” 
Moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ, ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ Jerushalɛiŋ, ligi yi pɔ Shimioŋ. A ni mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ ndɔ mbɔgɔ Minnwi. A ni nthɔ njwɛrɛ nu ŋa lūgu nu thɔ ni puoŋ laʼataoŋ Ishrae, Jijwɛ Minnwi ni mbɔ mbɨŋ yu. 
Jijwɛ Minnwi ni ŋkwo nōoŋ ghɔ ŋa mbaʼa a yiʼi ŋkhu ki lɔ njəɨ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe, ŋa Taathɔ ni ŋkāʼa nɛ. 
Jijwɛ Taathɔ kāoŋ vi ŋa a ghə̄ɨ Nda Minnwi ndɨɨ ŋa Meri pugu Joshɛ ni nthɔ ni muuŋ ghɔ fɔ nɔ chwīe nu nùʼɔŋ mbɨŋ yu ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ gɨ́ ni nchhu nɛ. 
Shimioŋ kwe muuŋ ghɔ ntuo mbhɔ yu, ntōo Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Ndwɛ, Taathɔ, ɔ mieŋ nu ŋa muuŋ fàʼa yɔ khu ndwɛ moŋ ghɨghrɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ chrà yɔ chhu nɛ, 
nthɛ ŋa ligi a yəɨ ŋoŋ ŋa ɔ taoŋ vi ŋa a thɔ ŋkwe ŋgwa nɛ, 
ŋa ɔ pīri vi ŋa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa yəɨ nɛ, 
mbɔ líʼɛ nɔ nōoŋ nu nnu ŋa ɔ tāʼa nu nɛ ni pa taoŋ nduoŋ, mbɨnɨ nthɔ ni ndighaʼo ni ŋgwa pɔ, mbɔ puoŋ Ishrae.” 
Tǎa Jishɔ ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ vi ghrāo pa nnu ŋa Shimioŋ chhu nthɛ Jishɔ nɛ. 
Shimioŋ fɛ mbɔrɔ ni pugu, nchhu ni Meri mǔuŋ vi ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, Minnwi chuʼɔ muuŋ vei ŋa nthɛ vi, ntou ŋgwa shi mbhɛ gha ntou pi lūgu Ishrae, ndɔ mbɔ lì ŋa mbaʼa pi piŋ nɛ, 
nɛnnɛ nɔ nōoŋ nu pa nnu haʼaŋ ŋgwa pīʼi nu njùʼɔ pugu nɛ. Ndɔ ni gɔ̀, ɔ shi mfāʼo yuʼɔ njùʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ pi she njùʼɔ yɔ pi ni kafa.” 
Ndunu miŋgwɛ ŋkugu chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ, ligi yi pɔ Ana, ni mbɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, mbɔ muuŋ Fanue, llɔ moŋ ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ Asha. A ni ndaŋ nchwīe khwachəɨ ŋgaʼo ndaoŋ vi khu, a kɨna ŋkugu ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ fúoŋ wuŋ ŋgaʼo ni yi khwɛ ndɨɨ ŋa a ni njəɨ Jishɔ nɛ. Nɔ ŋkugu, a shi ki lɔ nchaʼa nu Nda Minnwi lɨʼɨ ghaʼo Minnwi moŋ jī ŋkhǐ pugu pa luoŋ nu, ni tuʼu pugu pa naoŋchɨ. 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, a chənə mbara yəɨ Joshɛ pugu Meri, nthɔ ntōo Minnwi, ndɔ nthɔ nchhu pa nnu nthɛ muuŋ ghɔ ni pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nchhɔ njwɛrɛ nu ŋa Minnwi taoŋ njaʼandiʼi ŋa a thɔ ŋkwe Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ. 
Joshɛ pugu Meri ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ ŋguoŋ pa nnu ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ gɨ́ Taathɔ chhu nɛ, mbɨnɨ laʼa pugu Nasharɛ moŋ Galili. 
Muuŋ ghɔ ni ŋkuʼɔ ntɨnɨ, ndɨnaoŋ ni shiethɔ, mbhɔ Minnwi pɔ nu mbɨŋ yu. 
Sheshe ŋgaʼo pa tǎa Jishɔ ghà ŋgə̄ɨ Jerushalɛiŋ nɔ nnu jɨ Lli Njiʼa. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mbɔ paanchrɔ ŋgaʼo, pugu kuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ yugu chhu nɛ lɨʼɨ jɨ Lli Njiʼa. 
Jɨ ghɔ gha ndugwi ti pugu chhɔ mbɨnɨ nu, Jishɔ kɨna njiŋ Jerushalɛiŋ ki pugu lɔ nji. 
Pugu ni mbīʼi ŋa a pɔ shɨna pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɨnɨ nu nɛ, nyīeŋ nɔ taʼa llɛmbhi njɛ̄ tāʼa nu vi shɨna ndaaŋoŋ yugu pugu pa shuoŋ pugu. 
Pugu ni ŋga mieŋ ki yəɨ vi, mbɨnɨ kiʼɛ Jerushalɛiŋ nchhɔ ntāʼa vi. 
Ŋga ntāʼa vi nɔ trɛi llɛ́, ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ vi Nda Minnwi, a chhɔ shɨna pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa nthɔ njwɛrɛ nnu haʼaŋ pugu chhu nu nɛ, ndɔ mbie vugu ni pa píe. 
Ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ni njaʼo vi nɛ ni ŋgrāo fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ji nnu nɛ pugu pa khwɛ̀ ŋa a ni mfɛ nu nɛ. 
Pa tǎa pi ni ŋga njəɨ vi, nja ŋgrāo. Mǔuŋ vi chhu ŋa, “Muuŋ vei, ɔ kie nɛiŋ mfāʼa mbɨŋ pigi nɛiŋ? Līi njəɨ, pigi tǎa ghɔ nì nthɔ ntāʼa ghɔ ni shǐgi.” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ nì nthɔ ntāʼa a ŋa? Pəɨ shi ki lɔ nji ŋa m̀fāʼo nɔ pɔ nu nda Tǎa a?” 
Ndɔ paʼa pugu lɔ nji njiŋ chrà ghɔ ŋa a ni nchhu nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ pugu pa Jishɔ pɨ̄nɨ Nasharɛ a ya njaʼo nchò yugu. Mǔuŋ vi lə̄ɨŋ ŋguoŋ nnu pei ghao njùʼɔ yu. 
Jishɔ ni ŋkuʼɔ nu ŋgū mmɛŋoŋ moŋ shiethɔ pugu pa fɨʼɨ noŋ yi. Minnwi pugu pa ŋgwamishua piŋ vi mbīgi ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ. 
﻿Luka.
3.
Ndɨɨ ŋa Tiberu Kaisha ni ŋkwo pɔ fùoŋ Roma nɔ tiɛŋnchrɔ ŋgaʼo nɛ, Pontiu Pailɛ thɔ shaʼa krao Roma ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Judia nɛ, Hɛrɔ ni nthɔ shaʼa yichəɨ krao, mbɔ Galili. Ndǐŋ vi, mbɔ Fili, ni nthɔ shaʼa yichəɨ krao, pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Iturea pugu Trakoniti, Lishania ni nshaʼa ji pi Abilɛnɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ghɔ, Anaŋ pugu Kaifa ni mbɔ pa taathɔ pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi. Ndɨɨ ghɔ, chrà Minnwi ni nthɔ ni Jouŋ, muuŋ Shakaria moŋ ŋkǔnu njó. 
A ghə̄ɨ moŋ ŋguoŋ ŋkɨŋ Jodaŋ nchhɔ nchīi nu ŋa, “Pəɨ pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ, m̀fɛ ŋkhǐ ni pəɨ, Minnwi līʼɛ phɨ yəɨ.” 
A ni ŋga nchhɔ nchhu yei, nthɔ nchwīe pi nnu ŋa Ishaya nāʼaŋ moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, mbɔ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Ishaya ŋa, “Ŋoŋ chəɨ thɔ mfɛ gɛ̀ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Pīri shɛndaoŋ ni Taathɔ, Chwīe pa lɨʼɨ tɔgɔ pi pɔ pi tithi. 
Pi shi māʼaŋ ŋguoŋ wə́ɨŋ ghao nshə̄rə ŋguoŋ puoŋ mi mbra pugu pa mɛmmɛ pi, njuʼu ŋguoŋ ndaoŋ təɨtəɨ, Ndwēe ŋguoŋ ndaoŋ chəɨŋchəɨŋ. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa shi njəɨ ŋa Minnwi ghà ŋkwe ŋgwa moŋ phɨ pugu.’ ” 
Yú ŋgwa taoŋ nthɔ ŋa a fɛ ŋkhǐ ni pugu. A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pa Mbhɛ mitwɛʼi! A shūu gɔ̌ tə́nə yəɨ ŋa pəɨ tei pɨgɨtua Minnwi ŋa a thɔ nu nɛ? 
Pəɨ chwīe pa nnu pɛ ŋa a kāʼo nɛ, nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa pəɨ kwri, ki lɔ nuʼuŋ nyīeŋ nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Abrahaŋ tǎa vigi.’ Ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa mimfɛ Minnwi pɨʼɨ ŋgùʼɔ pei nchwīe puoŋ nɔ ghɔ mfɛ ni Abrahaŋ. 
Pi kwo pīri njiɛŋ nɔ kəʼɨ nu thɨ nɔ ghɔ, llɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋǐeŋ yi, nthɛ yie ghɔ, sheshe thɨ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi njuŋ ntíɛŋ shiʼi nɛ, pi shi ŋkəʼɨ māʼaŋ moŋ móŋoŋ.” 
Yú ŋgwa pighɔ pie vi ŋa, “Ti pigi shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ?” 
A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo paa ndhwí fɨgəɨ nɛ fɛ taʼa yi ni ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo nɛ, ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo maoŋ jɨ nɛ, fɛ yi pichəɨ ŋgwa.” 
Pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi thɔ ŋkaa pugu ŋa a fɛ ŋkhǐ ni pugu, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, pigi shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ?” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkwe mbɨŋ taashi a tɔgɔ fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a kāʼo ŋa pəɨ kwe nɛ.” 
Pichəɨ shoogɛ pie vi ŋa, “Ti pigi nɛ?” A khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ kwe mbɨŋ ŋoŋ ni nchei. Kiʼi pəɨ nuʼuŋ ndɛʼi ŋgiɛŋ thɔ ŋgwa nɔ fāʼo nu mbɨŋ. Pəɨ yru ni fɨʼɨ yaoŋ ŋa pi ghà mbe vəɨ nɔ ghɔ nɛ.” 
Pa ŋgwa ni nchhɔ njwɛrɛ nu ndɔ mbīʼi thɔ yugu ŋa kəʼɨchəɨ a pɔ nɛnnɛ a pɔ Jouŋ mbɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ. 
Jouŋ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋ̀guʼɔ mfɛ pi ŋkhǐ ni pəɨ, ndɔ yichəɨ ŋoŋ thɔ nu ŋa a chaa a, ǹdɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɔ fēi nu ŋkɨ̌ɨ tra yi, a shi ŋkwe vəɨ ni ŋkhǐ moŋ Jijwɛ Minnwi, pugu pa móŋoŋ. 
A tuo yaoŋ fɨgəɨ reshi mbhɔ yu, mfɨgəɨ mfuʼu ŋkiɛŋ reshi moŋ ŋkuʼu maoŋ nūʼɔŋ shaoŋ yu, ntūoŋ ŋkuʼu maoŋ ghɔ moŋ móŋoŋ ki phɛ.” 
Moŋ ntou puoŋ shɛndaoŋ, Jouŋ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nthɔ nchhu pwa pishaʼakhɔ ni pugu, ŋkaa nu ŋa pugu piŋ. 
Jouŋ ni mbɨ̄ga Hɛrɔ, mbɔ fùoŋ Galili, ŋa a wugwɛi Herodia ŋgwɛ ndǐŋ vi pugu pa pichəɨ nnu pɨphɨ nduoŋ ŋa ju Hɛrɔ ni ŋkwo chwīe nɛ. 
Hɛrɔ pɨnɨ mbīgi phɨ yi nɔ fɨ̄nɨ nu Jouŋ. 
Ŋkaoŋ Jouŋ maa ŋgə̄ɨ chə́ɨŋ, ndɨɨ ŋa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ni ŋkwo kwe ŋkhǐ nɛ, Jishɔ kwe ŋkaa yu, ŋga nchhɔ nduoŋ Minnwi, po ŋaʼaŋ, 
Jijwɛ Minnwi shwiʼi mbɨŋ yu mbɔ nɔ mintuʼɔlibuŋ, ŋggì taoŋ po, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋkiɛŋ muuŋ ŋa ŋ̀khwā, m̀fāʼo pwatua nthɛ ghɔ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njɛ̄ fàʼa yi, mbɔ trɛi wuŋ ŋgaʼo. Ŋgwa ni mbiʼi ŋa a muuŋ Joshɛ, ŋa a ni mbɔ muuŋ Heli, 
mbɔ muuŋ Matate, mbɔ muuŋ Levi, mbɔ muuŋ Mɛlɛki, mbɔ muuŋ Janai, mbɔ muuŋ Joshɛ, 
mbɔ muuŋ Matatia, mbɔ muuŋ Amo, mbɔ muuŋ Nahuŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Eshu, mbɔ muuŋ Nagai, 
mbɔ muuŋ Maa, mbɔ muuŋ Matatia, mbɔ muuŋ Shɛmɛiŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Joshɛke, mbɔ muuŋ Joda, 
mbɔ muuŋ Joanaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Resha, mbɔ muuŋ Shɛrubabɛ, mbɔ muuŋ Shɛatie, mbɔ muuŋ Neri, 
mbɔ muuŋ Mɛlɛki, mbɔ muuŋ Adi, mbɔ muuŋ Koshaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Elemadaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Erɛ, 
mbɔ muuŋ Joshua, mbɔ muuŋ Eliɛja, mbɔ muuŋ Joriŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Matate, mbɔ muuŋ Levi, 
mbɔ muuŋ Shimioŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Juda, mbɔ muuŋ Joshɛ, mbɔ muuŋ Jonaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Eliakiŋ, 
mbɔ muuŋ Melea, mbɔ muuŋ Mɛna, mbɔ muuŋ Matata, mbɔ muuŋ Nataŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Devi, 
mbɔ muuŋ Jeshe, mbɔ muuŋ Obɛ, mbɔ muuŋ Boa, mbɔ muuŋ Shamoŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Nashoŋ, 
mbɔ muuŋ Aminada, mbɔ muuŋ Adamiŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Ani, mbɔ muuŋ Hɛshroŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Pɛrɛ, mbɔ muuŋ Juda, 
mbɔ muuŋ Jakɔ, mbɔ muuŋ Aiji, mbɔ muuŋ Abrahaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Tera, mbɔ muuŋ Nahɔ, 
mbɔ muuŋ Shɛru, mbɔ muuŋ Ruu, mbɔ muuŋ Pɛlɛ, mbɔ muuŋ Eba, mbɔ muuŋ Shela, 
mbɔ muuŋ Kainaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Arafaka, mbɔ muuŋ Shɛiŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Noa, mbɔ muuŋ Lame, 
mbɔ muuŋ Metushela, mbɔ muuŋ Enoke, mbɔ muuŋ Jarɛ, mbɔ muuŋ Mahalale, mbɔ muuŋ Kainaŋ, 
mbɔ muuŋ Ɛnoshe, mbɔ muuŋ Shhɛnte, mbɔ muuŋ Adaŋ, mbɔ muuŋ Minnwi. 
﻿Luka.
4.
Jishɔ ni ndhɔ Jodaŋ ndɨnaoŋ ni Jijwɛ Minnwi. Jijwɛ ghɔ lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó. 
Shata mōoŋ vi fɔ nɔ khwɛ wuŋ llɛmbhi. Moŋ ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ, a shini ndɔ njɨ sheshe yaoŋ, nɛnnɛ njì ni njia vi ndɨɨ ŋa yie ndɨɨ ni mmɛ nɛ. 
Devɨ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ̈ mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi, ɔ chhu ŋgùʼɔ yei kara ŋgū brɛi.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Ŋoŋmishua shiʼa ŋguʼɔ njru pi ŋkuoŋ brɛi təʼɨ vi.’ ” 
Devɨ lɔ̄gɔ vi ŋkuʼɔ nɔ tɔthɨ nōoŋ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi ghɔ taʼa ŋgɛ́ ŋa ŋməɨŋ! 
Nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹshi mfɛ njɨ vɛ nɔ shaʼa nu ŋguoŋ taoŋ, fàʼo yugu pɔ jɔ ti ɔ̈ ŋgaʼo a, m̀fɛ vɛ, nthɛ ŋa pi kwo fɛ vəɨ, ti m̈i ŋkhwā m̀fɛ ni shesheŋoŋ ŋa ŋ̀khwā nɛ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Ghaʼo Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yɔ, ŋguʼɔ mfāʼa pi mbhɔ yu təʼɨ vi.’ ” 
Shata lɔ̄gɔ vi kəʼɨ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ pugu yu Jerushalɛiŋ, ntigi vi ŋkuoŋ nchwɛrɛ Nda Minnwi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ̈ mbɔ Muuŋ Minnwi, ɔ thi hɛiŋ ndhi nchəɨŋ shhɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Minnwi shi mfɛ gɨ́ ni pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi nthɛ ghɔ nɔ kɛ̄ʼi nu ghɔ.’ 
Mbɨnɨ nāʼaŋ ŋa, ‘Pugu shi njā ghɔ tɔthɨ ni mbhɔ, nnɛ ŋa kiʼi ɔ chhwi kwò yɔ ŋkuoŋ ŋgùʼɔ.’ ” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi chhu ŋa, ‘Kiʼi ma njwɛʼi Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yɔ.’ ” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa devɨ ni mīʼɛŋ mōoŋ nu Jishɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ puoŋ shɛndaoŋ nɛ, a mieŋ vi, nchēi shɨna nduoŋ. 
Jishɔ pɨ̄nɨ Galili moŋ ghrɨ́ Jijwɛ Minnwi. Pa chrà nɔ ligi yi nyīeŋ ŋkwe ŋguoŋ lɨʼɨ ghɔ ghao. 
A yɛʼi nu moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi. Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ghaʼo vi ghao. 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ Nasharɛ, mbɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa a ni ŋkuʼɔ nɛ. A gha mbɔ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu, a ghə̄ɨ nda luoŋ Minnwi wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ a ghà mbīgi nchwīe nɛ. Ndɔllɔ ntithi tɔthɨ lɨʼɨ mɛ̄iŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi. 
Pi ni mfɛ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ ŋa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, mbɔ Ishaya, ni nāʼaŋ nɛ. A ŋaʼaŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ ghɔ, njəɨ lɨʼɨ ŋa pi ni nāʼaŋ fɔ ŋa, 
“Jijwɛ Taathɔ pɔ mbɨŋ mu, nthɛ ŋa, a chuʼɔ a ŋa ǹchīi pwa pishaʼakhɔ ni ghaŋ pou. A taoŋ a ŋa ǹchīi lūgu nu ni ghaŋ chə́ɨŋ, ŋa pa nchriligi shi njəɨ lɨʼɨ, nchwīe ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi fɛ vugu ni ŋgəʼɨ nɛ lūgu, 
ndɔ mbɨnɨ nchīi ŋa, ndɨɨ thɔ ŋa Taathɔ shi ŋkwe ŋgwa pi.” 
Jishɔ gha mīʼɛŋ, ŋkra ŋwaʼaŋlɨ ghɔ, mfɛ ni muuŋ fàʼa moŋ nda ghɔ, nchɔchhɔ shhɛ, ligi ŋguoŋ ŋgwa nda luoŋ Minnwi chu mbɨŋ yu. 
A jɛ̄ nthɔ nchhu nu ni pugu ŋa, “Shiʼa, chrà Minnwi yei lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ligi pəɨ!” 
Ŋgwa ni nchrā nnu shiʼi nthɛ vi. Pugu ghrāo pa ŋkwaŋ chrà shiʼi ŋa a ni ntaoŋ nu nchò yu nɛ, mbie nu ŋa, “Yei shi lɔ mbɔ muuŋ Joshɛ?” 
A chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ndɔ njiʼi mfāʼo khuthɔ ŋa pəɨ shi nchhu yei luʼɔ chrà vəɨ ŋa, ‘Ŋgaŋ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ, ghɛ̄rɛ noŋ yɔ pia. Ŋguoŋ pa nnu ŋa pigi yaʼo ŋa ɔ chwīe Kapanuŋ nɛ, pɨnɨ nɛ nuʼuŋ nchwīe hɛiŋ shhɛ laʼa pəɨ.’ ” 
Jishɔ pigi ŋa, “Shishini, pi shiʼa ma mbiŋ sheshe njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi laʼa pugu. 
“Ndɔ, moŋ nnu shini, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa ntou pa ŋkugu ni mbɔ Ishrae moŋ ndɨɨ Elaija, ndɨɨ ŋa Minnwi ni mfɨ̄nɨ po nɔ trɛi ŋgaʼo ni ntɨgao nàoŋ, ndɨɨ ŋa ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ njì ni ŋgū moŋ ŋguoŋ laʼa ghao. 
Ndɔ paʼa Minnwi lɔ njiʼi ntaoŋ Elaija ni kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ vugu, ŋkiɛŋ miŋgwɛ ŋkugu chəɨ Sharafa moŋ laʼataoŋ Shidoŋ. 
Ntou pa ghaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ ni mbɔ Ishrae moŋ ndɨɨ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi Elaisha, ndɔ paʼa Minnwi lɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ kaŋ taʼa yi, ŋkiɛŋ Nemaŋ mbɔ ŋoŋ Shiria.” 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi ni ŋga njaʼo yei, ndɨnaoŋ ni pɨgɨtua, 
njrɛi shhɛ nshūu vi ntaoŋ nɔ moŋ laʼa, ŋkuʼɔ ni ju thɔ nchwɛrɛ mbra ghɔ ŋa pugu ni ŋkrao laʼa muŋu fɔ nɛ, ntāʼa nu māʼaŋ vi moŋ wə́ɨŋ. 
Ndɔ a shoo shɨna yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ni vi. 
Jishɔ shwiʼi Kapanuŋ, mbɔ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ Galili, nthɔ njɛʼi vugu Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu. 
Pugu ni ŋgrāo ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ, nthɛ ŋa a ni njɛʼi ni ghrɨ́. 
Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi ghɔ, mfāʼo jijwɛ miŋwɛiŋ, a ni mbaʼo ŋgòu ni njɨ ŋa, 
“Yo! Pia fāʼo pi khɔ, Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ? Ɔ thɔ pi nɔ pɨrɨ nu vigi? Ǹji ŋoŋ ŋa ɔ yie nɛ, ɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ llɔ mbhɔ Minnwi.” 
Jishɔ pɨ̄ga vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Lɛrɛ laŋ ndɔ ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu!” Miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ gha māʼaŋ vi shhɛ shɨna pugu, ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu kiʼɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ndəɨŋ vi. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pighɔ ghrāo nchhu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi yəɨ ŋkwaŋ chrà nɛiŋ? A fɛ gɨ́ ni pa jijwɛ pɨphɨ ni ghrɨ́ pugu pa njɨ pugu taoŋ!” 
Pi fɨ̄ʼɨ pa nnu nthɛ vi njīŋ ŋguoŋ ŋgei laʼataoŋ ghɔ ghao. 
Jishɔ taoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼa Shemu. Ndɨɨ ghɔ, mǔuŋ ŋgwɛ Shemu thɔ ŋgɨ̄nɔ shɨ̀gao ndiɛŋ, pugu shwei Jishɔ nɔ ghɔ. 
A ghə̄ɨ ntithi yəɨ yu mbɨ̄ga shɨ̀gao ghɔ, a taoŋ mbɨŋ yu. Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ a lɔllɔ, nchwīe maoŋ, mfɛ ni pugu. 
A ni ŋga mbɔ ni fanaoŋ, ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni mfāʼo ŋgwa, pugu ghɨ̌nɔ ŋkwaŋ ŋkwaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ nɛ thɔ ni pugu, a nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi mbɨŋ pugu njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
Pa miŋwɛiŋ taoŋ mbɨŋ pichəɨ ŋgwa, mbaʼo ŋgòu ŋa, “Ɔ Muuŋ Minnwi!” A pɨ̄ga vugu paʼa ndɔ njiʼi mieŋ ŋa pugu chrā, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nji ŋa a Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ. 
Mbhi ni ŋga ndaŋ, Jishɔ taoŋ moŋ laʼa ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó, ŋgwa jɛ̄ nthɔ ntāʼa vi, ŋga njəɨ vi nthɔ ndɨʼɨ vi ŋa kiʼi a mieŋ vugu. 
Ndɔ a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “A pie ŋa ǹchīi pwa pishaʼakhɔ nthɛ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi ni pichəɨ pa laʼataoŋ ŋkaa pugu, nthɛ ŋa a nnu ŋa Minnwi taoŋ a ŋa ǹthɔ nchwīe nɛ.” 
A ni nthɔ nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ ghɔ moŋ pa nda luoŋ Minnwi Judia. 
﻿Luka.
5.
A ni mbɔ llɛ́ chəɨ, Jishɔ thi ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ chəɨ, pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Gɛnɛsharɛ, ŋgwa thɔ fra nu mbɨŋ yu nɔ yaʼo nu chrà Minnwi. 
A yəɨ paa kikuoŋ a kaoŋ ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ, ghaŋ ŋgunu pighɔ kwo taoŋ moŋ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nthɔ shɨ̄gao ndáŋ yugu. 
Jishɔ nii moŋ taʼa kikuoŋ ghɔ, mbɔ yi Shemu, nchhu ghɔ ŋa a tūʼɔ a nii moŋ ŋkhǐ shɨgɛi. A chhɔ pi moŋ kikuoŋ ghɔ nthɔ njɛʼi ŋgwa. 
Jishɔ gha mīʼɛŋ chrā nu, nchhu ni Shemu ŋa, “Chhwi kikuoŋ a pɨnɨ nii lɨʼɨ shishhi. Pəɨ māʼaŋ ndáŋ yəɨ ŋkhǐ nɔ kwo nu shhu.” 
Shemu khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Masha, pigi kwo ya māʼaŋ ŋguoŋ tuʼu paʼa ndɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ yaoŋ, ndɔ nɔ haʼaŋ a chhu gɔ̀ nɛ, ǹshi māʼaŋ ndáŋ pighɔ ŋkhǐ.” 
Pugu ni ŋga māʼaŋ ndáŋ yugu, ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ŋkiɛŋ ntou shhu ti pa ndáŋ yugu jɛ̄ shāa nu. 
Pugu krao pichəɨ pakwo ŋgunu pugu ŋa pugu thɔ ŋgɛ̄rɛ vugu. Pugu thɔ mfuʼu shhu niʼiŋ moŋ paa kikuoŋ ghɔ, a lɨnaoŋ ti ntāʼa nu njīe. 
Shemu Pita ni ŋga njəɨ yei nnu, ŋgū ni kwɛ́rɛ yi shhɨ Jishɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Lɔllɔ shhɨ a, ma Taathɔ, m̀bɔ pi ŋgaŋ nchwīe phɨ.” 
Nduthɔ Shemu pugu pa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɔ nɛ ghrāo nthɛ fɨʼɨ ntou shhu ŋa pugu ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ nɛ. 
Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ mbɔ puoŋ Shebedi ni ŋgrāo ŋkaa pugu, mbɔ pakwo ŋgunu Shemu. Jishɔ chhu ni Shemu ŋa, “Kiʼi nuʼuŋ mbɔgɔ, jɛ̄ ndwɛ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ, ɔ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ pi ŋgwamishua.” 
Pugu ni ŋga ntaoŋ ŋkaoŋ pa kikuoŋ yugu mbhi, mieŋ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ghao njōu njiŋ Jishɔ. 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mbɔ moŋ laʼataoŋ chəɨ, ŋga njəɨ nu, ŋoŋ chəɨ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ kwo kru vi ti ŋgaʼa yəɨ vi, ŋgū ni puŋ yi shhɛ ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa, “Taathɔ, ɔ̈ ŋkhwā, ɔ chwīe m̀bɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ.” 
Jishɔ fɛ mbhɔ yi ŋkāoŋ vi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ǹtāʼa nu, pɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ!” Chomilaoŋ ghɔ, ghɨnɔmbaluŋ mmɛ mbɨŋ yu. 
Jishɔ fɛ gɨ́ ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nshwei ŋoŋ, ndɔ ghə̄ɨ nōoŋ noŋ yɔ ni ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi a līi ghɔ nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa Minnwi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ, ndɔ mfɛ yaoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ nɔ haʼaŋ gɨ́ Mushi chhu nɛ.” 
Ndɔ pa pishaʼakhɔ nthɛ vi ka mīʼɛŋ nyieŋnyieŋ mbīgi moŋ ntou lɨʼɨ, ntou yú ŋgwa kɨrɨ nɔ yaʼo nu pa nnu llɔ mbhɔ yu, a lɔ mbɨnɨ njɨ̄gɨ pa ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
Ndɔ a thɔ mfuʼu noŋ yi, ŋgə̄ɨ nu lɨʼɨ ŋa ŋoŋ shi ki lɔ mbɔ nɛ, nthɔ nduoŋ Minnwi. 
Llɛ́ chəɨ ni ŋga mbɔ Jishɔ thɔ njɛʼi nu nɛ, pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ chhɔ yəɨ yu. Pugu ni ndhɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ Galili, ni Judia, ni Jerushalɛiŋ. Ghrɨ́ Taathɔ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ Jishɔ nɔ yɨ̄gɨ nu ghɨ̌nɔ. 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pichəɨ pa ŋgwa tiɛŋ ŋkwíni ŋkuoŋ kúoŋ nthɔ nu nɔ ghɔ, mbaʼo nɔ nii nu ni ju nda, nūʼɔŋ vi shhɨ Jishɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa ŋgwa ni njiɛŋ ni njɨ nɛ, paʼa pugu lɔ mfāʼo shɛndaoŋ nɔ nii nu ni ju. Nɛnnɛ pugu tiɛŋ vi ŋkuʼɔ nɔ thɔnda, ŋaʼaŋ mbo fɔ, nshwiʼi vi ŋkuoŋ kúoŋ ghɔ tri kɨrɨ shhɨ Jishɔ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni njəɨ fɨʼɨ piŋ ŋa pugu fāʼo nɛ, a chhu ni ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋa, “Taannu a, pi līʼɛ pa phɨ pɔ.” 
Pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi jɛ̄ nchhu nu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi gɔ̌ ŋa a nūʼɔŋ noŋ yi nɔ lɨʼɨ Minnwi? Mimfɛ a līʼɛ gɔ̌ ndīʼɛ phɨ ŋkiɛŋ Minnwi təʼɨ vi?” 
Jishɔ ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi nu nɛ mbie vugu ŋa, “Pəɨ kie nɛiŋ nthɔ mbīʼi ŋkwaŋ nnu pei nɛiŋ? 
A yīʼɛ yəɨ, chhu nu ŋa, ‘Ǹdīʼɛ phɨ yɔ’, ki chhu nu ŋa, ‘Lɔllɔ nyieŋ’? 
Yei pɔ nɔ chwīe nu ŋa pəɨ ji ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua fāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ līʼɛ nu pa phɨ.” A chhu ni ŋkwíni ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹchhu vɛ ŋa lɔllɔ, lɔ̄gɔ kúoŋ yɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼa.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, a lɔllɔ ligi pugu, ndɔ̄gɔ yaoŋ ŋa a ni nūaŋ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nɛ, ŋgə̄ɨ laʼa nchhɔ ŋgaʼo Minnwi. 
Ŋguoŋ yugu ni ŋgrāo, wiwini wɛ̄iŋ vugu, pugu ghaʼo Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pigi yəɨ ŋkiɛŋ nnu ghraoghrao shiʼa!” 
Ŋguoŋ nnu pei ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, Jishɔ taoŋ mbhi njəɨ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ taashi chəɨ, ligi yi pɔ Levi, a chhɔ moŋ ntǎa kwe taashi, Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Thɔ njōu njiŋ a.” 
A mieŋ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ghao, ndɔllɔ njōu njiŋ yi. 
Levi pīri mmɛ jɨ nda yu nɔ ghaʼo nu Jishɔ. Ntou pa ŋgwɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ŋgwa nduoŋ ni nthɔ jɨ ghɔ ŋkaa pugu. 
Pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi luo nu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jishɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “A chwīe khɔ pəɨ jɨ yaoŋ ndɔ nnu nu pəɨ pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɔ shishiʼi nɛ lɔ mfāʼo chà ŋgaŋ fhɔ̌, a fāʼo ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu ghɨ̌nɔ nu nɛ. 
Ǹdɔ njiʼi nthɔ pi nɔ gɛ̄ nu ŋgwa ndɨndɨ, ǹthɔ nthɛ pi ghaŋ phɨ, ŋa pugu pāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ.” 
Pa thishɨ Nda Minnwi pie vi ŋa, “Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ ghà njiɛŋ njī ŋkhǐ nduoŋ Minnwi, ghaŋ younjiŋ pa ŋgwa Farashi wuʼɔ nchwīe pi nɛnnɛ. Ti a chwīe khɔ pa jɔ jɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu nu?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Mimfɛ ɔ lāa maoŋ jɨ ni ghaŋ gɛ̀ lɨʼɨ láŋ ndɨɨ ŋa mimbia ŋgaŋ láŋ ghɔ wuʼɔ mbɔ pugu pugu nɛ? 
Llɛ́ shi nthɔ ŋa pi shi mfuʼu mimbia láŋ ghɔ moŋ shɨna pugu, nɛnnɛ, pugu shi njī ŋkhǐ moŋ llɛ́ pighɔ.” 
Jishɔ chhu luʼɔ chrà yei ni pugu, “Mbaʼa ŋoŋ shāa ndhwí fhi nchri paʼo ŋkuoŋ ndunu ndhwí nɔ ghɔ. Ä nchwīe nɛnnɛ, kaŋ a pɨrɨ ndhwí fhi ghɔ ndɔ mbaʼa pra ndhwí fhi ghɔ yiʼi nyīeŋ ŋkāʼo pugu yi ndunu. 
A wuʼɔ haʼaŋ a pɔ ni mikei ŋgrào nɛ. Mbaʼa ŋoŋ niʼiŋ laʼo fhi moŋ ndunu mikei ŋgrào. Ä nchwīe nɛnnɛ làʼo fhi ghɔ fāʼo ntūgu mikei ghɔ nthɛ ŋa minthɛ paʼa a lɔ nuʼuŋ shwīi mbīgi, kaŋ làʼo ghɔ shi ŋkwrī, mikei ŋgrào ghɔ pɨrɨ gha. 
A lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nnɛ. Pəɨ wuʼɔ fāʼo nɔ niʼiŋ nu làʼo fhi moŋ mikei ŋgrào fhi. 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ mbɔ fɔ ŋa a ghà ŋga ŋkwo nnu ndunu làʼo mbɨnɨ ntāʼa làʼo fhi. Nthɛ ŋa a shi nchhu ŋa a pwa ndunu làʼo.” 
﻿Luka.
6.
A ni mbɔ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu chəɨ, Jishɔ nyīeŋ ntɔgɔ nu moŋ nyìeŋ shíe gɛ, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ka shíe gɛ, nchiʼi ŋkrù nu. 
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa Farashi pie ŋa, “A kie pi nɛiŋ pəɨ thɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa gɨ́ lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ ŋa pi chwīe Llɛ́ Ji nɛ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pəɨ lɔ naa mɛ̄iŋ nnu ŋa Devi ni nchwīe ndɨɨ ŋa njì ni njia vugu pa ŋgwa pi nɛ? 
A ni nii Nda Minnwi, ndɔ̄gɔ brɛi ŋa pi ni mfɛ ni Minnwi ŋkru ndɔ mbɨnɨ fɛ ni ŋgwa pi, mbɔ nnu ŋa gɨ́ shini ndɔ mbiŋ ŋa minthɛ shesheŋoŋ kru, ŋkiɛŋ ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi.” 
Jishɔ lūgwi nchhu ŋa, “Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua taathɔ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu.” 
A ni mbɔ yichəɨ Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu, Jishɔ nii nda luoŋ Minnwi njɛʼi nu. Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋgei mbhɔ yi yi jɨ pɔ yi kwikwi. 
Ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi ni nthɔ ntāʼa shɨna nɔ wɛ̄iŋ nu Jishɔ ŋa a chwīe nnu ŋa a lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɛ. Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pugu pɛʼi vi, njəɨ ŋa a shi njwiŋ mbhɔ ŋoŋ ghɔ Llɛ́ Ji. 
Ndɔ a ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi nu nɛ, nchhu ni ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa mbhɔ yi ni kwikwi nɛ ŋa, “Lɔllɔ ntithi shhɨ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa.” A lɔllɔ ntithi. 
Jishɔ pɨnɨ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Mfāʼo píe yei ni pəɨ. Gɨ́ piŋ ŋa pi chwīe pi yəɨ Llɛ́ Ji, nnu shiʼi ki nnu pɨphɨ? Kwe nu ŋoŋ ki jwi nu mi?” 
Jishɔ kara noŋ yi mbɛʼi ŋguoŋ yugu ghao, nchhu ni ŋgaŋ ŋɨnɛiŋ mbhɔ ghɔ ŋa, “Shwīi mbhɔ yɔ.” A shwīi, mbhɔ yi kiʼi ndɔ mbɔ pi shiʼi. 
Túa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pighɔ pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi pɨgɨ ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi, pugu jɛ̄ nthɔ ŋkri nnu ŋa mimfɛ pi chwīe mbɨŋ Jishɔ nɛ. 
Moŋ llɛ́ pighɔ, Jishɔ taoŋ ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra lɨʼɨ luoŋ Minnwi. Ŋkɨna fɔ nduoŋ Minnwi ŋguoŋ tuʼu ghao. 
Mbhi ni ŋga ndaŋ, a gɛ̄ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, ntɛrɛ paanchrɔ shɨna pugu, mɛ̄iŋ vugu ni ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi; 
Shemu, ŋa a ni nchhɔ̄ ligi yi ni Pita, ni Andru ndǐŋ vi, ni Jɛiŋ, pugu Jouŋ, ni Fili, ni Batolomiu, 
ni Matio, pugu Toma, ni Jɛiŋ mbɔ muuŋ Afioshi, ni Shemu ŋa pi ni mɛ̄iŋ vi ni kwìni laʼa nɛ, 
ni Judashi, mbɔ muuŋ Jɛiŋ, ni Judashi Ishikario ŋa a ni mfīni vi nɛ. 
Jishɔ shwiʼi pugu pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi moŋ pɨprəɨ pugu pa ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ yú ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pugu pa ntou ŋgwa llɔ Judia ni Jerushalɛiŋ, ni ŋgwa llɔ ŋkɨŋ mmɛ ŋkhǐ Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ. 
Pugu ni nthɔ lɨʼɨ yaʼo pa nnu mbhɔ yu, a lɔ mbɨnɨ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. Ŋgwa ŋa jijwɛ miŋwɛiŋ ni ŋgana vugu nɛ ni nthɔ ŋkaa pugu a kwe vugu. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pighɔ ni mbaʼo nu nɔ kāoŋ nu vi nthɛ ŋa njɨ ni ntaoŋ nu mbɨŋ yu nthɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu ghao. 
A kə̄rə ligi yi mbɛʼi ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Mbɔrɔ yəɨ mbɔ ghaŋ pou, nthɛ ŋa shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi shi mbɔ yəɨ. 
Mbɔrɔ yəɨ ŋa njì yia vəɨ ndwɛ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɛ njru. Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ kə̄ɨ nu nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɛ ŋgwɛ̄. 
Mbɔrɔ yəɨ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgwa pɨ̄na vəɨ, mfuʼu vəɨ shɨna pugu ndɔ ŋgwɛʼi vəɨ, ndɔ mɛ̄iŋ ligi yəɨ ŋa pəɨ ŋgwa pɨphɨ nthɛ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua. 
“Pəɨ fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ ndɔ ndhi ni pwatua nnɛ nthɛ ŋa kɨ̀nɛiŋ yəɨ yiɛŋ po. A wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pa tǎa pugu ni nchwīe ni pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nɛ. 
“Ndɔ ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ ghaŋ fàʼo nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ kwo fāʼo yəɨ nchhɔ́ shiʼi. 
Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ yru ndwɛ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa njì lɛ njia vəɨ, Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ gwɛ̄ nu ndwɛ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ lɛ ŋkə̄ɨ ndɔ njūa. 
Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa piŋ vəɨ piŋ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa a wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pa tǎa pugu ni mbiŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ mifɨɨ nɛ. 
“Ndɔ ni gɔ̀ ŋa ɔ yaʼo nnu ŋa ǹchhu nu nɛ, khwā mbɨ̄na yɔ, nchwīe shiʼi mbɨŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɨ̄na ghɔ nɛ. 
Luoŋ mbɔrɔ mbhɔ Minnwi mfɛ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu chɔ̄nɔ ghɔ nɛ, nduoŋ Minnwi mfɛ ni ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu fɛ ŋgəʼɨ vɛ nɛ. 
Ŋ̈oŋ ŋgwie ghɔ nɔ ghə̀ʼɨ yɔ, ɔ nōoŋ ŋgei nduoŋ ghɔ a pɨnɨ ŋgwie, ŋ̈oŋ nshiri mmɛ ndhwí fɨgəɨ yɔ ŋkwe, ɔ mieŋ fɔ a kwe muuŋ ndhwí yɔ ŋkaa yu. 
Ŋ̈oŋ nduoŋ yaoŋ mbhɔ ghɔ, ɔ fɛ ghɔ, ti ŋ̈oŋ nshiri yaoŋ yɔ ŋkwe, ɔ mieŋ ghɔ. 
Chwīe mbɨŋ ŋgwa nduoŋ nnu haʼaŋ ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa pugu chwīe mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
“Ä mbɔ ŋa ɔ wuʼɔ ŋkhwā pi ŋgwa ŋa pugu khwā ghɔ nɛ, ɔ fāʼo mbɔrɔ kiʼɛ nthɛ pi khɔ? Nthɛ ŋa njiʼi nthɛ pi pa ghaŋ phɨ ghà ŋkhwā pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu khwā vugu nɛ. 
Ä mbɔ ŋa ɔ wuʼɔ nchwīe shiʼi pi mbɨŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu chwīe shiʼi mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ, ɔ fāʼo mbɔrɔ kiʼɛ nthɛ pi khɔ? Njiʼi nthɛ ghaŋ nchwīe phɨ ghà ŋguʼɔ nchwīe pi nɛnnɛ. 
Ɔ̈ ŋguʼɔ fōo yaoŋ pi ni ŋgwa ŋa pugu shi mbɨnɨ nduʼu nɛ, ɔ fāʼo mbɔrɔ nthɛ pi khɔ? Njiʼi nthɛ ghaŋ chwīe phɨ ghà mfōo pichəɨ ghaŋ chwīe phɨ ni yaoŋ, nji nu ŋa pugu lɛ nduʼu. 
“Ndɔ khwā ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɨ̄na ghɔ nɛ, nchwīe shiʼi mbɨŋ pugu, mfōo ŋoŋ ni yaoŋ ki lɔ njwɛrɛ nu ŋa a pɨnɨ nduʼu, nnɛ kaŋ kɨ̀nɛiŋ yɔ shi njiɛŋ, a lɔ nōoŋ ŋa ɔ muuŋ Minnwi ŋa a Chaapifuoŋ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa a ghà nōoŋ pwapuŋ ni ŋgwa ŋa pugu lɔ nji shiʼi nɛ pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ. 
Fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ Minnwi Tǎa ghɔ fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ nɛ. 
“Kiʼi nshaʼa ŋgwa nduoŋ nnɛ ŋa kiʼi pi shaʼa ghɔ. Kiʼi ntuo ŋoŋ nɔ ŋgushaʼa, kaŋ mbaʼa ŋoŋ tuo ghɔ nɔ ŋgushaʼa. Līʼɛ phɨ ŋgwa, kaŋ pi shi ndīʼɛ jɔ. 
Fɛ yaoŋ ni ŋgwa nduoŋ, kaŋ pi shi mbɨnɨ mfɛ jɔ. Yaoŋ ŋa ɔ fɛ nɛ shi mbɨnɨ mbɨnɨ mbhɔ ghɔ pi niʼiŋ ti mfrɛ̄i, nchɨʼɨ ŋa a lɨnaoŋ ti ŋkwrī. Yaoŋ ŋa ɔ fɨ̄ʼɨ yaoŋ moŋ ghɔ mfɛ nɛ, ki a ghaʼo ki a kɨgəɨ, pi shi ŋguʼɔ mfɨ̄ʼɨ pi moŋ ghɔ nduʼu vɛ.” 
Jishɔ shwei luʼɔ chrà yei ni pugu: “Mbaʼa nchriligi nōoŋ shɛndaoŋ ni yichəɨ nchriligi, ä nōoŋ, kaŋ ŋguoŋ vugu shi ŋgū moŋ tiɛŋ. 
Mbaʼa ŋgaŋ younjiŋ ŋoŋ chaa masha vi, ndɔ ndɨɨ ŋa ŋoŋ mīʼɛŋ yɛʼi nu yaoŋ nɛ, a fhi Masha vi. 
“A chwīe khɔ ɔ yəɨ muuŋ ŋkuʼu thɨ ŋa a pɔ ligi ndǐŋ ghɔ, ndɔ ki lɔ mfāʼo ndɨɨ ni mmɛ mbɨɨ ŋkwɛiŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ jɔ ligi nɛ? 
Ki minthɛ ɔ kie nɛiŋ nchhu ni ndǐŋ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ǹaʼaŋ mfuʼu ŋkuʼu thɨ ŋa a pɔ ligi ghɔ nɛ’, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ mmɛ mbɨɨ ŋkwɛiŋ ŋa a pɔ moŋ jɔ ligi nɛ. Ŋgaŋ mifɨɨ yei, fǔoŋ mfuʼu mmɛ Kuo thɨ ŋa a pɔ ligi ghɔ nɛ, nnɛ kaŋ ɔ shi njəɨ lɨʼɨ shishiʼi nɔ fuʼu nu ŋkuʼu thɨ ŋa a pɔ ligi ndǐŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
“Nthɛ ŋa thɨ shiʼi shiʼa njuŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ pɨphɨ, ndɔ paʼa thɨ pɨphɨ lɔ njuŋ ntíɛŋ thɨ shiʼi. 
Pi ghà nji ŋkiɛŋ thɨ pi ŋkuoŋ ntíɛŋ yi. Pi shiʼa ndɨ̄ga ŋguuŋ laʼo shǐe, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋka chìa ŋkuoŋ mbiembie. 
Ŋoŋ shiʼi ghà nchrā nnu shiʼi llɔ shɨna pa nnu shiʼi ŋa a lɨnaoŋ njùʼɔ yu nɛ, ŋoŋ pɨphɨ chrā nnu pɨphɨ llɔ shɨna pa nnu pɨphɨ ŋa a lɨnaoŋ njùʼɔ yu nɛ, nthɛ ŋa njùʼɔ ghà ŋga ndɨnaoŋ, nchò chrā. 
“A chwīe khɔ ɔ thɔ mɛ̄iŋ a ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, Taathɔ,’ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa ǹchhu vɛ nɛ? 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a thɔ njəɨ a njaʼo nchrā a nchwīe ndɔ haʼaŋ ǹchhu nɛ, ǹshi nshwei ghɔ ni ŋkwaŋ yaoŋ ŋa a fhi nɛ. A pɔ nɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a gha nthɔ ŋkrao nda, nja ntou kwò yi a shhi, a nūʼɔŋ ŋkuoŋ ŋgùʼɔ. Nɨnəɨ gha mbɨ̄gəɨ, ŋkhǐ thɔ mbɨŋ nda ghɔ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nchɨʼɨ vi nthɛ ŋa pi ni nja ŋkrao vi shiʼi. 
Ndɔ ti ŋoŋ ŋa a yaʼo chrà a ki lɔ nchwīe nɛ pɔ nɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a krao nda shhɛ ndɔ ki lɔ nūʼɔŋ kwò yi, nɨnəɨ gha mbɨ̄gəɨ, ŋkhǐ thɔ mbɨŋ nda ghɔ, a gū wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ nwīʼiŋ ghao.” 
﻿Luka.
7.
Jishɔ ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ chhu nu ŋguoŋ pa nnu pei ni ŋgwa pighɔ, ŋgə̄ɨ Kapanuŋ. 
Nthishɨ taʼa ŋkɨɨ pa shoogɛ Roma ni mfāʼo muuŋ fàʼa vi ŋa a ni nja ŋkhwā vi. Muuŋ fàʼa vi ghɔ ni nja ŋgɨ̄nɔ nu ti mbiʼi shɨgɛi ŋkhu. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa a ni njaʼo pa nnu nɔ ligi Jishɔ nɛ, a taoŋ pa thishɨ ŋgwa Juu ghɔ ŋa a thɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ muuŋ fàʼa vi. 
Pugu ni ŋga nthɔ mfɨ̄ʼɨ ni Jishɔ, ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋkiɛŋ yie ghɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei kāʼo ŋoŋ ŋa a pie ŋa ɔ ghɛ̄rɛ vi, 
nthɛ ŋa a khwā ŋgwa pia, ŋkrao ju nda luoŋ Minnwi yia.” 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ pugu pugu. A ni ŋga nthɔ ti mbara chonda, nthishɨ ghɔ taoŋ taannu pi ŋa pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, kiʼi ŋgwie noŋ yɔ, ǹdɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɔ ŋoŋ ŋa mimfɛ ɔ nii nda a nɛ. 
Ndɔ paʼa ǹdɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɔ thɔ nu njəɨ ghɔ nduthɔ a. Wuʼɔ fɛ pi gɨ́ noŋ muuŋ fàʼa a tɔgɔ. Nthɛ ŋa mmu nduthɔ a, ŋ̀ga mfāʼa mbhɔ ŋgwa, ndɔ nthɔ nshaʼa pa shoogɛ ŋkaa mu. Ŋ̀ga mfɛ gɨ́ ni yei ŋa, ‘Ghə̄ɨ!’ a ghə̄ɨ. Mfɛ gɨ́ ni vini ŋa, ‘Thɔ!’ a thɔ. Mfɛ gɨ́ ni muuŋ fàʼa a ŋa, ‘Chwīe yei!’ a chwīe.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, ŋgrāo, nchhu ni yú ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njōu njiŋ yi nɛ ŋa, “Njiʼi nthɛ pi Ishrae ǹdɔ naa njəɨ ŋoŋ a fāʼo fɨʼɨ piŋ yei.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pi ni ntaoŋ vugu ni mbɨnɨ nda nthishɨ pa shoogɛ ghɔ nɛ, pugu yəɨ muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ, ghɨ̌nɔ yi kwo tɔgɔ. 
A gha ndara, Jishɔ lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼataoŋ chəɨ pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Naiŋ. Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pugu pa mmɛ yú ŋgwa pɔ njiŋ yu. 
A ni ŋga mbara nu choŋkaʼa laʼataoŋ ghɔ, ŋga njəɨ nu pi tiɛŋ khu ŋoŋ ntaoŋ nu nɔ, mbɔ fiɛŋ muuŋ mimbia mbhɔ mǔuŋ vi, ndɔ mbɔ miŋgwɛ ŋkugu. Yú ŋgwa, llɔ laʼataoŋ ghɔ, pɔ pugu pa miŋgwɛ ghɔ. 
Taathɔ ni ŋga njəɨ miŋgwɛ ghɔ, mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ yu nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nuʼuŋ ŋkə̄ɨ,” 
ŋgə̄ɨ ŋkaoŋ ŋkuŋkhu ghɔ, ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ntiɛŋ nɛ tithi. A chhu ŋa, “Maʼaŋ mikhwa, ǹchhu vɛ ŋa, lɔllɔ.” 
Ŋkukhu ghɔ lɔllɔ nchɔchhɔ njɛ̄ chrā nu, Jishɔ fɛ vi ni mǔuŋ vi. 
Pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ ŋguoŋ yugu ghao, pugu ghaʼo Minnwi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Mmɛ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi chəɨŋ shɨna pia.” Mbɨnɨ nchhu ŋa, “Minnwi thɔ nɔ kwe nu ŋgwa pi.” 
Pishaʼakhɔ yei nɔ ligi Jishɔ nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ Judia ghao pugu pa laʼataoŋ ŋkɨŋ Judia. 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ Jouŋ ni ŋga shwei vi ni ŋguoŋ pa nnu ŋa Jishɔ ni nchwīe nɛ, a mɛ̄iŋ yi paa shɨna pugu 
ntaoŋ vugu ni Taathɔ ŋa pugu pie vi ŋa, “A gɔ̀ mbɔ ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋa a shi nthɔ nɛ, ki pigi ywɛrɛ ŋoŋ nduoŋ?” 
Paa ŋgwa pighɔ gha ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ Jishɔ, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ taoŋ vigi vɛ ŋa pigi pie ŋa ‘A gɔ̀ mbɔ ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋa a shi nthɔ nɛ, ki pigi ywɛrɛ ŋoŋ nduoŋ?’ ” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, Jishɔ yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ntou ŋgwa pugu pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa jijwɛ pɨphɨ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ pugu nɛ, ŋaʼaŋ ligi pa nchriligi. 
A khwɛ̄ ni pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Jouŋ ŋa, “Pəɨ pɨ̄nɨ shwei Jouŋ ni yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ yəɨ ndɔ njaʼo nɛ, pa nchriligi yəɨ lɨʼɨ, pa ŋkwíni nyīeŋ, ghaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ pɔ shiʼi, pa fhɨtənə yaʼo lɨʼɨ, pi pɨʼɨ pa ŋgwa khu moŋ gu, pi chīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ ni ghaŋ pou. 
Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo kɨʼɨŋgɨnɨ moŋ piŋ yugu nthɛ a nɛ.” 
Pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Jouŋ ni ŋga ŋkwo ghə̄ɨ, Jishɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ nchrā nu ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ nthɛ Jouŋ, “Pəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó njəɨ pi khɔ fɔ? Trǔ ŋa fɨfrəɨ chɨ̄ʼɨ nu? Ŋga! 
Ti pəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ kiʼɛ njəɨ pi khɔ fɔ? Ŋoŋ ŋa a ni māʼaŋ ŋkiɛŋ ndhwí chɨgəɨ nchuoŋ? Ŋga! Līi njəɨ, ŋgwa ŋa pugu ghà māʼaŋ ŋkwaŋ ndhwí pighɔ nɛ ndɔ mbɔ moŋ nchhɔ shiʼi nɛ ghà mbɔ pi moŋ ntuʼɔ pa fùoŋ. 
Shwei a nɛ, ti pəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu kiʼɛ njəɨ pi khɔ fɔ? Njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi? Ooŋ, ǹshwei vəɨ, ŋoŋ ŋa a chaa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Jouŋ ŋoŋ ŋa chrà Minnwi chrā nɔ ligi yi ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, ǹshi ntaoŋ ŋgaŋ ntaoŋ a, a ghə̄ɨ shhɨ pəɨ mbīri ndaoŋ ni pəɨ.’ ” 
Jishɔ pɨnɨ mbīgi ŋa, “Ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa Jouŋ ghaʼo nchaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa piŋgɛ kwo ma mbhi nɛ, ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a kɨgəɨ nchaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi nɛ ghaʼo nchaa Jouŋ.” 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pugu pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi ni ŋga njaʼo yei nnu, mbiŋ ŋa nnu ŋa Minnwi chwīe nɛ yi ndɨndɨ, mbɔ ŋgwa ŋa Jouŋ ni mfɛ ŋkhǐ ni pugu nɛ. 
Ndɔ pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ lāa nnu ŋa Minnwi ni ŋkāʼa nthɛ vugu nɛ, nnɛ ki lɔ ntɔgɔ moŋ kwe ŋkhǐ Jouŋ. 
Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nchhu ŋa, “Mi nthɛ m̀āʼaŋ fɨʼɨ ŋgwa mbhi shiʼa pi ni khɔ? Pugu fhi pi khɔ? 
Pugu pɔ nɔ pa mikəʼɨ ŋa pugu chhɔ taŋ, taʼa kwíe chhu nu ni vichəɨ ŋa, ‘Pigi māʼaŋ ŋkhǐ pwanjuʼɔ ni pəɨ, ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ mbini, pigi yrāo ŋkhǐ gu ndɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ ŋkə̄ɨ.’ 
Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ni nthɔ, ki lɔ ŋkru brɛi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nnu làʼo pəɨ chhu ŋa ‘a fāʼo miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ yu.’ 
Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua thɔ njɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu nu, pəɨ ŋa, ‘a njru mmɛ yaoŋ ndɔ mbɔ mbaa làʼo, mbɨnɨ mbɔ taannu ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa ghaŋ phɨ.’ 
Ndɔ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu piŋ shiethɔ Minnwi nɛ nōoŋ ŋa shiethɔ ghɔ yi shini.” 
Yichəɨ taʼa Farashi ni mɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ ŋa a thɔ pugu yu jɨ maoŋ, a ghə̄ɨ nda Farashi ghɔ nchɔchhɔ lɨʼɨ jɨ maoŋ. 
Miŋgwɛ chəɨ ni mbɔ moŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ, mbɔ nchwīe phɨ, ŋga njaʼo ŋa Jishɔ pɔ nda ŋoŋ Farashi ghɔ lɨʼɨ jɨ maoŋ, a thɔ ni yichəɨ nchɨ́ŋ ŋa pi chwīe ni ŋgùʼɔ, laminda tɨnɨnchuoŋ lɨnaoŋ moŋ ghɔ, 
nthi njiŋ Jishɔ, yəɨ kwò yu ŋkə̄ɨ nu, ŋkwrī ŋkhǐ ligi yi nɔ kwò yi, njɨ̄gɨ ni ŋgiithɔ yi, nthɔ nuaŋ kwò yi, mbɔrɔ kwò yi ni laminda ghɔ. 
Ŋoŋ Farashi ghɔ ni ŋga njəɨ yei nnu nchhu ni noŋ yi ŋa, “Ŋ̈oŋ vei kaŋ nja mbɔ njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, a kaŋ nji ŋkwaŋ ŋoŋ ŋa miŋgwɛ vei ŋa a chhɔ ŋkāoŋ vi yie ghɔ nɛ, ŋkwaŋ chɔmbhi pɨphɨ ŋa a ghà nchhɔ nɛ.” 
Nɔ khwɛ̄ nu Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Shemu, m̀fāʼo nnu nɔ chhu nu vɛ.” Shemu pie ŋa, “Mbɔ khɔ, ŋgaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa?” 
“Yichəɨ ŋgaŋ fōo ŋgwa ni mbɨŋ ni mbɔ fɔ mfāʼo paa ghaŋ ŋkru pi. Ŋkrù yi pɔ puŋ taʼa yi mbɔ fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋ̈oŋ mfāʼa nɔ tiɛŋ ŋkɨɨ llɛ́ pi pe vi nɔ nɛ, yichəɨ pɔ fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa ŋ̈oŋ mfāʼa nɔ tiɛŋ wuŋ llɛ́, pi pe vi nɔ nɛ. 
Paʼa kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ vugu lɔ mfāʼo mbɨŋ ghɔ nɔ pe nu ni ŋoŋ ghɔ, nthɛ yie, a chiʼi ŋkrù yugu ghɔ. A yəɨ shɨna pugu ŋa a shi ŋkhwā vi nchaa vichəɨ?” 
Shemu khwɛ̄ ŋa, “M̀bīʼi ŋa a yɛ ŋa ji ŋkrù ni njiɛŋ nɛ.” Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ chhu a kāʼo.” 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ kara ndīi miŋgwɛ ghɔ, nchhu ni Shemu ŋa, “Ɔ yəɨ miŋgwɛ vei? Mi nì nii nda ghɔ paʼa ɔ lɔ mfɛ ŋkhǐ shɨ̄gao kwò vəɨ, ndɔ miŋgwɛ vei shɨ̄gao kwò ma ni ŋkhǐ ligi yi, ndɔ njɨ̄gɨ ni ŋgiithɔ yi. 
Ɔ shini ndɔ nchhu ŋa ǹthɔ a pwa ni paŋ nu ma, ndɔ jɛ̄ nɔ haʼaŋ ǹthɔ hɛiŋ nɛ, a lɔ naa mieŋ nuaŋ nu kwò ma yaʼa. 
Ɔ shini ndɔ njiʼi mbɔrɔ thɔ a ni wru, ndɔ ti a pɔrɔ kwò ma ni laminda chɨgəɨ nchuoŋ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹchhu vɛ ŋa fɨʼɨ ntou khwǎ ŋa a nōoŋ nɛ, nōoŋ ŋa pi līʼɛ phɨ yi ŋa a yiɛŋ nɛ. Ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a wuʼɔ nchwīe pi shɨgɛi phɨ, pi līʼɛ nɛ, nōoŋ khwā pi shɨgɛi yi.” 
Jishɔ chhu kiʼɛ ni miŋgwɛ ghɔ ŋa, “Ǹdīʼɛ phɨ yɔ.” 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi nɛ, jɛ̄ nchhu nu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi gɔ̌ ŋa a pɔ ti ndīʼɛ pi phɨ ŋoŋ?” 
A chhu ni miŋgwɛ ghɔ ŋa, “Piŋ yɔ chwīe ɔ lūgu, ghə̄ɨ ni gɔ moŋ ghɨghrɨ.” 
﻿Luka.
8.
A ni ŋga ndaʼa, Jishɔ nyīeŋ moŋ pa mɛmmɛ laʼataoŋ pugu pa puoŋ mi laʼataoŋ, nthɔ nshwei pwa pishaʼakhɔ mbɔ yi Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi. A ni mbɔ pugu pa paanchrɔ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi, 
pugu pa pichəɨ piŋgɛ, ŋa a ni mfuʼu jijwɛ pɨphɨ mbɨŋ pugu, mbɨnɨ njɨ̄gɨ pa ghɨ̌nɔ mbɨŋ pugu. Piŋgɛ pighɔ ni mbɔ Meri, ŋa pi ni mɛ̄iŋ vi ni Madaliŋ, ŋa khwachəɨ miŋwɛiŋ ni ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu nɛ, 
ni Joana, mbɔ ŋgwɛ Kusha, mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa Hɛrɔ, ni Shushana, pugu pa ntou pichəɨ piŋgɛ ŋa pugu ni nthɔ ŋgɛ̄rɛ Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi llɔ moŋ yugu ŋkaa nu nɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ntou yú ŋgwa ni nthɔ ŋkɨrɨ nu, pichəɨ llɔ moŋ ntou pa lɨʼɨ nyīeŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu yəɨ Jishɔ nɛ, a chhu yei luʼɔ chrà ni pugu: 
“Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni ma mbɔ fɔ, ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ māʼaŋ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ. Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni māʼaŋ nu nɛ, pichəɨ gū shɛmbua, ŋgwa tie ni kwò yugu, pa mishi llɔ tɔthɨ shwiʼi kru. 
Pichəɨ gū moŋ shhɛ ŋkwá, ŋga ŋkhɛ̄, ŋkiʼi ndɔ njaoŋ yaoŋ nthɛ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo ŋkhǐ. 
Pichəɨ gū moŋ shishaʼa, shishaʼa yīʼɛ ŋkuʼɔ mfīgi maoŋ pighɔ pugu khu. 
Pichəɨ mbhɛ̌ maoŋ pighɔ ni ŋgū moŋ shhɛ shiʼi mbūgu fɔ ndɔ nja njuŋ, nchaa mbhɛ̌ yi ni ŋkɨɨ ŋgɛ.” Jishɔ ghà ŋga nchhu nnu pei mīʼɛŋ, mfɛ gɛ̀ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə nɛ, â yaʼo.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pie vi ŋa, “Njiŋ luʼɔ chrà ghɔ pɔ pi ŋa?” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Minnwi chwīe pəɨ ji pa nnu lə̄ɨŋ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ yi. Ndɔ ni pichəɨ ŋgwa, a pɔ pi moŋ luʼɔ chrà nnɛ ŋa: ‘Pugu shi ndīi, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ; Njwɛrɛ ndɔ paʼa, ndɔ njaʼo nji.’ 
“Yei njiŋ luʼɔ chrà ghɔ: Mbhɛ̌ yaoŋ ghɔ chrà Minnwi. 
Pɛ mbhɛ̌ ŋa a ni ŋgū shɛmbua thɔ nōoŋ pi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi, ndɔ devɨ thɔ fuʼu chrà ghɔ njùʼɔ pugu, nnɛ ŋa mbaʼa pugu piŋ ndɔ ndūgu. 
Pa mbhɛ̌ pɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋgū moŋ shhɛ ŋkwá nɛ pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà ghɔ, mbiŋ ni pwatua ndɔ paʼa ŋǐeŋ yugu lɔ ntɨnɨ. Pugu piŋ nɔ kuo ndɨɨ, mōoŋ nu gha nthɔ pugu pāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu. 
Pa mbhɛ̌ ŋa pugu ni ŋgū moŋ shishaʼa nɛ, ŋgwa ŋa pugu piŋ chrà Minnwi, mbiŋ, ŋga ŋgə̄ɨ pa ghaghana, pa fāʼo, ni nchhɔ́ shiʼi ŋkuoŋ ŋgrào mbhi yei fīgi vugu, paʼa ntíɛŋ yugu lɔ ma ntɨnɨ. 
Ndɔ ti mbhɛ̌ moŋ shhɛ shiʼi pɛ ŋgwa ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi ni ŋkiɛŋ njùʼɔ shiʼi, ndɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ a tɨnɨ, ŋgwɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ ti njuŋ ntíɛŋ. 
“Ŋoŋ shiʼa nchuʼu truka ŋkuru ni mikru ki niʼiŋ laʼo kúoŋ, ŋoŋ ghà nchuʼu ntigi pi lɨʼɨ thi truka, nnɛ ŋa ŋgwa ŋa pugu nii nu nda nɛ yəɨ liʼɛ ghɔ. 
Yichəɨ yaoŋ lɔ mbɔ fɔ ŋa pi lə̄ɨŋ ŋa mbaʼa pi ma mieŋ ki nōoŋ lɨʼɨ wo, ki nnu ŋa pi kuru ŋa mbaʼa pi ma mieŋ ki ji a lɔ mbɨnɨ ntaoŋ lɨʼɨ liʼɛ. 
Lɨna nu kiʼɛ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ ywɛrɛ nnu nɛ, nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ, pi shi mbīgi ntou yi ghɔ, ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo nɛ, pi shi ŋkwe shɨgɛi yɛ ŋa a pīʼi ŋa a fāʼo nɛ mbhɔ yu.” 
Mǔuŋ Jishɔ pugu pa lǐŋ pi pi pimbia thɔ lɨʼɨ yəɨ vi, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo shɨna nthɛ yú ŋgwa yəɨ yu. 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Mǔuŋ ghɔ pugu pa lǐŋ pɔ pi pimbia pɔ nɛ mbhi ntāʼa nu njəɨ ghɔ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Mǔuŋ a pugu pa lǐŋ paŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi ndɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa chrà ghɔ chhu nɛ.” 
Llɛ́ chəɨ, Jishɔ nii moŋ kikuoŋ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nchhu ŋa, “Pia shāʼa ntaoŋ njiɛŋ hiŋ.” Nnɛ pugu wɛ̄iŋ ndaoŋ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nchwi kikuoŋ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ, lɔgɔ wɛ̄iŋ Jishɔ. Mmɛ fiŋ gū moŋ ŋkhǐ, ŋkhǐ jɛ̄ lɨnaoŋ nu moŋ kikuoŋ yugu, ti pugu thi pi moŋ gu. 
Pugu ghə̄ɨ ŋgūʼu Jishɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, “Masha! Masha! Pia khu nu nɛ ma!” A wūʼu, mbɨ̄ga fɨfrəɨ ghɔ pugu pa fiŋ moŋ ŋkhǐ, ŋguoŋ yi tithi, moŋ ŋkhǐ ju. 
A chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Piŋ yəɨ pɔ pi hɨŋ?” Pugu pɔgɔ ndɔ ŋgrāo, nchhu ni noŋ pugu ŋa, “Yei pɔ pi yəɨ ŋkwaŋ ŋoŋ, ŋa a fɛ gɨ́ ni fɨfrəɨ pugu pa fiŋ ŋa pugu tithi pugu yaʼo nnɛ?” 
Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shāʼa ŋkhǐ llɔ Galili ntaoŋ krao ŋgei Gerasha. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ taoŋ moŋ kikuoŋ nɛ, mbāoŋ pugu yichəɨ ŋoŋ a fāʼo pa miŋwɛiŋ, a shini ndɔ māʼaŋ ndhwí nɔ ntaaŋ ndɨɨ, paʼa ndɔ ndaʼa nu nda, ŋka laʼa pi moŋ lɨʼɨ twei ŋgwa. 
A ni ŋga njəɨ Jishɔ, mūʼuŋ ŋgòu, ŋgū shhɛ shhɨ yu, nchhu ni njɨ ŋa, “Pɔgɔ fāʼo pi khɔ, Jishɔ Muuŋ Minnwi ŋa a chaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa nɛ? M̀baʼo mbhɔ shhɨ ghɔ, kiʼi niʼiŋ a moŋ ŋgəʼɨ!” 
A ni nchhu yei nthɛ ŋa Jishɔ ni ŋkwo fɛ gɨ́ ni miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ ŋa a taoŋ mbɨŋ yu. Yiɛŋ ndɨɨ miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ ni nthɔ ncho vi, njiʼi nthɛ nɔ haʼaŋ pi ni ŋkrao mbhɔ mi, ŋgwɛ kipaʼo nɔ kwò mi nthɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi vi nɛ, a shi ŋguʼɔ njaʼa maoŋ pighɔ yaʼa, miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ fra vi ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ moŋ ŋkǔnu njó. 
Jishɔ pie vi kiʼɛ ŋa, “Ligi yɔ khɔ?” A ŋa, “Ligi a Káʼa Yi,” nthɛ ŋa ntou miŋwɛiŋ ni nii mbɨŋ yu. 
Pa miŋwɛiŋ pighɔ lɨ̄gəɨ Jishɔ ŋa kiʼi a fɛ vugu moŋ lɨʼɨ ŋgəʼɨ. 
Ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ kwíe ŋkunyaŋ ni nthɔ njɨ nu fɔ ŋkɨŋ mbra, pugu lɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a mieŋ pugu nii moŋ pa ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ, a mieŋ vugu. 
Pugu taoŋ kiʼɛ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ ghɔ, nii mbɨŋ pa miŋkunyaŋ pighɔ. Ŋguoŋ kwíe ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ tei llɔ ŋkɨŋ mbra ghɔ, nshwiʼi ŋkɨŋ ŋkhǐ, ŋgū moŋ ghɔ ŋkhu. 
Ghaŋ kɛ̄ʼi ŋkunyaŋ pighɔ ni ŋga njəɨ nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, ntaoŋ tei ŋgə̄ɨ nchhu moŋ laʼa pugu pa moŋ nyìeŋ. 
Ŋgwa taoŋ nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu njəɨ nnu haʼaŋ a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. Ŋga nthɔ njəɨ Jishɔ, njəɨ ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa miŋwɛiŋ pighɔ ni ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu nɛ, a chɔchɔ yəɨ yu ni ndhwí mbɨŋ yu ndɔ mbɔ shishiʼi, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu. 
Pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njəɨ nnu ghɔ nɛ, shwei vugu ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pi kwe ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋa pa miŋwɛiŋ ni mbɔ mbɨŋ yu nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa moŋ krao ŋgei Gerasha yōu Jishɔ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ, nthɛ ŋa ŋkiɛŋ pɔgɔ gu ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu. Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ nii moŋ kikuoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ. 
Ŋoŋ ŋa miŋwɛiŋ pighɔ ni ntaoŋ mbɨŋ yu lɨ̄gəɨ Jishɔ ŋa, “Mieŋ ǹthɔ pɔgɔ ghə̄ɨ kaʼa.” Jishɔ lāa, nchhu nu ŋa, 
“Pɨnɨ laʼa, nshwei ŋgwa pɔ fɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Minnwi fāʼa mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ.” Ŋoŋ ghɔ nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ laʼa nthɔ mfɨ̄ʼɨ nnu ŋa Jishɔ chwīe mbɨŋ yu nɛ. 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ ni mbɨnɨ nɛ, pa ŋgwa ni nchhu ghɔ ŋa a thɔ a pwa, nthɛ ŋa ŋguoŋ vugu ni nchhɔ njwɛrɛ vi. 
Ŋoŋ chəɨ ŋa ligi yi Jairu, yɨ̄ga nchəɨŋ. A ni mbɔ mmɛŋoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi, ŋgū shhɛ shhɨ Jishɔ nchhɔ ndɨ̄gəɨ vi ŋa a thɔ nda yu, 
nthɛ ŋa fiɛŋ muuŋ vi yi miŋgwɛ ŋa a ni mfāʼo, mbɔ muuŋ paanchrɔ ŋgaʼo, ni nthɔ ŋkhu nu. Ndɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ wɛ̄iŋ ndaoŋ nɛ, yú ŋgwa ni nthɔ mfra vi moŋ ŋguoŋ ŋgei ghao. 
Shɨna ŋgwa pei, miŋgwɛ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋa a ki yəɨ ndɨɨ yi ni njɨ nɔ paanchrɔ ŋgaʼo, ŋkwo tūoŋ ŋguoŋ mbɨŋ yi ghao mbhɔ pa doktɔ, ndɔ paʼa pi lɔ nchwīe ndɨɨ yi yaʼa. Kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ shi ki lɔ njiʼi mbɔ ŋa a kaŋ ni mfɛ a chwīe ghɨ̌nɔ yi mmɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ, a ni nthɔ njiŋ Jishɔ ŋkāoŋ po ndhwí yi. Ndɨɨ yi ghɔ lɔ ŋkiʼɛ njaʼa yaʼa chomilaoŋ ghɔ. 
Jishɔ pie ŋa, “A kāoŋ gɔ̌ ŋkāoŋ a?” Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ni ŋga ndāa noŋ yugu, Pita chhu ŋa, “Taathɔ, yú ŋgwa thɔ ŋkɨrɨ nu ndɔ mfra ghɔ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Yichəɨ ŋoŋ kāoŋ a, mi nì njaʼo ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ njɨ ntaoŋ mbɨŋ mu.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa miŋgwɛ vei ni njəɨ ŋa yichəɨ shɛndaoŋ lɔ mbɔ ŋa mimfɛ a lɛ̄rɛ nɛ, a wrū nthɔ nu, ŋgū shhɛ ni puŋ yi shhɨ Jishɔ ndɔ mfɨ̄ʼɨ shhɨ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa nnu haʼaŋ a ni nchwīe vi a kāoŋ Jishɔ nɛ, pugu pa ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ yi mmɛ chomilaoŋ ghɔ nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ, Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Muuŋ a, piŋ yɔ chwīe ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ tɔgɔ, ghə̄ɨ ni gɔ moŋ ghɨghrɨ Minnwi.” 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ Jishɔ wuʼɔ nchhɔ nchrā nu nɛ, yichəɨ ŋoŋ llɔ nda Jairu, mmɛŋoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi, nthɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Muuŋ ghɔ kwo khu, kiʼi nuʼuŋ ŋgana masha ghagha.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni njaʼo nnu yei nɛ, a chhu ni Jairu ŋa, “Kiʼi nuʼuŋ mbɔgɔ gu, wuʼɔ nchhɔ mfāʼo pi piŋ, nnɛ kaŋ muuŋ ghɔ shi ndūgu.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Jishɔ ni nchəɨŋ nda Jairu nɛ, a shini ndɔ mbiŋ ŋa ŋoŋ nduoŋ nii nda ŋkiɛŋ Pita pugu Jouŋ ni Jɛiŋ, ni tǎa muuŋ miŋgwɛ ghɔ pugu mǔuŋ vi. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ni nthɔ ŋkə̄ɨ nu ndɔ njūa vi, Jishɔ ka chhu pi ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkə̄ɨ, nthɛ ŋa a lɔ ŋkhu, a lɛllɛ.” 
Pugu gwɛ̄ vi nthɛ ŋa pugu ni nji ŋa a kwo khu. 
Jishɔ ka wɛ̄iŋ pi mbhɔ yi, mɛ̄iŋ nchhu ni njɨ ŋa, “Miyaa, lɔllɔ!” 
A ywiŋ, ndɔllɔ jijwɛ yi pɨnɨ, a lɔllɔ tɔthɨ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ. Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa pugu fɛ maoŋ ghɔ a jɨ. 
A ni ŋgrāo tǎa vi pugu mǔuŋ vi. Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa kiʼi pugu shwei shesheŋoŋ ni nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. 
﻿Luka.
9.
Jishɔ gɛ̄ paanchrɔ pighɔ lɨʼɨ muʼɔŋ mfɛ njɨ pugu pa ghrɨ́ ni pugu nɔ fuʼu nu pa miŋwɛiŋ ndɔ njɨ̄gɨ pa ghɨ̌nɔ, 
ntaoŋ vugu ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ nchīi Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi ndɔ mbɨnɨ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ. 
Nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Kiʼi pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ sheshe yaoŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nyìeŋ ghɔ nɛ. Kiʼi pəɨ lɔ̄gɔ mbìe, ki pìɛŋ kra, ki maoŋ jɨ, ki mbɨŋ, ki ŋgə̄ɨ ni pa kwri ndhwí. 
Sheshe nda ŋa pəɨ nii fɔ nɛ, pəɨ laʼa fɔ ti shi nuʼuŋ ntaoŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ. 
Sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa pi lɔ mbiŋ vəɨ fɔ nɛ, pəɨ krū kwò məɨ, ntaoŋ ni vəɨ laʼataoŋ ghɔ nɔ nōoŋ nu ni pugu ŋa Minnwi pɨ̄na nnu ŋa pugu chwīe nɛ.” 
Pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi pighɔ taoŋ, nyīeŋ moŋ ŋguoŋ puoŋ mi laʼataoŋ ghao, nthɔ nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ ghɔ ndɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋguoŋ lɨʼɨ ghao. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa Hɛrɔ, mbɔ fùoŋ Galili, ni njaʼo ŋguoŋ nnu pei nɛ, thɔ yi fiŋ nthɛ ŋa pichəɨ ŋgwa ni nthɔ nchhu nu ŋa Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ ni ŋgwa pɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ. 
Pichəɨ chhu yugu ŋa Elaija nōoŋ noŋ yi, pichəɨ chhu yugu pi ŋa yichəɨ taʼa ndunu njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi pɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ. 
Hɛrɔ chhu ŋa, “Ŋki yaʼa thɔ Jouŋ, ndɔ yei pɨnɨ mbɔ pi gɔ̌ ŋa njaʼo pa nnu nɔ ligi yi nɛ?” Mbaʼo nɔ yəɨ nu Jishɔ vei. 
Ghaŋ ntaoŋ Jishɔ pighɔ ni ŋga mbɨnɨ, nshwei vi ni ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa pugu ni nchwīe nɛ. Jishɔ lɔ̄gɔ vugu pugu pugu fuʼu noŋ yugu shɨna ŋgwa, ŋgə̄ɨ Beshaida. 
Yú ŋgwa ni ŋga njaʼo, njōu njiŋ yi. Jishɔ gha nchhu ni pugu ŋa pugu thɔ a pwa, nthɔ nchīi ŋkɨ̀nɨ pwa pishaʼakhɔ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi ni pugu, njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋgɨ̄nɔ nu nɛ. 
Minaoŋ ni ŋga njɛ̄ nii nu, paanchrɔ ghaŋ ntaoŋ pighɔ thɔ njəɨ Jishɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Chhu ŋgwa pei ghə̄ɨ, nji ŋa minthɛ pugu ghə̄ɨ moŋ pa laʼa pugu pa mooŋ mbàŋ mbambara, ntāʼa lɨʼɨ laʼa pugu pa maoŋ jɨ, nthɛ ŋa lɨʼɨ yei pɔ pi ŋkǔnu njó.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ fɛ maoŋ pugu jɨ.” Pugu chhu ŋa, “Ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ŋa pigi fāʼo nɛ wuʼɔ tiɛŋ brɛi pugu paa shhu. Ɔ taʼa nu ŋa pigi ghə̄ɨ njuoŋ maoŋ jɨ ni mbalaŋ ŋgwa pei?” 
Pimbia ni mbɔ fɔ nchəɨŋ nɔ tiɛŋ ŋkaŋ yugu. Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pighɔ ŋa, “Pəɨ chhu ni pugu ŋa pugu chɔchɔ shhɛ, taʼa kwíe pɔ nɔ tiɛŋ wuŋ ŋgwa.” 
Pugu wuʼɔ nuʼuŋ njaʼo pi nɛnnɛ, nchwīe ŋguoŋ ŋgwa chɔchɔ. 
A gha ndɔ̄gɔ tiɛŋ kəɨŋ brɛi ghɔ ni paa shhu ghɔ, mbɨʼɨ ligi yi ndīi po ntōo Minnwi, mbəʼɨ, mfɛ ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa pugu ghrā ni ŋgwa pighɔ. 
Ŋguoŋ yugu kru ti njru, ti pugu lɨ̄ga pa pəʼɨ pi ŋa a ni mbɨgəɨ nɛ, a lɨnaoŋ paanchrɔ mikuo. 
Taʼa llɛ́ chəɨ ni mbɔ, Jishɔ thɔ nduoŋ Minnwi təʼɨ vi, pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi thɔ mbara vi. A pie vugu ŋa, “Pa ŋgwa ghà nchhu ŋa mi pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Pugu khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pichəɨ ŋgwa ghà nchhu ŋa ɔ Jouŋ Ŋgaŋ Fɛ Ŋkhǐ, pichəɨ ŋa ɔ Elaija, pichəɨ ŋa ɔ taʼa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi llɛshhɨ ŋa a pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkuʼɔ.” 
A pie vugu ŋa, “Ti pəɨ nɛ? Pəɨ chhu yəɨ ŋa mi gɔ̌?” Pita khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ɔ Ju ŋa Minnwi Chuʼɔ Ntaoŋ nɔ Ŋkwe nɛ, llɔ mbhɔ Minnwi.” 
Jishɔ fɛ tɨtɨnɨ gɨ́ ni pugu ŋa kiʼi pugu shwei nnu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ ni shesheŋoŋ. 
Mbɨnɨ nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi ŋguʼɔ njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ nthɛ ntou pa nnu, pa thishɨ pa Juu pugu pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi lāa vi, pi jwi vi, a gha ndaʼa trɛi llɛ́ a kuʼɔ.” 
Mbɨnɨ nchhu ni ŋguoŋ vugu ŋa, “S̈hesheŋoŋ ntāʼa nu njōu njiŋ a, â mieŋ phi nnu haʼaŋ a khwā nɛ, ntiɛŋ wáʼa yi sheshe llɛ́ ndɔ njōu njiŋ a. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu ndūgu ni chɔmbhi yi nɛ shi nshiɛŋ chɔmbhi yi ghɔ, ti ŋoŋ yɛ ŋa a mīʼaŋ chɔmbhi yi nthɛ a nɛ, shi ndūgu ni chɔmbhi yi ghɔ. 
Ŋoŋmishua nthɛ a shei pi khɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ä mfāʼo ŋguoŋ yaoŋ moŋ mbhi hɛiŋ ndɔ mbhɛ chɔmbhi yi? 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo lrithɔ mbɨŋ mu, ki ni chrà a nɛ, Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mfāʼo lrithɔ mbɨŋ yu ndɨɨ ŋa a thɔ moŋ ndighaʼo yi nɛ, pugu pa ndighaʼo Tǎa, ni pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ taoŋtaoŋ. 
Ndɔ ǹchhu pi nnu shini ni pəɨ ŋa pichəɨ ŋgwa thi hɛiŋ ŋa mbaʼa pugu khu ki lɔ njəɨ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi.” 
A ni ŋga nchhu nnu pei ti ndaʼa taʼa taŋ, ndɔ̄gɔ Pita, ni Jouŋ, ni Jɛiŋ pugu pugu kuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra lɨʼɨ luoŋ Minnwi. 
Ndɔ haʼaŋ a ni nthɔ nduoŋ Minnwi nɛ, miŋi mi kwri mbɔ ŋkwaŋ nduoŋ, ndhwí pi fugu, nchīa ŋa ŋmɛiŋ nɔ fiembɨ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu nɛ, paa ŋgwa chrā nu pugu yu, pugu ni mbɔ Mushi pugu Elaija, 
nōoŋ noŋ yugu moŋ ndighaʼo pa po, nthɔ nchrā nu ŋkuoŋ nnu gu yi ŋa ju Jishɔ ni nthɔ nchwīe nu ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ Jerushalɛiŋ, ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ Minnwi ni nūʼɔŋ nɛ. 
Ndɔ lɔgɔ ni njiɛŋ mbɨŋ Pita pugu pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu pugu ni mbɔ nɛ. Pugu gha nja ŋgūʼu, njəɨ líʼɛ ndighaʼo Jishɔ, pugu pa paa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa a ni nthi pugu pugu nɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgwa pighɔ ni mieŋ Jishɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ, Pita chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, a pwa nɔ haʼaŋ pia pɔ hɛiŋ kaʼa nɛ, pigi shi ŋkrao trɛi ntǎa! Taʼa yi vɛ, taʼa yi ni Mushi, taʼa yi ni Elaija.” Ndɔ a shini ndɔ njiʼi nji nnu ŋa a ni chhu nu nɛ. 
A ni ŋga ŋguʼɔ nchrā nu, lúluŋ shwiʼi ŋkuru vugu, pɔgɔ gu wɛ̄iŋ vugu nɔ haʼaŋ lúluŋ ghɔ ni ŋkuru vugu nɛ. 
Yichəɨ ŋggì chhu moŋ lúluŋ ghɔ ŋa, “Yei Muuŋ a ŋa ǹchuʼɔ vi, p̂əɨ yaʼo mbhɔ yu.” 
Ŋggì ghɔ ni ŋga nchrā ti mīʼɛŋ, pugu yəɨ Jishɔ pi təʼɨ vi, nūʼɔŋ nnu pei shɨna pugu, ki lɔ njiʼi nshwei shesheŋoŋ ni nnu ŋa pugu yəɨ nɛ wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ. 
Mbhi ni ŋga ndaŋ, Jishɔ pugu pa trɛi ghaŋ ntaoŋ pi pighɔ shwiʼi llɔ ŋkuoŋ mbra ghɔ, ŋkiɛŋ mmɛ kɨrɨ ŋgwa thɔ mbara Jishɔ. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu, yichəɨ ŋoŋ paʼo ŋgòu moŋ kɨrɨ ghɔ, nchhu ŋa, “Masha, m̀baʼo mbhɔ vɛ, līi muuŋ a vei njəɨ, ndɔ mbɔ fiɛŋ yi. 
Yichəɨ miŋwɛiŋ ghà ncho vi, a wīʼi mbaʼo ŋgòu, miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ māʼaŋ vi shhɛ, a kwēi nu, faʼofaʼo taoŋ nu nchò yu, nja nchhɔ nwīʼiŋ vi nwīʼiŋ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mieŋ vi! 
Mi ni ndɨ̄gəɨ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ ŋa pugu fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ mbɨŋ yu, pugu fuʼu kie.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Pəɨ ŋgwa ki fāʼo piŋ, ŋgwa pɨphɨ, mi shi nchhɔ pia pi fɨʼɨ ndɨɨ nɛiŋ, mfāʼo fɨʼɨ wɛ̄iŋ njùʼɔ nɛiŋ nthɛ vəɨ? Thɔ ni muuŋ ghɔ hɛiŋ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ muuŋ ghɔ ni nthɔ nu nɛ, miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ māʼaŋ vi shhɛ, a kwēi nu, faʼofaʼo taoŋ nu nchò yu. Jishɔ pɨ̄ga miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ, njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yi, mfɛ vi ni tǎa vi. 
Ŋguoŋ ŋgwa ni ŋgrāo fɨʼɨ ghrɨ́ ŋa Minnwi fāʼo nɛ. Ŋgwa ni ŋga ŋguʼɔ nthɔ ŋgrāo ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa Jishɔ ni nchwīe nɛ, a chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, 
“P̂əɨ yaʼo nnu yei ŋa ǹtāʼa nchhu ni pəɨ nɛ shishiʼi! Pi tɔthɔ nchaʼa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua mfɛ liɛŋ mbhɔ ŋgwamishua.” 
Ndɔ paʼa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi lɔ nji njiŋ nnu ghɔ. Pi ni ndə̄ɨŋ vugu nɔ nnɛ ŋa kiʼi thɔ yugu shie ni nnu ghɔ, ndɔ pugu pɔgɔ nɔ pie nu vi ni nnu ghɔ. 
Mindoundou gū shɨna ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa a gɔ̌ mbɔ ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ nchaa pichəɨ? 
Jishɔ ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi nu njùʼɔ pugu nɛ, ndɔ̄gɔ muuŋ mbrɔ nūʼɔŋ yəɨ yu, 
nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ muuŋ vei nɔ ligi a nɛ piŋ pi mmu, ti shesheŋoŋ ŋa a piŋ a nɛ, piŋ pi ŋoŋ ŋa a taoŋ a nɛ. Nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋ ŋa a kɨgəɨ shɨna pəɨ nchaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa nɛ, a ju mbɔ ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ nchaa ŋguoŋ yəɨ.” 
Jouŋ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Masha, pigi yəɨ ŋoŋ a fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ ni ligi yɔ, pigi lāa ghɔ nthɛ ŋa pigi pugu shiʼa njōu njiŋ yɔ kaʼa.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kiʼi nuʼuŋ ndāa ghɔ nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ ndāa ghɔ nɛ pɔ ŋgei ghɔ.” 
Pa llɛ́ ni ŋga mbara nu ŋa pi shi ndɔ̄gɔ Jishɔ po nɛ, a lɔ̄gɔ nthi mi tɨtɨnɨ nɔ ghə̄ɨ nu Jerushalɛiŋ. 
A taoŋ ghaŋ ntaoŋ shhɨ, pugu ghə̄ɨ nii moŋ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ moŋ Shamaria nɔ pīri nu ŋguoŋ pa yaoŋ ghɔ. 
Ndɔ paʼa ŋgwa pighɔ lɔ mbiŋ vi nthɛ ŋa a shini ndɔ nuʼuŋ mbɔ pi nnu khuthɔ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ pi Jerushalɛiŋ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, Jɛiŋ pugu Jouŋ, ni njəɨ nnu pighɔ nɛ, pugu pie vi ŋa, “Taathɔ, ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa pigi mɛ̄iŋ móŋoŋ po, a shwiʼi njɨ̄gɨ vugu?” 
Jishɔ shrī mbɨ̄ga vugu. 
Pugu pugu kara kiʼɛ ŋgə̄ɨ laʼataoŋ nduoŋ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu shɛndaoŋ nɛ, yichəɨ ŋoŋ chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Ǹshi njōu njiŋ yɔ sheshe lɨʼɨ ŋa ɔ shi ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ”. 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pa mimbaaŋguo fāʼo pa pùo pugu, pa mishi fāʼo pa nda pugu, ndɔ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo lɨʼɨ lɛ̄rɛ thɔ yi.” 
Jishɔ kara nchhu ni yichəɨ ŋoŋ ŋa, “Thɔ njōu njiŋ a.” Ŋoŋ ghɔ chhu ŋa, “Taathɔ, fǔoŋ mieŋ ŋ̀gə̄ɨ ntwei tǎa a ŋkaoŋ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Mieŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu khu nɛ twei khu ŋgwa pugu. Ndɔ ni gɔ̀ ghə̄ɨ nchīi shaʼa nu fùoŋ Minnwi.” 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ pɨnɨ nchhu ŋa, “Ǹshi njōu njiŋ yɔ, ma Taathɔ, ndɔ fǔoŋ mieŋ ŋ̀gə̄ɨ nchāʼa ŋgwa laʼa pigi.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a wɛ̄iŋ ŋkɨɨ naʼaŋ fāʼa nyìeŋ ŋa a fāʼa nyìeŋ, mbɨnɨ ŋkara nthɔ ndīi njiŋ nɛ, lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo ghɛ̀rɛ moŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi.” 
﻿Luka.
10.
Pa nnu pei ni ŋga ntɔgɔ, Taathɔ pɨnɨ ntɛrɛ khwachəɨ wuŋ ŋgwa ni yi paa ntaoŋ vugu pa pi paa ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ shhɨ yu moŋ ŋguoŋ pa laʼataoŋ pɛ ŋa a tāʼa nu ŋgə̄ɨ fɔ nɛ. 
A ni nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Maoŋ kwōo yiɛŋ ndɔ ghaŋ kwōo pi kɨgəɨ. Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pəɨ luoŋ ni taʼanjuʼɔ mbhɔ Taathɔ ŋa a fāʼo maoŋ pighɔ nɛ ŋa a taoŋ pa ghaŋ fàʼa pugu ghə̄ɨ ŋkwōo maoŋ pi. 
P̂əɨ ghə̄ɨ! Ǹtaoŋ vəɨ nɔ pa puoŋ minjɨɨ shɨna pa miŋaŋieŋ. 
Kiʼi ntuo pìɛŋ mbɨŋ, ki pìɛŋ maoŋ jɨ, ki kwri tra. Kiʼi nchrā ni ŋoŋ shɛndaoŋ. 
“Sheshe nda ŋa pəɨ nii fɔ nɛ, fǔoŋ nchhu ŋa, ‘Ghɨghrɨ pɔ moŋ nda hɛiŋ.’ 
Ti ŋ̈oŋ mbɔ fɔ ŋa a khwā ghɨghrɨ, kaŋ ghɨghrɨ yɔ shi nshwiʼi mbɨŋ yu. Ŋkiɛŋ nɛnnɛ, kaŋ ghɨghrɨ yɔ shi mbɨnɨ mbhɔ ghɔ. 
Kɨna moŋ yie nda nthɔ njɨ nu ndɔ nnu sheshe yaoŋ ŋa pi fɛ vɛ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa a pie ŋa ŋgaŋ fàʼa fāʼo pe yi. Kiʼi nyīeŋ pi nda nda. 
“Sheshe laʼataoŋ ŋa pəɨ nii fɔ pi piŋ vəɨ fɔ nɛ, pəɨ jɨ sheshe yaoŋ yɛ ŋa pi fɛ ni pəɨ fɔ nɛ. 
Pəɨ yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ pa ŋgɨ̌nɔ fɔ, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi thɔ nɛ ti mbara yəɨ pəɨ.’ 
Ndɔ ti p̈əɨ nii moŋ sheshe laʼataoŋ ki pugu lɔ mbiŋ vəɨ, pəɨ ghə̄ɨ taʼandaoŋ pugu nchhu fɔ ŋa, 
‘Ti mfɛ pi ni pru laʼataoŋ yəɨ ŋa a kuʼɔ nɔ kwò miŋi nɛ, pigi yɨ̄gɨ nɛ mfɛ thɔ pəɨ. Ndɔ pəɨ kwiŋ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi thɔ nɛ ti mbara.’ 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa, a shi njiʼɛ ni laʼataoŋ Shodoŋ nchaa yie laʼataoŋ ŋa pugu lāa vəɨ nɛ. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ, ma ŋgwa Korashiŋ! Ŋgəʼɨ pɔ ni pəɨ, ma ŋgwa Beshaida! Nthɛ ŋa pa nnu ghraoghrao pei ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ hɛiŋ nɛ, kaŋ ni mbɔ pi Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ, pugu kaŋ ni ŋkwo māʼaŋ ndhwí ywei gu nchhɔ moŋ phu nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa pugu pāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ. 
Mbapa nɛnnɛ, a shi ndɛ njiʼɛ ni laʼataoŋ Tairɛ pugu Shidoŋ moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa nchaa vəɨ. 
Ndɔ ni pəɨ, ma ŋgwa Kapanuŋ, pəɨ pīʼi ŋa Minnwi shi ndɔ̄gɔ vəɨ ŋkuʼɔ nɔ po? Ŋga! A shi nshwiʼi vəɨ moŋ lɨʼɨ ŋgwa khu.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a yaʼo nnu ŋa pəɨ chhu nɛ, yaʼo pi mmu, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lāa nnu ŋa pəɨ chhu nɛ lāa pi mmu. Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lāa a nɛ lāa pi ŋoŋ ŋa a taoŋ a nɛ.” 
Khwachəɨ wuŋ ŋgwa ni yi paa pighɔ pɨ̄nɨ moŋ pwanjuʼɔ, nchhu ŋa, “Taathɔ, pa miŋwɛiŋ yaʼo nchò yigi ndɨɨ ŋa pigi fɛ gɨ́ ni pugu ni ligi yɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Mi nì njəɨ Shata gū llɔ po nɔ fiembɨ. 
Līi njəɨ, m̀fɛ njɨ ni pəɨ ŋa pəɨ nyīeŋ ŋkuoŋ pa mitwɛʼi pugu pa ŋíeŋ pugu pa ŋguoŋ ghrɨ́ mimbɨna ki kàʼa lɔ ŋkēe vəɨ. 
Mbapa nɛnnɛ, kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ pi ŋa pa miŋwɛiŋ yaʼo nchò yəɨ. Pəɨ ka fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ pi ŋa Minnwi nāʼaŋ ligi yəɨ po.” 
Moŋ ndɨɨ ghɔ, Jishɔ fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ moŋ Jijwɛ Minnwi nchhu ŋa, “Tǎa, a gɔ̀ mbɔ Taathɔ po pugu pa ŋkuoŋ shhɛ. Ǹtōo ghɔ nthɛ ŋa yaoŋ ŋa ɔ lə̄ɨŋ ni ghaŋ shiethɔ pugu pa ghaŋ lɨna nɛ, ɔ nōoŋ ni pa puoŋ fhu. Ooŋ, ma Tǎa, yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ɔ ni ŋkhwā ŋa a lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ. 
“Tǎa a kwo chaʼa ŋguoŋ yaoŋ mfɛ mbhɔ mu, yichəɨ ŋoŋ lɔ nji ŋoŋ ŋa Muuŋ yie ghɔ nɛ ŋkiɛŋ Tǎa, ki nji ŋoŋ ŋa Tǎa yie ghɔ nɛ ŋkiɛŋ Muuŋ pugu pa shesheŋoŋ ŋa Muuŋ chuʼɔ nɔ nōoŋ nu Tǎa ghɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ kara nchhu ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi njiŋnjiŋ ŋa, “Pəɨ fāʼo ntou prɔthɔ nɔ yəɨ nu pa nnu pɛ ŋa pəɨ yəɨ nu nɛ. 
Ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa ntou pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi pugu pa fùoŋ ni ŋkhwā nɔ yəɨ nu pa nnu ŋa pəɨ yəɨ nu nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ. Ki nɔ yaʼo nu pa nnu ŋa pəɨ yaʼo nu nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njaʼo.” 
Yichəɨ taʼa ŋgaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ lɔllɔ tɔthɨ lɨʼɨ mōoŋ Jishɔ, mbie vi ŋa, “Masha, a yiʼi ŋa ǹchwīe nɛiŋ nɔ fāʼo nu chɔmbhi ki mmɛ?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi chhu pi ŋa? Njiŋ yi pɔ pi ŋa vɛ?” 
Ŋoŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Khwā Taathɔ mbɔ Minnwi yɔ ni ŋguoŋ njùʼɔ yɔ ghao, pugu pa nchə̌ɨ yɔ, pugu pa ŋguoŋ njɨ yɔ, pugu pa ŋguoŋ pīʼi nu yɔ, ndɔ mbɨnɨ nuʼuŋ ŋkhwā taakuo yɔ ndɔ haʼaŋ ɔ khwā noŋ yɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ khwɛ̄ a kāʼo. Chwīe nɛnnɛ mfāʼo chɔmbhi.” 
Ŋgaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ ghɔ tāʼa nu nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa a ŋoŋ ndɨndɨ, nɛnnɛ mbie Jishɔ ŋa, “Taakuo a pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ Juu ni ndhɔ Jerushalɛiŋ nshwiʼi nu Jeriko, ŋgwīʼi mbɨŋ pa ŋgɨna minwi. Pugu wie vi, ŋkwe ndhwí yi pugu pa mbɨŋ yi, ŋgə̄ɨ ni vugu mieŋ vi a piʼi shɨgɛi ŋkhu. 
“A ni ŋga mbɔ nɛnnɛ, ŋgaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi, mbɔ ŋoŋ Juu, ni shwiʼi nu shɛndaoŋ ghɔ ŋga njəɨ vi, mbəɨ ntɔgɔ po ndaoŋ nduoŋ. 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, ŋoŋ Levi ni nshwiʼi nu shɛndaoŋ ghɔ ŋkaa yu, ŋga njəɨ vi, mbəɨ ntɔgɔ po ndaoŋ nduoŋ. 
“Ndɔ ŋoŋ Shamaria ŋa a ni ŋgə̄ɨ kra taoŋ ŋgwīʼi mbɨŋ yu, ŋga njəɨ vi, mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ yu, 
nshwiʼi ŋgə̄ɨ mbara ŋoŋ vei, nshāʼo wru pugu pa làʼo ŋkuoŋ fɨ́ yi ndɔ ŋkrao. Ntiɛŋ vi nūʼɔŋ ŋkuoŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ yi, ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju moŋ nda pa ghɨ̀nɨ, nchhɔ ndɨna nu ni ju fɔ. 
Mbhi ni ŋga ndaŋ ŋoŋ Shamaria vei fuʼu mbɨŋ mfɛ ni taathɔ moŋ nda yei, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Lɨna nu ni ju ti ǹshi mbɨnɨ. Mbɨŋ ŋa a shi mbīgi nɛ, ǹshi mbe vɛ.’ ” 
Jishɔ pie ŋa, “A yəɨ shɨna trɛi ŋgwa pei ŋa a taakuo ŋoŋ vei ŋa pa ŋgɨna minwi ni ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vi ŋgwie vi ndəɨŋ vi nɛ?” 
Ŋgaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Minnwi khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ŋa a ki nōoŋ kwoshɨnɨ nɛ.” Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Ghə̄ɨ ŋguʼɔ nchwīe pi nɛnnɛ.” 
Jishɔ pugu pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni ŋga nyīeŋ nu, a ghə̄ɨ nii moŋ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ. Miŋgwɛ chəɨ, ligi yi pɔ Mata, chhu ghɔ ŋa a thɔ a pwa nda yu. 
A ni mfāʼo ndǐŋ vi, ligi yi pɔ Meri. Meri chhɔ shhɛ laʼo kwò Taathɔ nthɔ njaʼo ntɨ́gɨ yi. 
Njùʼɔ Mata ni ŋgana vi nthɛ ntou pa maoŋ jɨ ŋa a ni mfāʼo nɔ pīri nu nɛ. A pie Jishɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, a lɔ ŋgana ghɔ ŋa ndǐŋ a mieŋ a ŋa mbīri ŋguoŋ pa maoŋ təʼɨ a? Chhu nɛ ghɔ a thɔ ŋgɛ̄rɛ a.” 
Ndɔ Taathɔ ka khwɛ̄ ghɔ pi ŋa, “Mata, Mata, njùʼɔ yɔ ghana nu, ɔ wie noŋ yɔ nthɛ ntou pa nnu, 
a wuʼɔ taʼa yaoŋ mbɔ mmɛ nnu. Meri kwo tɛrɛ ŋkiɛŋ yi ghɔ, mbɔ yɛ ŋa mbaʼa pi ma ŋkwe mbhɔ yu nɛ.” 
﻿Luka.
11.
Llɛ́ chəɨ ni mbɔ, Jishɔ thɔ nduoŋ Minnwi lɨʼɨ chəɨ, ŋga mīʼɛŋ, yichəɨ taʼa ŋgaŋ younjiŋ yi thɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, yɛʼi vigi ni luoŋ nu Minnwi ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Jouŋ ni njɛʼi ghaŋ younjiŋ pi nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ luoŋ Minnwi nɛ, pəɨ chhu ŋa, ‘Minnwi Tǎa vigi, ghaʼo nu pɔ ni ligi yɔ, shaʼafuoŋ yɔ thɔ. 
Fɛ maoŋ ni pigi ŋa pigi shi njru ŋkuoŋ ghɔ sheshe llɛ́ nɛ, 
ndɔ ndīʼɛ phɨ yigi, nthɛ ŋa pigi ghà ndīʼɛ phɨ ŋguoŋ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu fāaŋ mbɨŋ pigi nɛ. Kiʼi nchwīe pigi nii moŋ tɨtɨnɨ mōoŋ nu!’ ” 
Nnɛ a pɨnɨ nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Lɔ̄gɔ ŋa taʼa ŋoŋ vəɨ ghə̄ɨ nda taannu vi moŋ ntuŋ mbhi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taannu a, fōo a ni trɛi ndigi brɛi, 
nthɛ ŋa taannu a ŋa a chhɔ ŋgə̄ɨ kra, chəɨŋ nda mu, paʼa ǹdɔ mfāʼo maoŋ jɨ nɔ fɛ nu ghɔ!’ 
Lɔ̄gɔ ŋa taannu yɔ ghɔ khwɛ̄ nda ŋa, ‘Kiʼi ŋgana a! Ŋ̀kwo chri nda ti pigi pa puoŋ paŋ kwo nanuaŋ. Minthɛ paʼa ǹdɔ nuʼuŋ ndɔllɔ mfɛ yaoŋ vɛ.’ 
Ǹchhu vɛ ŋa, njiʼi nthɛ nɔ haʼaŋ mbaʼa a yiʼi ndɔllɔ mfɛ vɛ nthɛ ŋa a taannu yɔ nɛ, ndɔ ti a shi ndɔllɔ mfɛ vɛ nthɛ ŋa ɔ lɔ njiʼi ndrithɔ nɔ pie nu ki jwɛ. 
“Ndɔ ti ǹshwei vəɨ, p̂əɨ pie, kaŋ Minnwi shi mfɛ ni pəɨ, p̂əɨ tāʼa, kaŋ Minnwi shi nchwīe pəɨ yəɨ, p̂əɨ kwēi kaŋ Minnwi shi nchuʼɔ chonda ni pəɨ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a pie nɛ ghà mfāʼo, ŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nɛ yəɨ, ni ŋoŋ ŋa a kwēi nɛ pi shi nchuʼɔ chonda ghɔ. 
“A gɔ̌ shɨna pəɨ ŋa m̈uuŋ vi mbie shhu ghɔ, a fɛ pi mitwɛʼi ghɔ? 
Ki mbie vi ni mbāoŋ, a fɛ pi ŋíeŋ ghɔ? 
Ti p̈əɨ kiʼɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà nchwīe phɨ nɛ nji fɛ nu pi pa maoŋ shiʼi ni puoŋ pəɨ, ti Tǎa vəɨ ŋa a chhɔ po nɛ shi mfɛ Jijwɛ Minnwi pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pie vi nɛ?” 
Yichəɨ ndɨɨ, Jishɔ ni nthɔ mfuʼu miŋwɛiŋ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ ŋa a ni nchwīe ŋoŋ ghɔ pɔ pi fhɨncho. Miŋwɛiŋ ghɔ ni ŋga ntaoŋ, fhɨncho ghɔ chrā, ŋgwa pighɔ ghrāo. 
Ndɔ pichəɨ ŋgwa pighɔ chhu ŋa, “A fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ ni ghrɨ́ Bɛjɛbu, mbɔ nthishɨ pa miŋwɛiŋ.” 
Pichəɨ tāʼa nu mōoŋ vi, nnɛ nchhu ghɔ ŋa â chwīe taʼa lì nɔ nōoŋ nu ŋa njɨ yi llɔ pi mbhɔ Minnwi. 
Jishɔ ni nji nnu ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi nu nɛ, nnɛ nchhu kiʼɛ ni pugu ŋa, “Mbaʼa sheshe laʼa ŋa ŋgwa chhɔ māʼaŋ noŋ pugu ni nchhɔ̀ nɛ mieŋ ki gū, ndɔ ti sheshe nda ŋa a pɔ pi ni minduoŋnduoŋ nɛ shi ŋgū nshāaŋ. 
Nnɛ ti S̈hata nthi pi moŋ minduoŋnduoŋ ni noŋ yi, shaʼafuoŋ yi lara pi nɛiŋ? Nthɛ ŋa ɔ chhu ŋa m̀fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ pi ni ghrɨ́ Bɛjɛbu. 
Ti ä mbɔ ŋa m̀fuʼu miŋwɛiŋ pi ni ghrɨ́ Bɛjɛbu, kaŋ pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pəɨ ghà mfuʼu pi ni ghrɨ́ gɔ̌? Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pugu shi mbɔ ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu shi nshaʼa vəɨ nɛ. 
Ndɔ ä mbɔ ŋa m̀fuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ pi ni mbhɔ Minnwi, kaŋ yie nōoŋ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi kwo nyīeŋ ti mbara vəɨ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgaŋ ghrɨ́ tuo maoŋ nchhɔ̀ pi nthɔ ŋkɛ̄ʼi laʼa yi nɛ, kaŋ maoŋ pi pighɔ pɔ shiʼi. 
Ndɔ ti ndɨɨ ŋa ŋoŋ ŋa a pɨnɨ mfāʼo ghrɨ́ nchaa vi, nii vi ŋgaʼa vi nɛ, kaŋ a shi ŋkwe maoŋ nchhɔ̀ pi ŋa a yɨʼə noŋ yi ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nɛ, ndɔ̄gɔ maoŋ pi pighɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ ŋgra. 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ mbɔ ŋgei mu nɛ mbɨ̌na a, ŋoŋ ŋa pigi yu lɔ ŋkɨrɨ nu kaʼa nɛ thɔ nshaaŋshaaŋ. 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa jijwɛ miŋwɛiŋ taoŋ mbɨŋ ŋoŋ nɛ, a nyīeŋ moŋ pa lɨʼɨ yó nthɔ ntāʼa lɨʼɨ fɛrɛ noŋ yi. Ŋga mieŋ ki yəɨ sheshe lɨʼɨ, nchhu ŋa, ‘Ǹshi mbɨnɨ nda mu, lɨʼɨ ŋa mi ni ndhɔ nɛ.’ 
A ghà mbɨnɨ, njəɨ moŋ nda pi kwo yɨ̄gɨ ndɔ nchwīe a kāʼo. 
A pɨnɨ kiʼɛ ndɔ̄gɔ khwachəɨ pichəɨ jijwɛ ŋa pugu pɨ̄nɨ mbɨgɨ nchaa vi nɛ, pugu pugu thɔ nii ndaʼa nu fɔ, chɔmbhi ŋoŋ ghɔ pɨnɨ mbɨgɨ nchaa nɔ haʼaŋ a ni fǔoŋ mbɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nchhu nnu yei, yichəɨ miŋgwɛ shɨna yú ŋgwa pighɔ kə̄rə ŋggì yi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Mbɔrɔ yi puŋ yɛ ŋa a phi ghɔ nɛ, pugu pa yi pɨnɨ yɛ ŋa a nuʼɔŋ ghɔ nɛ.” 
Ndɔ a khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Mbɔrɔ ka pɔ pi yi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu yaʼo chrà Minnwi ndɔ nchwīe nɛ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ yú ŋgwa ni mbīgi nu nɛ, a jɛ̄ nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ pɨphɨ, a taʼa lì llɔ mbhɔ Minnwi ndɔ mbaʼa pi nōoŋ kaŋ taʼa lì ni pugu ŋkiɛŋ nnu ghraoghrao Jona. 
Wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ Jona ni mbɔ lì ni ŋgwa Nineve nɛ, a wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɔ lì ni ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei nɛ. 
“Moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa, Ŋgwafuoŋ Sheba shi ma ntithi pugu pa ŋgwrɛiŋoŋ yei ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vugu nɔ pa ŋgushaʼa nthɛ ŋa a ki nyīeŋ ŋkiɛŋ ntaaŋ ndaoŋ llɔ laʼataoŋ yu nthɔ njwɛrɛ ntɨ́gɨ shiethɔ mbhɔ Fùoŋ Sholomu, ndɔ līi njəɨ, yaoŋ ŋa a chaa Sholomu nɛ pɔ hɛiŋ. 
Moŋ llɛmbhi sháʼa, ŋgwa Nineve shi ma ntithi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ nɔ pa ŋgushaʼa, nthɛ ŋa pugu ni mbāʼa ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ ndɨɨ ŋa Jona ni nshwei chrà Minnwi ni pugu nɛ, ndɔ ti līi njəɨ, yaoŋ ŋa a chaa Jona nɛ pɔ hɛiŋ. 
“Ŋoŋ shiʼa nchuʼu truka ndɔ ndə̄ɨŋ, ki niʼiŋ laʼo mikru, ŋoŋ ghà nchuʼu ntigi pi ŋkuoŋ ntigi, nnɛ ŋa ŋgwa gha nii nu pugu yəɨ líʼɛ. 
Ligi yɔ pɔ pi laŋ noŋ yɔ. Ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ yəɨ fàʼa Minnwi mbiŋ shiʼi nɛ ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ lɨnaoŋ ni líʼɛ. Ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ yaʼo ŋgīʼɛ piŋ nu nɛ, noŋ yɔ lɨnaoŋ ni njiŋnjiŋ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, lɨna nu ŋa kiʼi yaoŋ ŋa ɔ pīʼi ŋa a líʼɛ mbɨŋ ghɔ nɛ pɔ pi njiŋnjiŋ. 
Ti ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ ndɨnaoŋ pi ni líʼɛ ki yichəɨ ghrà lɔ mbɔ njiŋ, kaŋ ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ shi ndiʼɛ, wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ truka ghà ndiʼɛ shiʼi ɔ yəɨ ŋguoŋ noŋ yɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga mīʼɛŋ chrā nu, ŋoŋ Farashi gɛ̄ vi ŋa pugu yu jɨ maoŋ, nnɛ a nii nda nchɔchhɔ nɔ jɨ nu maoŋ pighɔ. 
Ŋoŋ Farashi ghɔ ni ŋgrào ndɨɨ ŋa a ni njəɨ Jishɔ jɨ nu ki lɔ njiʼi nshɨ̄gao mbhɔ yi nɔ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ yugu ni nchhu nɛ. 
Taathɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pəɨ Farashi ghà nshɨ̄gao ŋkǔnu ndua pugu pa mikru, ndɔ ndɨnaoŋ ni pɨ̀ga pugu pa mbha nnu pɨphɨ. 
Pa na pei! Minnwi ŋa a chwīe ŋkuoŋ yi nɛ, lɔ ŋguʼɔ nchwīe ju nchwīe mooŋ yi? 
Ndɔ lɔ̄gɔ maoŋ pɛ ŋa a pɔ moŋ ndua pugu pa mikru nɛ ŋgɛ̄rɛ ghaŋ pou nɔ ghɔ, kaŋ ŋguoŋ yaoŋ shi mbɔ yi taoŋtaoŋ nɔ haʼaŋ nùʼɔŋ yəɨ chhu nɛ. 
“Ndɔ ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ, ma ŋgwa Farashi, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ fɛ shwéi pa mishwrɛi pugu pa laoŋ, ni pa trǔ kru, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ntuʼɔshə nɔ pɔ nu ŋgwa ndɨndɨ ni ŋgwamishua ndɔ mbɨnɨ ŋkhwā Minnwi. Pəɨ chwīe nnu pei ndɔ ki lɔ mieŋ pichəɨ. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ, ma ŋgwa Farashi, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ khwā nɔ chhɔ nu ŋkuoŋ lə̌ɨ pa ŋgwa ndiɛŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi pugu pa ŋa pi chrā ni pəɨ ni ndighaʼo moŋ pa lɨʼɨ kaʼa. 
Ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ pɔ nɔ fúŋ ŋa pi lɔ nūʼɔŋ lì yi, ŋgwa nyīeŋ nu ŋkuoŋ ghɔ ki lɔ nji.” 
Yichəɨ taʼa ŋgaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Masha, ɔ ghà ŋga nchhu nɛiŋ ŋgwɛʼi vigi wɛʼi.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ, ma ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà mfrɛ̄i ŋgwa ni lrì ŋa a ghaʼa nɔ tiɛŋ nu, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfɛ muuŋshɨmbhɔ yəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ ndrɨ nɔ ghɔ. 
Ŋgəʼɨ shi ŋgwɛ̄iŋ vəɨ, nthɛ ŋa pəɨ ghà ŋkrao pa ŋkiɛŋ fúŋ ni pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, nɔ kwiŋ nu vugu, ŋguʼɔ mbɔ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi pɛ ŋa tǎa pəɨ ni njwi nɛ. 
Pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ nōoŋ nu ŋa pəɨ piŋ nnu ŋa pa tǎa pəɨ ni nchwīe nu nɛ, pugu ni njwi pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, pəɨ krao fúŋ yugu. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, shiethɔ Minnwi chhu ŋa, ‘Ǹshi ntaoŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi pugu pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ, pi jwi pichəɨ ndɔ mfɛ ŋgəʼɨ ni pichəɨ.’ 
“Nɛnnɛ chhǐ ŋguoŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ŋa pi jwi jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ŋa Minnwi ni mbaʼo mbhi nɛ shi nthi thɔ ŋgwa mbhi shiʼa. 
Llɔ ŋkuoŋ jwi nu Abe ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ ŋkuoŋ jwi nu Shakaria, ŋa pi ni njwi vi shɨna lɨʼɨ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu lɨʼɨ Taoŋtaoŋ Nda Minnwi nɛ. A yie, ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa chhǐ yugu shi nthi thɔ pəɨ. Shishini, pəɨ mbhi shiʼa fāʼo njɔ́ nɔ thɔ yugu ghao. 
“Ŋgəʼɨ shi nii vəɨ, ma pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi, pəɨ lə̄ɨŋ chuʼɔ nda yɛ ŋa shiethɔ pɔ moŋ ghɔ nɛ, pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ nɔ nii nu moŋ ghɔ, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mieŋ ŋgwa ŋa pugu tāʼa nu nii fɔ nɛ ŋa pugu nii.” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga ndɔllɔ fɔ, pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi thɔ ndāa chrà yi ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi, nthɔ mfra vi ni ntou pie ŋa a chrā ntou nnu. 
Nnɛ nthɔ ŋkuʼɔ puŋ yi ŋa a chrā nnu ŋa a lɔ njiʼi ŋkāʼo nɛ, pugu wɛ̄iŋ vi. 
﻿Luka.
12.
Ndɨɨ nɔ haʼaŋ pa ŋkaŋŋkaŋ ŋgwa ni ŋkɨrɨ nu taʼa lɨʼɨ nɛ ti pichəɨ kuʼɔ nu mbɨŋ pichəɨ nɛ, Jishɔ fǔoŋ njɛ̄ chrā nu pi ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ lɨna yishi pa ŋgwa Farashi mbɔ nnu mifɨɨ. 
Yichəɨ yaoŋ lɔ njiʼi mbɔ fɔ ŋa pi pūoŋ ŋa mbaʼa Minnwi mieŋ ki nōoŋ páa. Paʼa yichəɨ nnu lə̄ɨŋ lɔ mbɔ fɔ ŋa mbaʼa pi yiʼi mieŋ ki ji. 
Nɛnnɛ, sheshe nnu ŋa ɔ chhu moŋ njíŋ nɛ, pi lɛ njaʼo lɨʼɨ líʼɛ, sheshe nnu ŋa ɔ chūuŋ moŋ njiɛŋ nda nɛ, pi lɛ nchīi mbhi. 
“Ǹchhu ni pəɨ, ma pa taannu paŋ, kiʼi pəɨ pɔgɔ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa mimfɛ pugu wuʼɔ njwi pi frɛinoŋ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ nuʼuŋ mfāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ chwīe nu nnu ŋa a pɨgɨ nchaa yie nɛ. 
Ndɔ ǹshi nshwei vəɨ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a pie ŋa pəɨ pɔgɔ vi nɛ, pəɨ pɔgɔ pi ŋoŋ ŋa a pɨnɨ mfāʼo ghrɨ́ nɔ māʼaŋ nu moŋ móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ liɛŋ shhɛ ndɨɨ ŋa a kwo jwi nɛ. Pəɨ piŋ nnu ŋa ǹchhu ni pəɨ nɛ, a ju mbɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a pie ŋa pəɨ pɔgɔ nɛ. 
“Pi shiʼa fīni tiɛŋ puoŋ milunu pi wuʼɔ ni paa puoŋ mi mbɨŋ? Ndɔ ti Minnwi shiʼa ndīʼɛ kaŋ taʼa yi shɨna pugu. 
Kiʼi mfāʼo pɔgɔ gu, ɔ ghaʼo mbhɔ Minnwi nchaa ntou milunu. Minnwi shia ŋguoŋ ŋgiithɔ yɔ ghao. 
“Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a chhu shhɨ ŋgwamishua ŋa a nyaŋ nɛ, Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nchhu ŋkaa yu ŋa a ji shhɨ pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi. 
Ndɔ shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lāa a shhɨ ŋgwamishua nɛ, Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi ndāa vi shhɨ ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shi nchhu nnu pɨphɨ nɔ ligi Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua nɛ, Minnwi shi ndīʼɛ phɨ yi, ndɔ ti shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shi ŋgwɛʼi Jijwɛ Minnwi nɛ, mbaʼa Minnwi līʼɛ phɨ yi. 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa pi lɔ̄gɔ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ nda luoŋ Minnwi ki shhɨ ghaŋ sháʼa, ki shhɨ pa mɛmmɛ ŋgwa nɛ, kiʼi ŋgwie noŋ yɔ ni nnu ŋa ɔ shi nchhu nɛ ki ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ɔ shi ntaa noŋ yɔ nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Jijwɛ Minnwi shi ntɨgɨ ghɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ ni nnu ŋa a kāʼo ŋa ɔ chhu nɛ.” 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ moŋ kɨrɨ ŋgwa pighɔ chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Masha, chhu ni ndǐŋ a ŋa a ghrā maoŋ pɛ ŋa tǎa mieŋ ni pigi nɛ, mfɛ nyaŋ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Taannu a, a nūʼɔŋ gɔ̌ nūʼɔŋ a nɔ ŋgaŋ shaʼa sháʼa ki ŋgaŋ ghrā maoŋ shɨna pəɨ ndǐŋ ghɔ?” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ywɛrɛ thɔ yəɨ, nthɔ ndɨna nu ŋa kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo sheshe ŋkwaŋ pɨ̀ga nthɛ ŋa chɔmbhi ŋoŋ lɔ njiʼi mbɔ pi moŋ ntou maoŋ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ.” 
Jishɔ shwei yei luʼɔ chrà ni pugu: “Ŋgaŋ fàʼo chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ, maoŋ pwa moŋ nyìeŋ yu ŋgaʼa. 
A pīʼi nu moŋ njùʼɔ yu ŋa, ‘Mi shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ yo? Nthɛ ŋa ǹdɔ mfāʼo lɨʼɨ ŋa minthɛ ǹūʼɔŋ ŋguoŋ maoŋ paŋ pei fɔ.’ 
Nɛnnɛ a chhu ŋa, ‘Yei nnu ŋa ǹshi nchwīe nɛ, ǹshi mbɨnɨ nshāʼa lɨʼɨ nūʼɔŋ maoŋ paŋ, ŋkrao pi nduoŋ mbɔ pi ghaʼoghaʼo, nūʼɔŋ maoŋ jɨ paŋ pugu pa pichəɨ maoŋ paŋ moŋ ghɔ. 
Nchhu ni noŋ a ŋa, “Mbrɔthɔ ŋoŋ! Ɔ fāʼo ŋguoŋ maoŋ shiʼi ŋa a pie ŋa ɔ fāʼo nɔ ntou ŋgaʼo nɛ, fɛrɛ noŋ yɔ, njɨ, nnu, mfāʼo pwanjuʼɔ.” ’ ” 
“Ndɔ Minnwi chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Yaoŋ na yei! Ni tuʼu yei ǹshi ŋkwe chɔmbhi yɔ. A shi ŋga mbɔ nɛnnɛ, maoŋ pinɛ ŋa ɔ kɨrɨ nɛ pɔ yi gɔ̌?’ ” 
Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “Yei ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a shi mbɔ ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu kɨrɨ fāʼo ni noŋ pugu ki lɔ mfāʼo ligi Minnwi nɛ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa kiʼi pəɨ wie noŋ yəɨ nthɛ chɔmbhi yəɨ, ŋa pəɨ shi njɨ pi khɔ ki nthɛ ŋgrào noŋ yəɨ, ŋa pəɨ shi māʼaŋ pi khɔ. 
Nthɛ ŋa chɔmbhi chaa maoŋ jɨ, noŋ yɔ chaa ndhwí. 
Pīʼi mbɨŋ pa mishi, pugu shiʼa mbhi, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ŋkwōo, paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo shaoŋ ki lɨʼɨ nūʼɔŋ maoŋ, ndɔ Minnwi kugwi vugu ghao. Ndɔ ɔ ghaʼo mbhɔ Minnwi nchaa pa mishi. 
Minthɛ shesheŋoŋ vəɨ pɨnɨ mbīgi chɔmbhi yi wuʼɔ shɨgɛi nthɛ ŋa a wie noŋ yi? 
Ŋa mimfɛ paʼa ɔ lɔ njiʼi nchwīe muuŋ mi nnu nɔ yinɛ nɛ, ɔ nuʼuŋ ŋgwie noŋ yɔ ni pichəɨ pa nnu nthɛ khɔ? 
“Pīʼi mbɨŋ pa frawa ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pugu ghà ŋkuʼɔ nɛ, pugu shiʼa mfāʼa ndɔ paʼa ndɔ ntuŋ ndhwí, ndɔ ǹshwei ghɔ ŋa njiʼi nthɛ pi Sholomu moŋ ŋguoŋ ndighaʼo yi ghao shini ndɔ mbwa ti mbɔ nɔ taʼa frawa. 
Ti M̈innwi māʼaŋ fɨʼɨ ndìpwa yei mbɨŋ pa trǔ ŋa a yi maoŋ shiʼa, yua gha mbɔ nu a kwo yaoŋ ti pi tūoŋ nɛ, pəɨ pīʼi ŋa a shi ndɨna ni pəɨ pi fɨʼɨ yi nɛiŋ? Ŋgwa piŋ kikɛʼi pei! 
Nɛnnɛ kiʼi pəɨ wuʼɔ nthɔ ŋgwie noŋ yəɨ pi lɨʼɨ taʼa yaoŋ ŋa pəɨ shi njɨ ki nnu nɛ, ki mfāʼo ghaghana moŋ njùʼɔ pəɨ. 
Pa ghaŋ ki piŋ Minnwi ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei thɔ ntei pi njiŋ maoŋ pei, ndɔ ni pəɨ, Minnwi Tǎa vəɨ ji ŋa a pie ŋa pəɨ fāʼo maoŋ pei. 
Pəɨ ka shigi pi Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi moŋ chɔmbhi yəɨ, nɛnnɛ kaŋ Minnwi shi mfɛ ŋguoŋ maoŋ pei ghao ni pəɨ. 
“Njiʼi nthɛ nɔ haʼaŋ pəɨ, ghaŋ younjiŋ paŋ pɔ pi shɨgɛi nɔ muuŋ kwíe minjɨɨ nɛ, kiʼi pəɨ fāʼo pɔgɔ gu ŋa mbaʼa pəɨ yiʼi mfāʼo yaoŋ ŋa a pie ŋa pəɨ yru ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa Tǎa vəɨ Minnwi lɔ̄gɔ nthi Mi moŋ khwǎ njùʼɔ yi ŋa pəɨ pugu shi nshaʼa fùoŋ kaʼa. 
“Pəɨ fīni maoŋ pəɨ, mfɛ mbɨŋ ghɔ ni ghaŋ pou, mbaʼo nɔ fāʼo nu pìɛŋ mbɨŋ ŋa mbaʼa a yiʼi mbɨrɨ nɛ, pugu pa fàʼo po ŋa mbaʼa a ma mmɛ, lɨʼɨ ŋa mbaʼa ŋgɨna chəɨŋ fɔ, ndɔ mbaʼa shə́ʼɨ kru. 
Nthɛ ŋa lɨʼɨ ŋa fàʼo yɔ pɔ nɛ, a lɨʼɨ ŋa njùʼɔ yɔ shi mbɔ ŋkaa yu nɛ. 
“Pəɨ pīri noŋ yəɨ ni sheshe nnu ŋa a shi nthɔ nɛ, ŋkrao ŋkandaŋ yəɨ a tɨnɨ, nchuʼu laŋ yəɨ a kɨɨ nu, 
nɔ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ywɛrɛ taathɔ vugu a kwəɨ lɨʼɨ jɨ láŋ, nɛnnɛ ŋa a shi ŋga ŋkwəɨ ŋkwēi nda, pugu kiʼi nchuʼɔ chuʼɔ taʼa ŋgɛ. 
Pwatua pɔ ni pɛ puoŋ fàʼa ŋa taathɔ vugu kwəɨ njəɨ vugu pugu wuʼɔ mbiʼi tɔthɨ nɛ. Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, a shi mbīri noŋ yi nshwei vugu ŋa pugu chhɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi, a thɔ ŋgrā maoŋ ni pugu. 
Pwatua shi mbɔ ni puoŋ fàʼa pɛ ŋa taathɔ vugu gha njəɨ vugu pugu kwo pīri noŋ yugu nɔ sheshe ndɨɨ ŋa a shi nthɔ nɛ. Ki a thɔ pi moŋ ntuŋ mbhi, ki ni ndaʼambilaŋ. 
“Ndɔ mimfɛ ɔ fāʼo tɨnɨnjuʼɔ ŋa ŋ̈gaŋ nda kaŋ nji ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgɨna shi nthɔ nɛ, a shi kaŋ ndɔ mieŋ nda yi a pəʼɨ. 
Pəɨ ŋkaa pəɨ pīri noŋ yəɨ, nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua thɔ nu moŋ ndɨɨ ŋa mbaʼa pəɨ yiʼi mbīʼi nɛ.” 
Pita pie ŋa, “Taathɔ, ɔ chrā yei luʼɔ chrà pi ni pigi ki ni ŋguoŋ ŋgwa?” 
Taathɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “A gɔ̌ kiʼɛ mbɔ muuŋ fàʼa tithi ndɔ mfāʼo shiethɔ, ŋa taathɔ shi nūʼɔŋ vi a lɨna nu ni nda yi ndɔ ŋgrā maoŋ jɨ ni pichəɨ ghaŋ fàʼa ndɨɨ ŋa ndɨɨ kāʼo nɛ? 
Mbɔrɔ shi mbɔ ni muuŋ fàʼa yɛ ŋa masha vi yəɨ vi a thɔ fāʼa nu shiʼi ndɨɨ ŋa a thɔ nɛ. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, a shi nūʼɔŋ vi a thɔ ndɨna ju ni ŋguoŋ maoŋ pi. 
Ndɔ ti m̈uuŋ fàʼa ghɔ mbīʼi moŋ njùʼɔ yu ŋa mbaʼa taathɔ vi yīʼɛ mbɨnɨ, nchhɔ ŋgwie pichəɨ ghaŋ fàʼa, mbɔ pi pimbia pugu pa pi piŋgɛ, nthɔ njɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu mbaa nu, 
kaŋ taathɔ vi shi nɛ ŋkwəɨ pi llɛ́ yɛ ŋa a shi lɔ mbīʼi nɛ pugu pa ndɨɨ ŋa a shi lɔ nji nɛ, ndɔ nchrɛi vi kaoŋkaoŋ. A yəɨ ŋkwaŋ ŋgəʼɨ ghaŋ fàʼa mbe. 
“Ŋgaŋ fàʼa ŋa a ji nnu ŋa taathɔ vi tāʼa nu ŋa a chwīe nɛ, ki lɔ njiʼi mbīri noŋ yi, ki nchwīe nnu ghɔ ŋa taathɔ vi tāʼa nu nɛ, shi mfāʼo ŋkiɛŋ tɨtɨnɨ wie. 
Ndɔ ti ŋoŋ ŋa a shini ndɔ nji, ndɔ nchwīe nnu ŋa a pie wie nɛ, shi ŋkwe shɨgɛi wie. Ŋoŋ ŋa pi fɛ ntou yi ghɔ nɛ, pi shi mbie ntou yi mbhɔ yu. Ndɔ ŋoŋ ŋa pi fɛ ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi ghɔ nɛ, pi shi mbie vi pi ni ŋkiɛŋ ntou yi. 
“Ŋki thɔ pi nɔ māʼaŋ nu móŋoŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi, ǹjūa ŋa a kaŋ ni ŋkwo kɨɨ nu. 
Ndɔ, m̀fāʼo kwe ŋkhǐ nɔ tɔgɔ nu moŋ ghɔ, mbɔ ŋgəʼɨ pugu pa gu. M̀fāʼo yuʼɔ njùʼɔ ti a shi nthɔ ntɔgɔ. 
Pəɨ pīʼi ŋa ǹthɔ pi nɔ fɛ nu taʼaŋggi ŋkuoŋ mbhi hɛiŋ? Ŋga, ǹthɔ pi ni minduoŋnduoŋ. 
Nthɛ ŋa jɛ̄ ndwɛ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ, moŋ nda ŋa tiɛŋ ŋgwa pɔ fɔ nɛ, pugu shi nchhɔ kikie, trɛi ŋgwa pɔ ni taʼa kwò, pi paa pɔ ni taʼa kwò. 
Pugu shi nthi pi nduoŋnduoŋ, tǎa pugu muuŋ vi yi mimbia pɔ kikie, maa pugu muuŋ vi yi miŋgwɛ pɔ kikie, maŋgaoŋ pugu ŋgwɛ muuŋ vi chhɔ kikie, ŋgwɛ muuŋ chhɔ kikie pugu maŋgaoŋ vi.” 
Jishɔ pɨnɨ nchhu ni yú ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa, “Ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ yəɨ mbɨ̀ kuʼɔ nu ŋgei nii minaoŋ nɛ, pəɨ kiʼi nchuchu taʼa ŋgɛ́ ŋa, ‘Mbɨ̀ shi ndhɔ.’ Ndɔ a wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nɛnnɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ yəɨ fɨfrəɨ laoŋ llɔ mbiɛŋ nɛ, pəɨ kiʼi nchuchu ŋa, ‘Minaoŋ shi ntūoŋ.’ Ndɔ a wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nɛnnɛ. 
Pa ŋgwa mifɨɨ pei, mimfɛ pəɨ līi ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ po pugu shhɛ pɔ nɛ nchhu ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ yie llɛmbhi shi mbɔ nɛ, ti a chwīe khɔ paʼa pəɨ lɔ nji njiŋ pa nnu ŋa a thɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ndwɛ nɛ? 
“A chwīe khɔ paʼa ɔ lɔ mbīʼi ni noŋ yɔ nnu ŋa a kāʼo nɛ ndɔ nchwīe? 
Nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ ghə̄ɨ nu pəɨ ŋoŋ haʼaŋ a puru ghɔ shhɨ ŋgaŋ sháʼa nɛ, kāa nɔ lūgwi nu pəɨ yu shɛndaoŋ. Ɔ̈ mieŋ ki chwīe nɛnnɛ, kaŋ a shi ndɔ̄gɔ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nɔ shhɨ ŋgaŋ sháʼa mfɛ ghɔ ni pa brushi, pugu niʼiŋ ghɔ chə́ɨŋ. 
Ǹshwei ghɔ, mbaʼa ɔ ma ntaoŋ ki lɔ naa mbe ŋguoŋ njɔ́ yɔ ghao.” 
﻿Luka.
13.
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa ni mbɔ fɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ ŋa pugu ni nshwei Jishɔ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ Pailɛ ni njwi pichəɨ ŋgwa Galili ndɨɨ ŋa pugu thɔ fɛ yaoŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ ni Minnwi nɛ. 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ pīʼi ŋa ŋgwa Galili pei chwīe phɨ nchaa ŋguoŋ ŋgwa Galili nduoŋ nthɛ ŋa pi jwi vugu nnɛ nɛ? 
Ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa ŋga! Ndɔ ti p̈əɨ mieŋ ki pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ kaŋ pəɨ shi ŋkhu ghao ŋkaa pəɨ. 
Ki pəɨ pīʼi ŋa fuoŋnchrɔ ŋgwa laʼataoŋ Shiloaŋ, ŋa nda tɔthɨ ni ŋgū njwi vugu nɛ, ni mbɔ pi pa ŋgwo nnu mbɨmbhɨ nchaa ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni nchhɔ Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ? 
Ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa ŋga! Ndɔ ti p̈əɨ mieŋ ki pāʼa ŋkǔnu yəɨ ni phɨ, kaŋ pəɨ ghao shi ŋkhu ŋkaa pəɨ.” 
Jishɔ chhu yei luʼɔ chrà ni pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi: “Yichəɨ ŋoŋ ni mbhi wùnu moŋ nyìeŋ yu, nthɔ lɨʼɨ ka ntíɛŋ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ paʼa a lɔ mbɔ. 
Nnɛ, a chhu ni ŋgaŋ fàʼa yi ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, nɔ trɛi ŋgaʼo ǹthɔ nthɔ nu hɛiŋ nɔ thɔ nu ntāʼa ntíɛŋ thɨ ndɔ paʼa ndɔ njəɨ sheshe yi. Kəʼɨ māʼaŋ shhɛ, kiʼi a nuʼuŋ nthɔ njɨ shhɛ gha.’ 
“Muuŋ fàʼa yi ghɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, pɨnɨ mieŋ fɔ nɔ taʼa ŋgaʼo, ntou laʼo yi niʼiŋ khí fɔ. 
Ti ä njuŋ ntíɛŋ ŋgaʼo yini, a pwa, ti ä nchhɔ ki yuŋ, ɔ kəʼɨ vi māʼaŋ shhɛ.’ ” 
Yichəɨ taʼa Llɛ́ Ji pa Juu ni mbɔ, Jishɔ thɔ njɛʼi nu moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu, yichəɨ miŋgwɛ chəɨŋ fɔ, mfāʼo jijwɛ pɨphɨ ŋa a ni nchwīe a ghɨ̄nɔ nu nɔ fuoŋnchrɔ ŋgaʼo. A ni ntuʼutuʼu, ti mimfɛ paʼa a lɔ ntithi tɔthɨ ndɨndɨ. 
Jishɔ gha njəɨ vi, mɛ̄iŋ vi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Miŋgwɛ, ɔ lūgu moŋ ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ.” 
Nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ mi mbɨŋ yu, a pɨʼɨ ntithi ndɨndɨ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, ŋgaʼo Minnwi. 
Mmɛŋoŋ moŋ nda luoŋ Minnwi pɨgɨtua ŋa Jishɔ yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ Llɛ́ Ji. Nchhu ni pa ŋgwa ŋa, “Pi fāʼo nɔ fāʼa nu nɔ ntɨgao llɛmbhi, nthɛ yie ghɔ, p̂əɨ thɔ pi moŋ shɨna llɛ́ pighɔ pi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yəɨ, kiʼi a pɔ pi Llɛ́ Ji.” 
Taathɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, “Ghaŋ mifɨɨ pei, shesheŋoŋ shɨna pəɨ shiʼa mfēi fua yi pugu ŋkwɛ́iŋ yi moŋ nda ŋa pugu ghà ndaʼa nɛ, ŋgə̄ɨ ni ju choŋkhi mfɛ ŋkhǐ ghɔ Llɛ́ Ji? 
Ti ndwɛ, m̀baʼa ŋkwe miŋgwɛ vei Llɛ́ Ji, muuŋ Abrahaŋ, ŋa Shata ŋkrao vi nɔ fuoŋnchrɔ ŋgaʼo nɛ?” 
A ni ŋga nchhu nnu yei, lrithɔ wɛ̄iŋ pa mbɨ̌na pi, ndɔ ŋguoŋ pichəɨ pa ŋgwa nduoŋ fāʼo pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ ŋguoŋ pa mɛmmɛ nnu ŋa a chwīe nɛ. 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ pie ŋa, “Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pɔ pi nɔ khɔ? Mimfɛ m̀āʼaŋ fɨʼɨ yi pi ni khɔ? 
A pɔ pi nɔ mbhɛ̌ yaoŋ mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ yi gɛ, ŋa ŋoŋ lɔ̄gɔ ŋgə̄ɨ māʼaŋ moŋ nyìeŋ yu, a kuʼɔ ŋgū thɨ, pa mishi thɔ ŋkrao nda pugu ŋkuoŋ pa mbhɔ pi.” 
A pɨnɨ nuʼuŋ mbie ŋa, “Mimfɛ m̀āʼaŋ fɨʼɨ nɔ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pi ni khɔ? 
A pɔ pi nɔ yaoŋ chwīe prupɨna kuʼɔ haʼaŋ miŋgwɛ lɔ̄gɔ niʼiŋ moŋ taʼa brumaʼa prupɨna, a chwīe ŋguoŋ prupɨna ghɔ kuʼɔ ghao.” 
Jishɔ ni nyīeŋ ntɔgɔ moŋ pa mɛmmɛ laʼataoŋ pugu pa puoŋ mi puoŋ pi, nthɔ njɛʼi nu nɔ haʼaŋ a ni ntɔgɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ. 
Yichəɨ ŋoŋ pie vi ŋa, “Taathɔ, a wuʼɔ shɨgɛi ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu shi ndūgu?” Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, 
“Ǹshwei vəɨ, pəɨ paʼo nɔ nii nu pi moŋ muuŋ chonda, nthɛ ŋa ntou ŋgwa shi mbaʼo nɔ nii nu ndɔ a ghaʼa vugu. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ŋgaŋ nda shi nuʼuŋ ndɔllɔ mfɨ̄nɨ chonda nɛ, pəɨ tithi mbhi nthɔ ŋkwēi chonda, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, chuʼɔ chonda ni pigi.’ A shi ŋkhwɛ̄ nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Ǹdɔ njiʼi nji vəɨ ki lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ pəɨ llɔ nɛ.’ 
Nɛnnɛ, pəɨ shi nchhu ŋa, ‘Pia ni njɨ ndɔ nnu kaʼa, ndɔ ɔ ni njɛʼi shɛndaoŋ laʼataoŋ pigi.’ 
Ndɔ a shi nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Ǹdɔ njiʼi nji vəɨ ki lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ pəɨ llɔ nɛ. Pəɨ lɔllɔ, ŋguoŋ vəɨ pa ŋgūo nnu mbɨmbhɨ.’ 
“Pəɨ shi ŋkə̄ɨ ndɔ ŋkru shua məɨ fɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ yəɨ Abrahaŋ, ni Aiji, ni Jakɔ, ni ŋguoŋ pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi, pugu pɔ moŋ ntuʼɔ fùoŋ Minnwi ndɔ, pi māʼaŋ vəɨ mbhi. 
Ŋgwa shi ma ndhɔ ŋgei laʼataoŋ shaʼa minaoŋ, ni yi ŋgei nii minaoŋ pi ma ndhɔ khwi pugu pa mbiɛŋ, nchhɔ yəɨ taprɛi moŋ ntuʼɔ fùoŋ Minnwi. 
Līi njəɨ, pichəɨ pa ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɔ ndugwi njiŋ nɛ ma mbɔ shhɨ, pichəɨ ŋa pugu pɔ shhɨ lūgwi njiŋ.” 
Wuʼɔ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pichəɨ pa ŋgwa Farashi thɔ mbara Jishɔ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Kwiɛŋ ŋkiʼɛ ŋgəɨghəɨ, nthɛ ŋa Hɛrɔ tāʼa nu njwi ghɔ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ni pugu ŋa, “Ghə̄ɨ nshwei mimbaaŋguo ghɔ fɛ a nɔ ghɔ ŋa ǹthɔ nɛ mfuʼu pa miŋwɛiŋ ndɔ njɨ̄gɨ pa ghɨ̌nɔ shiʼa pugu pa yua, ndɔ a gha mbɔ moŋ trɛi llɛ́ m̀īʼɛŋ fàʼa a. 
Ndɔ a kāʼo vəɨ ŋa shiʼa, ni yua, pugu pa yua vini, m̀bɔ shɛndaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu, nthɛ ŋa mimfɛ paʼa pi lɔ njwi njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ki a lɔ mbɔ pi Jerushalɛiŋ. 
“Jerushalɛiŋ, Jerushalɛiŋ, laʼataoŋ ŋa pugu jwi pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ndɔ ntuŋ pa ŋgwa ŋa pi taoŋ vugu vɛ nɛ ni ŋgùʼɔ, a ŋgɛ́ yi khɔ ŋa ǹtāʼa nu ŋkɨrɨ puoŋ pɔ taʼa lɨʼɨ ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ miŋguo ghà ŋkɨrɨ puoŋ pi laʼo prǎ yi nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ɔ lɔ ntāʼa nu. 
Līi njəɨ, nda yəɨ kɨna ŋkuʼɔ fùŋ. Ndɔ ǹchhu ni pəɨ ŋa mbaʼa pəɨ nuʼuŋ njəɨ a, kaŋ a nɛiŋ ndɨɨ thɔ ŋa pəɨ shi nchhu ŋa, ‘Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a thɔ nɔ ligi Taathɔ nɛ.’ ” 
﻿Luka.
14.
Yichəɨ Llɛ́ Ji ni mbɔ, Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ nda yichəɨ nthishɨ pa ŋgwa Farashi lɨʼɨ jɨ maoŋ, pa ŋgwa thɔ mbɛʼi vi. 
Ŋga njəɨ nu, yichəɨ ŋoŋ ŋa a ni mfāʼo ghɨ̌nɔ mikuʼɔ kwò pugu pa mbhɔ chəɨŋ. 
Jishɔ pie ni pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ pugu pa ŋgwa Farashi ŋa, “Gɨ́ piŋ ŋa pi yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ ŋoŋ Llɛ́ Ji ki ŋga?” 
Paʼa pugu lɔ ŋkhwɛ̄, Jishɔ lɔ̄gɔ ŋgaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ ghɔ njɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yi mieŋ vi kiʼɛ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ. 
Nɛnnɛ a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “A yəɨ ŋoŋ shɨna pəɨ ŋa m̈uuŋ vi ki fua yi ŋgū moŋ tiɛŋ ŋkhǐ shishhi, paʼa a lɔ ŋkiʼi nshūu vi shūu mfuʼu Llɛ́ Ji?” 
Pugu pou khwɛ̀. 
Jishɔ jɛ̄ nthɔ nchrā luʼɔ chrà ni pa ghaŋ gɛ̀ pi ndɨɨ ŋa a yəɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ pugu chhɔ ntɛrɛ pa lɨʼɨ liɛŋ yəɨ taprɛi nɛ, nchhu nu ni pugu ŋa, 
“Ndɨɨ ŋa pi gɛ̄ ghɔ lɨʼɨ jɨ láŋ nɛ, kiʼi ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ liɛŋ, nthɛ ŋa kəʼɨchəɨ pi gɛ̄ ŋoŋ ŋa a chɨ̄ɨ nchaa ghɔ. 
Nnɛ ŋa ŋoŋ ŋa a gɛ̄ vəɨ nɛ shi nthɔ nchhu vɛ ŋa, ‘Fɛ lɨʼɨ yɔ ni ŋoŋ vei!’, kaŋ ɔ shi ŋgə̄ɨ kiʼɛ moŋ shhunoŋ ndɔ̄gɔ ndugwi njiŋ lɨʼɨ. 
“Ndɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pi gɛ̄ ghɔ lɨʼɨ nɛ, ghə̄ɨ nchhɔ nɔ ndugwi njiŋ lɨʼɨ, nɛnnɛ ŋa ndɨɨ ŋa ŋoŋ vɛ ŋa a gɛ̄ ghɔ thɔ nɛ, kəʼɨchəɨ a chhu vɛ ŋa, ‘Taannu a, kuʼɔ nɔ lɨʼɨ liɛŋ’. Nɛnnɛ ɔ shi nchɨɨ ligi ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa ŋa pəɨ pugu pɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi nɛ. 
Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a kə̄rə noŋ yi nɛ, pi shi nshwiʼi vi shhɛ. Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shwiʼi noŋ yi shhɛ nɛ, pi shi ŋkə̄rə vi tɔthɨ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni ŋoŋ ghɔ ŋkaa yu ŋa a ni ŋgɛ̄ vi nɛ ŋa, “Ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ pīri ŋkiɛŋ maoŋ jɨ nɛ, kiʼi mɛ̄iŋ pi taannu pɔ, ki lǐŋ pɔ, ki ndaaŋoŋ yɔ, ki taakuo pɔ, mbɔ ghaŋ fàʼo, nthɛ ŋa pugu shi ma ŋgɛ̄ ghɔ ŋkaa pugu nnɛ a pɔ ŋa ɔ kwo fāʼo pe yɔ ni nnu ŋa ɔ ni nchwīe nɛ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ pīri jɨ nɛ, gɛ̄ pi pa mbou, pa ŋkwíni, pa nchriligi, 
nnɛ, kaŋ ɔ shi mfāʼo mbɔrɔ nthɛ ŋa mimfɛ paʼa pugu lɔ ma nduʼu vɛ. Minnwi shi nduʼu shiʼi yɔ ndɨɨ ŋa pa ŋgwa shiʼi lɛ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ.” 
Ndɨɨ ŋa yichəɨ taʼa ŋgaŋ gɛ̀ ŋa a ni nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi ni njaʼo yei nnu nɛ, nchhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “A fɨʼɨ pwatua nɛiŋ ni ŋoŋ ŋa a shi mbɔ ŋgia jɨ moŋ ntuʼɔ fùoŋ Minnwi?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Yichəɨ ŋoŋ ni ma mbīri mmɛ jɨ ŋgɛ̄ ntou ŋgwa. 
Ndɨɨ jɨ ghɔ ni ŋga ŋkāʼo, a taoŋ muuŋ fàʼa vi ŋa a chhu ni ghaŋ gɛ̀ pi ŋa, ‘Pəɨ thɔ, ŋguoŋ yaoŋ kwo kāʼo!’ 
Ŋguoŋ yugu ghao jɛ̄ nthɔ njūa shwieshwie. Fǔoŋ yi chhu ni muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ǹjuoŋ shhɛ, a pie ŋa ŋ̀guʼɔ ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ, m̀baʼo mbhɔ ŋa a mieŋ a ǹduʼu.’ 
Yichəɨ chhu ji ŋa, ‘Ŋ̀kwo yuoŋ wuŋ fua fāʼa nyìeŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu lɨʼɨ ywɛʼi vugu, nthɛ yie ghɔ, ǹduoŋ ŋa a līʼɛ fàŋ a.’ 
Vichəɨ chhu ji ŋa, ‘Ŋ̀guʼɔ ŋka laŋlaŋ. Nthɛ yie ghɔ, minthɛ paʼa ǹdɔ nthɔ.’ 
“Muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ pɨ̄nɨ nshwei taathɔ vi ni pa nnu pei. Ŋgaŋ nda ghɔ chhu ni muuŋ fàʼa vi ghɔ moŋ pɨgɨtua ŋa, ‘Taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ moŋ pa laʼa, pugu pa fra, nchhu ni pa ghaŋ pou, pa ŋkwíni, pa nchriligi ŋa pugu thɔ.’ 
A gha ndara muuŋ fàʼa ghɔ chhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, ŋ̀kwo fāʼa ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ ɔ chhu nɛ, ndɔ shɨna wuʼɔ mbiʼi ni pichəɨ ŋgwa moŋ nda.’ 
Nɛnnɛ, taathɔ pɨnɨ nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ shɛndaoŋ ntou, pugu pa ndaoŋ mooŋ trǔ, nɨŋɨ ŋa ŋgwa thɔ nii nnɛ ŋa nda a lɨnaoŋ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ ŋa mi ni ŋgɛ̄ vugu nɛ ywɛʼi sheshe yaoŋ jɨ.’ ” 
Ndwɛ, yú ŋgwa ni nthɔ njōu njiŋ Jishɔ, a kara nchhu ni pugu ŋa, 
“Ŋ̈oŋ nthɔ njiŋ a ki lɔ mbɨ̄na tǎa vi, pugu pa mǔuŋ vi, ni ŋgwɛ vi, pugu pa puoŋ pi, ni lǐŋ pi pi pimbia, pugu pa pi piŋgɛ, ooŋ, pugu pa chɔmbhi yi, kaŋ minthɛ paʼa a lɔ mbɔ ŋgaŋ younjiŋ a. 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi ntiɛŋ wáʼa yi nthɔ njiŋ mu nɛ, nthɛ paʼa a lɔ njōu njiŋ a. 
“A yəɨ ŋoŋ shɨna pəɨ ŋa ä ntāʼa nu ŋkrao nda tɔthɨ, paʼa a lɔ mfǔoŋ nchɔchhɔ shhɛ ndīi fɨʼɨ nchuoŋ yi, nɔ yəɨ nu ŋa a fāʼo fɨʼɨ mbɨŋ ŋa mimfɛ a krao nɔ ghɔ mīʼɛŋ nɛ? 
Kiɛŋ nɛnnɛ, kaŋ a shi ŋga mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa a nūʼɔŋ kwonda tɔthɨ ghɔ ki lɔ mīʼɛŋ nda tɔthɨ ghɔ nɛ, shesheŋoŋ gha njəɨ, māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ, 
nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Ŋoŋ vei ni njɛ̄ ŋkrao nu nda ki lɔ njiʼi mīʼɛŋ.’ 
“Ki a yəɨ fùoŋ ŋa minthɛ a ghə̄ɨ nu māʼaŋ yichəɨ fùoŋ ni wuŋ ŋkaŋ ghaŋ māʼaŋ nchhɔ̀, yie fùoŋ lɔ fāʼo pi paa wuŋ ŋkaŋ ghaŋ nchhɔ̀, ki a lɔ fǔoŋ nchɔchhɔ shhɛ ndīi ŋa mimfɛ a māʼaŋ vi ni wuŋ ŋkaŋ ghaŋ nchhɔ̀ pighɔ. 
Ti a nchɔchhɔ njəɨ ŋa mimfɛ paʼa a lɔ māʼaŋ vi, a taoŋ ghaŋ ntaoŋ ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ mbie vie fùoŋ ŋa, ‘Pigi chwīe nɛiŋ nji ŋa mimfɛ pia fāʼo taʼaŋggi.’ 
Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, shesheŋoŋ vəɨ nthɛ paʼa a lɔ njōu njiŋ a ki lɔ mīʼaŋ ŋguoŋ nnu pi nthɛ a. 
“Khí pwa, ndɔ ghrɨ́ yi nɔ chwīe nu yaoŋ pwa mbhɛ, ɔ pɨnɨ ŋkwəɨ ni ghrɨ́ yi ghɔ pi nɛiŋ? 
Nthɛ ŋa mbaʼa a yiʼi nuʼuŋ mfāʼo ghɛ̀rɛ shhɛ, ki nɔ gwí ŋkuʼu maoŋ chwīe yaoŋ pwa. Pi ghà mīʼaŋ khí yɛ ŋa a lɔ nuʼuŋ mfāʼo ghɛ̀rɛ nɛ mīʼaŋ. Ywɛrɛ, ŋoŋ ŋa a fāʼo tə́nə nɛ, â yaʼo!” 
﻿Luka.
15.
Llɛ́ chəɨ, ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi pugu pa pichəɨ ghaŋ chwīe phɨ thɔ yəɨ Jishɔ nɔ yaʼo nu nnu ŋa a ni njɛʼi nu nɛ, 
pa ŋgwa Farashi pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi ŋgwa ni gɨ́ Mushi jɛ̄ luo nu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ vei piŋ pa ghaŋ chwīe phɨ ti nthɔ njɨ maoŋ jɨ pugu pugu.” 
Nɛnnɛ, Jishɔ ni nchhu yei luʼɔ chrà ni pugu: 
“A yəɨ ŋoŋ shɨna pəɨ ŋa ä mfāʼo taʼa ŋkɨɨ minjɨɨ, taʼa yi shɨna pugu phɛ, paʼa a lɔ mieŋ ndipuʼu wuŋ ni ndigi ndipuʼu moŋ ŋkǔnu, ŋgə̄ɨ njiŋ yɛ ŋa a phɛ nɛ, ntāʼa vi ti njəɨ? 
Ndɨɨ ŋa a yəɨ vi nɛ, a tiɛŋ vi ŋkambəʼɨ yu, mbɨnɨ nɔ moŋ pwatua. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa a pɨ̄nɨ laʼa nɛ, a gɛ̄ pa taannu pi, pugu pa taakuo pi, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘Pia fāʼo pwatua nthɛ ŋa ǹjəɨ minjɨɨ a yɛ ŋa a ni mbhɛ nɛ.’ ” 
Nɛnnɛ Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, ǹchhu nu vɛ ŋa ntou pwatua shi mbɔ po nthɛ taʼa ŋgaŋ phɨ ŋa a pāʼa ŋkǔnu yi ni phɨ nɛ, nchaa ndipuʼu wuŋ ni ndigi ndipuʼu ŋgwa shiʼi ŋa pugu pīʼi ŋa pugu lɔ mfāʼo nɔ paʼa nu ŋkǔnu yugu ni phɨ nɛ. 
“Ki a yəɨ miŋgwɛ ŋa a mfāʼo wuŋ ndigi mbɨŋ, taʼa yi phɛ, a mieŋ ki lɔ nchuʼu laŋ, njɨ̄gɨ ŋguoŋ nda ghao, ntāʼa pɔpɔrɔ ti nuʼuŋ njəɨ. 
Ŋga njəɨ, mɛ̄iŋ taannu pi, pugu pa taakuo pi, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘P̂ia fāʼo pwatua, nthɛ ŋa ǹjəɨ ndigi mbɨŋ a yɛ ŋa a ni mbhɛ nɛ.’ ” 
Nɛnnɛ, Jishɔ lūgwi ŋa, “Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ, ǹchhu nu vɛ ŋa, pwatua shi mbɔ shɨna pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi nthɛ taʼa ŋgaŋ phɨ ŋa a pāʼa ŋkǔnu yi ni phɨ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ, nchhu nu ŋa: “Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ mfāʼo paa puoŋ pimbia. 
Vi mikəʼɨ chhu ni tǎa vugu ŋa, ‘Ghrā maoŋ mfɛ nyaŋ, mbɔ maoŋ pɛ ŋa a kaŋ mbɔ nyaŋ ndɨɨ ŋa ɔ khu nɛ.’ Tǎa ghɔ ghrā maoŋ pi ni pugu. 
“A ni ŋga ndaʼa shɨgɛi llɛ́, vi mikəʼɨ kɨrɨ ŋguoŋ maoŋ pi ghao, ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ndaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ fie moŋ yichəɨ laʼataoŋ, nshāaŋ fɔ ghao moŋ jɨ ki tou. 
A ni ŋga njɨ ŋguoŋ mbɨŋ yi ghao, nji gū moŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ, a jɛ̄ pɔ nu moŋ pou. 
A ghə̄ɨ mfɛ noŋ yi ni ŋoŋ laʼataoŋ ghɔ nɔ ŋgaŋ fàʼa, ŋgaŋ vi taoŋ vi moŋ nyìeŋ yu ŋa a ghə̄ɨ nthɔ ŋkugwi ŋkunyaŋ. 
A khwā nɔ kugwi nu noŋ yi ni maoŋ ŋa pa ŋkunyaŋ ni njɨ nu nɛ, ndɔ paʼa ŋoŋ lɔ mfɛ sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a jɨ. 
“Ndugwi yi, lɨna yi gha ŋkwəɨ, a chhu ni noŋ yi ŋa, ‘A fāʼo ghaŋ fàʼa tǎa a pi khɔ mfāʼo maoŋ jɨ ti a ka yiɛŋyiɛŋ ntɔrɔ, ǹthɔ ŋkhu njì hɛiŋ? 
Ǹshi ndɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ njəɨ tǎa a, njūa ghɔ ŋa, “Tǎa, m̀fāaŋ mbɨŋ Minnwi, mbɨnɨ mfāaŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ. 
Ǹdɔ nuʼuŋ ŋkāʼo nɔ pɔ nu muuŋ ghɔ, lɔ̄gɔ a pi nɔ taʼa ŋgaŋ fàʼa yɔ.” ’ 
“Nnɛ a lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ yəɨ tǎa vi, ŋga ŋguʼɔ mbɔ fie hiŋ, tǎa vi yəɨ vi, mfāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ yu, ntaoŋ ntei ŋgə̄ɨ mbaŋ vi, nchrā ghɔ shiʼi. 
Muuŋ ghɔ chhu ni tǎa vi ŋa, ‘Tǎa, m̀fāaŋ mbɨŋ Minnwi, mbɨnɨ mfāaŋ mbɨŋ ghɔ. A lɔ nuʼuŋ ŋkāʼo ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ a ŋa muuŋ ghɔ.’ 
“Ndɔ tǎa ghɔ chhu ni pa ghaŋ fàʼa pi ŋa, ‘Pəɨ kɔnɔ nthɔ ni ŋkiɛŋ ndhwí māʼaŋ mbɨŋ yu, ŋgwɛ krɛ́i nɔ mbhɔ yi, mbɨnɨ ŋgwɛ tra nɔ kwò yi. 
Nthɔ ni muuŋ nàʼaŋ fuʼu njwi pia fāʼo jɨ, 
nthɛ ŋa muuŋ a vei ni ŋkwo khu, mbɨnɨ njwiŋ! A ni mbhɛ, m̀bɨnɨ njəɨ vi!’ Pugu jɛ̄ jɨ nu kiʼɛ. 
“Ndɨɨ ghɔ muuŋ shhɨ vi ni mbɔ moŋ nyìeŋ. Ŋga ŋkwəɨ nu ti mbara laʼa, njaʼo lōu pugu pa pini. 
Mɛ̄iŋ yichəɨ taʼa muuŋ fàʼa mbie vi ŋa, ‘A lɔ̄gɔ khɔ, ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ?’ 
A chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ndǐŋ ghɔ pɨnɨ, tǎa vəɨ jwi muuŋ nàʼaŋ tutru, nthɛ ŋa a kwəɨ laʼa shishiʼi.’ 
“A pɨgɨtua ndāa ŋa mbaʼa a yiʼi nii nda. Tǎa vi taoŋ ndɨ̄gəɨ vi. 
A luʼu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, m̀fāʼa mbhɔ ghɔ nɔ ntou ŋgaʼo paʼa ndɔ ma nchɨ̄ʼə nchò yɔ, ndɔ paʼa ɔ lɔ ma mfɛ muuŋ mimbhi vəɨ ŋa ŋ̀gwrā pigi pa taannu paŋ mfāʼo jɨ nɔ ghɔ. 
Ndɔ ti yaoŋ muuŋ ghɔ vei, ŋa a shāaŋ maoŋ pɔ ghao ŋkuoŋ pa shakhɨ, gha ŋkwəɨ, ɔ jwi muuŋ nàʼaŋ tutru ghɔ.’ 
“A khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Muuŋ a, pɔgɔ ghà ŋguʼɔ mbɔ kaʼa, sheshe yaoŋ ŋa a nyaŋ nɛ, a jɔ. 
Ndɔ a kāʼo nɔ jɨ nu, ndɔ mfāʼo pwatua, nthɛ ŋa ndǐŋ ghɔ vei ni ŋkhu mbɨnɨ njwiŋ, a ni mbhɛ m̀bɨnɨ njəɨ vi.’ ” 
﻿Luka.
16.
Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nchhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa: “Ŋgaŋ fàʼo chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ mfāʼo nthishɨ pa puoŋ fàʼa pi, ŋgwa thɔ ntūgu ghɔ ŋa muuŋ fàʼa yi ghɔ thɔ nshāaŋ mbɨŋ yi shāaŋ. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, a mɛ̄iŋ vi nchhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Yei khɔ ŋa ǹthɔ njaʼo nu nthɛ ghɔ? Fɨ̄ʼɨ vəɨ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ ɔ thɔ ntuo maoŋ paŋ nɛ, nthɛ ŋa mbaʼa ɔ nuʼuŋ mbiʼi nthishɨ pa puoŋ fàʼa paŋ.’ 
“Nthishɨ pa puoŋ fàʼa ghɔ chhu ni noŋ yi ŋa, ‘Mi shi nchwīe pi nɛiŋ ndwɛ ŋa masha a tāʼa nu mfuʼu a fuʼu moŋ fàʼa a nɛ. Ǹdɔ njiʼi mfāʼo ghrɨ́ fāʼa nu nyìeŋ pi pe a, ndɔ thɔ a lilri nɔ luoŋ nu. 
Ǹji nnu ŋa ǹshi nchwīe nɛ ndwɛ, nji ŋa ŋgwa shi mbiŋ a nda pugu ndɨɨ ŋa pi fuʼu a moŋ fàʼa nɛ.’ 
“Nnɛ a gɛ̄ ŋguoŋ ghaŋ ŋkrù masha vi pa taʼa yi taʼa yi, ŋa pugu thɔ njəɨ vi. A pie ni fǔoŋ yi ŋa, ‘Ŋkrù masha a pɔ puŋ ghɔ yi khɔ?’ 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Taʼa ŋkɨɨ jo wru.’ A chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Chɔchɔ ŋkwe ŋwaʼaŋlɨ ŋkrù yɔ ŋkɛrɛ nāʼaŋ ŋa a tiɛŋ wuŋ jo puŋ ghɔ.’ 
“A pɨnɨ nchhu ni yichəɨ ŋa, ‘Jɔ ŋkrù yi khɔ?’ A chhu ŋa, ‘Taʼa ŋkɨɨ pìɛŋ pilei.’ A chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Kɛrɛ nāʼaŋ fúoŋ wuŋ pìɛŋ.’ 
“Nthɛ yie ghɔ, masha nthishɨ pa puoŋ fàʼa yei piŋ vi nthɛ nnu shiethɔ yei ŋa a ni nchwīe nɛ. Nthɛ ŋa ghaŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei fāʼo shiethɔ ni ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pugu ghà nchwīe nnu pugu nchaa ŋgwa ŋa pugu pɔ moŋ líʼɛ nɛ. 
Ndɔ ǹshwei ghɔ, lɔ̄gɔ maoŋ ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei mbwa puŋ nɔ ghɔ, nji ŋa maoŋ pighɔ shi ŋga mieŋ ki lɔ nūʼɔŋ mbɔ, Minnwi fɛ laʼa vɛ po. 
“Ŋoŋ ŋa a tɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou moŋ puoŋ mi nnu nɛ shi ntɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou moŋ mɛmmɛ nnu. Wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ ŋoŋ ŋa a chwīe nnu fifiri moŋ puoŋ mi nnu nɛ, shi nchwīe fifiri moŋ mɛmmɛ nnu. 
Ti p̈əɨ mieŋ ki tɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou ni ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ pəɨ tuo fàʼo ŋkuoŋ mbhi yei nɛ, Minnwi kie pi nɛiŋ mfɛ ŋkiɛŋ fàʼo llɔ po ni pəɨ, ŋa pəɨ lɨna nɔ ghɔ? 
Ti p̈əɨ mieŋ ki tɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou ni yaoŋ ŋa a yi ŋoŋ nduoŋ nɛ, Minnwi kie pi nɛiŋ mfɛ fàʼo ŋa a shi mbɔ yəɨ nɛ ni pəɨ? 
“Mbaʼa taʼa muuŋ fàʼa fāʼa mbhɔ paa masha. A shi ŋguʼɔ mbɨ̄na taʼa yi ŋkhwā vichəɨ, a shi njaʼo taʼa yi, nchɨ̄ʼə nchò vichəɨ. Mbaʼa pəɨ fāʼa mbhɔ Minnwi pugu mbɨŋ.” 
Pa Farashi ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei, māʼaŋ Jishɔ ni kwə̀ɨŋ nthɛ ŋa pugu ni ŋkhwā mbɨŋ. 
Ndɔ a chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ pa ŋgwa haʼaŋ pəɨ ghà nchwīe ŋa ŋgwamishua līi vəɨ nɔ pa ŋgwa tithi, ndɔ Minnwi ji njùʼɔ yəɨ. Nthɛ ŋa yaoŋ ŋa ŋgwamishua līi a pɔ mmɛ yi nɛ, pɔ pi yaoŋ pɨphɨ ligi Minnwi. 
“Gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni nāʼaŋ nɛ ni nthɔ fāʼa nu ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ moŋ ndɨɨ Jouŋ. Jɛ̄ ndɨɨ ghɔ, pi chīi pwa pishaʼakhɔ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi, ŋgwa ŋa pugu piŋ nɛ chhɔ mfra nu nii moŋ ghɔ ni pri. 
A yīʼɛ ni po pugu shhɛ nɔ pɨrɨ nu nchaa ŋa taʼa muuŋ mi nnu ŋa a pɔ moŋ ŋwaʼaŋlɨ gɨ́ mieŋ ki lɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. 
“Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a shāaŋ láŋ pugu ŋgwɛ vi ndáŋ miŋgwɛ nduoŋ nɛ kwo shúoŋ, ŋoŋ ŋa a laŋ miŋgwɛ ŋa a taoŋ láŋ nɛ kwo shúoŋ ŋkaa yu. 
“Ŋgaŋ fàʼo chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ nthɔ māʼaŋ pa ndhwí tɨnɨnchuoŋ, nchhɔ njɨ ŋkiɛŋkiɛŋ maoŋ jɨ ŋguoŋ llɛ́ ghao. 
Ŋgaŋ pou chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ, ligi yi pɔ Lasharɔ, ŋa pi ni nūʼɔŋ vi choŋkaʼa ŋgaŋ fàʼo yei, noŋ yi ni ŋguʼɔ mbɔ pi fɨfɨ ghao. 
A ni ŋkhwā nu njɨ pa ŋkuʼu maoŋ pɛ ŋa a gū llɔ ŋkuoŋ taprɛi ŋgaŋ fàʼo ghɔ nɛ. Nɔ pigi nu, pa miŋgu ni nthɔ nchhɔ ndra fɨ́ yi. 
Ŋgaŋ pou ghɔ khu, ghaŋ ntaoŋ Minnwi thɔ ndɔ̄gɔ vi ŋgə̄ɨ nūʼɔŋ shoyəɨ Abrahaŋ. Ŋgaŋ fàʼo ghɔ khu ŋkaa yu, pi twei vi, 
a ghə̄ɨ lɨʼɨ haʼaŋ ghaŋ phɨ ghà ŋkhu ŋgə̄ɨ nɛ, nchhɔ njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ fɔ, ŋga mbɨʼɨ ligi yi, njəɨ Abrahaŋ fie hiŋ pugu Lasharɔ shoyəɨ yu. 
“Ŋgaŋ fàʼo ghɔ yūa ni Abrahaŋ ŋa, ‘Tǎa, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu, ntaoŋ Lasharɔ ŋa a chrū thɔ muuŋshɨmbhɔ yi moŋ ŋkhǐ nthɔ ŋgrɨ túa a nɔ ghɔ, nthɛ ŋa m̀bɔ moŋ tɨtɨnɨ yúʼɔ moŋ móŋoŋ yei.’ 
“Ndɔ Abrahaŋ chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Muuŋ a, kwiŋ ŋa moŋ chɔmbhi yɔ pi ni mfɛ pa maoŋ shiʼi vɛ, Lasharɔ fāʼo ji pi pɨphɨ. Ndɔ ti ndwɛ, a pɔ moŋ nchhɔ́ shiʼi hɛiŋ, ɔ pɔ hɛnɛ moŋ tɨtɨnɨ ŋgəʼɨ. 
Mbapa nɛnnɛ, pi nūʼɔŋ mmɛ wə́ɨŋ, a fɛ̄nɛ via, nɛnnɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu nshāʼa hɛnɛ nɛ nthɛ paʼa a lɔ nshāʼa, wuʼɔ nɔ haʼaŋ mbaʼa ŋoŋ llɔ ŋgei pəɨ nthɔ njəɨ vigi nɛ.’ 
“Ŋgaŋ fàʼo ghɔ chhu ŋa, ‘Mbaʼo mbhɔ nɛ shhɨ ghɔ, ma tǎa, ŋa ɔ taoŋ nɛ Lasharɔ puŋ nda pigi. 
Nthɛ ŋa m̀fāʼo lǐŋ paŋ pi pimbia pi tiɛŋ, nɛnnɛ ŋa a ghə̄ɨ shūu tə́nə yugu, kiɛŋ nɛnnɛ, kaŋ pugu ŋkaa pugu shi nii moŋ lɨʼɨ ŋgəʼɨ yei.’ 
“Abrahaŋ khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Pugu fāʼo gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nāʼaŋ nɛ, pugu yaʼo pie ghɔ.’ 
“A chhu ŋa, ‘Ŋga, ma tǎa vigi Abrahaŋ, ŋoŋ ŋa a khu nɛ mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nchrā ni pugu, pugu kwri.’ 
“Abrahaŋ chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘P̈ugu mieŋ ki yaʼo gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi nāʼaŋ nɛ, kaŋ mbaʼa pugu yiʼi mbiŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a njiʼi nthɔ ŋoŋ ŋa a khu mbɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ nɛ.’ ” 
﻿Luka.
17.
Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Pa nnu ŋa a nthɛ a chwīe ŋgwa gū moŋ phɨ nɛ shi ŋguʼɔ nthɔ. Ndɔ ti wuwuru ŋgəʼɨ yi ŋoŋ yɛ ŋa a kie pi mbhɔ yu maa nthɔ nɛ. 
A kaŋ ni mbwa ŋa pi chu mmɛ ŋgùʼɔ wuʼɔ yaoŋ mmi yu māʼaŋ vi moŋ ŋkhǐ, nchaa ŋa a chwīe sheshe taʼa puoŋ mi puoŋ paŋ pei gū moŋ phɨ. 
Pəɨ lɨna ni noŋ pəɨ! “N̈dǐŋ ghɔ nchwīe phɨ, ɔ fɛ̄ʼi vi, ndɔ ti a mbāʼa ŋkǔnu yi, ɔ līʼɛ phɨ yi. 
Ndɔ ti a nchwīe phɨ mbɨŋ ghɔ ni khwachəɨ ŋgɛ́ moŋ taʼa llɛ́, sheshe ŋgɛ́ a pɨnɨ nchhu vɛ ŋa a pāʼa ŋkǔnu yi nɔ ghɔ, a yiʼi ŋa ɔ līʼɛ phɨ yi.” 
Pa ghaŋ ntaoŋ Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Taathɔ, pigi luoŋ ŋa ɔ pigi piŋ yigi.” 
Taathɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “P̈əɨ mfāʼo piŋ ti a wuʼɔ mbɔ pi nɔ fɨʼɨ mbhɛ̌ frushɨga, kaŋ a nthɛ pəɨ chhu ni thɨ wuŋ ŋa, ‘Mūʼuŋ ŋgə̄ɨ mbhi noŋ yɔ moŋ ŋkhǐ!’, a yaʼo nchò yəɨ. 
“Lɔ̄gɔ ŋa taʼa ŋoŋ vəɨ fāʼo ŋkǔna ŋa a chhɔ mfāʼa nyìeŋ, ki ŋkɛ̄ʼi minjɨɨ, a nthɛ a gha ŋkwəɨ moŋ nyìeŋ a chhu ghɔ pi ŋa, ‘Thɔ nchhɔ hɛiŋ taʼa ŋgɛ́ njɨ maoŋ?’ 
Ŋga! A shi ŋka chhu ghɔ pi ŋa, ‘Nyiaŋ maoŋ jɨ vəɨ, mbīri noŋ yɔ, nthɔ mfɛ vəɨ ti ŋ̀ga njɨ ndɔ nnu, ɔ ghə̄ɨ kiʼɛ njɨ jɔ ndɔ nnu.’ 
Mbaʼa a yiʼi ntōo ŋkǔna ghɔ nthɛ ŋa a chwīe fàʼa ŋa a chhu ghɔ ŋa a chwīe nɛ. 
A haʼaŋ a pɔ ni pəɨ nɛ, ndɨɨ ŋa pəɨ kwo chwīe ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa Minnwi chhu ŋa pəɨ chwīe nɛ, pəɨ chhu ni noŋ pəɨ ŋa, ‘Pigi wuʼɔ mbɔ pi pa ŋkǔna, pigi wuʼɔ nchwīe pi yaoŋ ŋa a ni ŋkwo pɔ fàʼa yigi nɛ.’ ” 
Jishɔ ni ŋgə̄ɨ nu Jerushalɛiŋ, ntɔgɔ nu shɨna Shamaria pugu Galili. 
Ŋga nii moŋ yichəɨ muuŋ laʼataoŋ, wuŋ ghaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ paoŋ pugu pugu. Pa ghaŋ ghɨ̌nɔ pighɔ ni nthi pi fie hini, 
mɛ̄iŋ ni njɨ ŋa, “Jishɔ! Taathɔ! Fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ pigi!” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga njəɨ vugu, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ nōoŋ noŋ yəɨ ni ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ Minnwi, pugu līi vəɨ njəɨ ŋa ghɨ̌nɔ yəɨ mmɛ.” Pugu ni ŋga ŋgə̄ɨ nu, Jishɔ yɨ̄gɨ ghɨ̌nɔ yugu. 
Yichəɨ taʼa ŋgaŋ ghɨnɔmbaluŋ ghɔ ni ŋga njəɨ ŋa ghɨ̌nɔ yi mmɛ nɛ, mbɨnɨ nchhɔ ŋgaʼo Minnwi ŋkiɛŋ ni njɨ, 
nthɔ gū shhɨ Jishɔ ni puŋ yi nthɔ ntōo vi. Ŋoŋ vei ni mbɔ ŋoŋ Shamaria. 
Jishɔ pie ni ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni mbɔ fɔ nɛ ŋa, “Mi nì njɨ̄gɨ pi ghɨ̌nɔ wuŋ ŋgwa, pichəɨ ndipuʼu hɨŋ? 
A chwīe khɔ a wuʼɔ nthɔ ŋgɨ̀nɨ vei nɔ tōo nu Minnwi?” 
Nchhu ghɔ kiʼɛ ŋa, “Lɔllɔ ŋgə̄ɨ ni gɔ! Piŋ yɔ chwīe ɔ lūgu.” 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa Farashi ni ŋga mbie Jishɔ ni ndɨɨ ŋa Minnwi shi njɛ̄ shaʼa nu fùoŋ yi nɛ, Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi shiʼa njiʼi nthɔ pi ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ mimfɛ ɔ thɔ njəɨ yəɨ nɛ. 
Mbaʼa yichəɨ kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ yiʼi nchhu ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, a pɔ nɛiŋ hɛiŋ!’ ki ŋa, ‘A pɔ ni hini!’, nthɛ ŋa, līi njəɨ, Minnwi thɔ nshaʼa fùoŋ yi shɨna pəɨ!” 
Jishɔ chhu ni ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ŋa, “Ndɨɨ chhɔ nthɔ nu ŋa pəɨ shi ŋkhwā nɔ yəɨ nu taʼa llɛ́ moŋ llɛmbhi Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua, ndɔ mbaʼa pəɨ yəɨ. 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa shi nchhu ni pəɨ ŋa, ‘Līi njəɨ, a pɔ ni, līi njəɨ, a pɔ nɛiŋ!’ Ndɔ kiʼi mbiŋ nnu ŋa pugu chhu nu nɛ ki njōu njiŋ yugu. 
Ǹchhu nɛiŋ nthɛ ŋa ndɨɨ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɨnɨ nɛ, a shi mbɔ po nɔ fiembɨ ŋa a shēi llɔ moŋ taʼa ŋgei po ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ moŋ yichəɨ, shesheŋoŋ yəɨ nji. 
Ndɔ a shi ŋguʼɔ mfǔoŋ njəɨ ŋgəʼɨ, ŋgwa mbhi shiʼa lāa vi. 
“Ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni mbɔ mbhi ŋoŋ ŋa ligi yi ni mbɔ Noa nɛ, a nɔ haʼaŋ a shi mbɔ ndɨɨ ŋa thɔ nu Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua kaoŋ nɛ. 
Ŋgwa ni nchhɔ njɨ maoŋ, ndɔ nnu nu, ndaŋ nu, ndɔ ŋgə̄ɨ nu nda láŋ ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ llɛ́ yɛ ŋa Noa ni nii moŋ mmɛ pie ŋa a pɔ nɔ nda nɛ. Ŋkhǐ thɔ kiʼɛ njwi ŋguoŋ yugu ghao. 
“Wuʼɔ ŋkwaŋ nɔ haʼaŋ a ni mbɔ moŋ mbhi ŋoŋ ŋa ligi yi ni mbɔ Lɔti nɛ. Pugu ni nthɔ njɨ maoŋ ndɔ nnu nu, nchwīe taŋ, nthɔ mbhi maoŋ pugu, ŋkrao laʼa muŋu. 
Ndɔ ti a ni ŋga mbɔ llɛ́ yɛ ŋa Lɔti ni ntaoŋ ni vhi Shodoŋ nɛ, móŋoŋ pugu móŋoŋ ŋgùʼɔ mikaŋ llɔ vugu, njwi vugu ghao. 
A ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a lɛ mbɔ llɛ́ yɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi mbɨnɨ nōoŋ noŋ yi nɛ. 
“A mbɔ llɛ́ ghɔ, kiʼi ŋoŋ ŋa a pɔ mbhi, maoŋ pi pɔ nda nɛ, pɨnɨ nii nda lɨʼɨ lɔ̄gɔ maoŋ pighɔ. Wuʼɔ nɛnnɛ kiʼi ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ moŋ nyìeŋ nɛ pɨnɨ mbɨnɨ laʼa lɨʼɨ lɔ̄gɔ sheshe yaoŋ. 
Kwiŋ nnu ŋa a ni mfɨ̄ʼɨ ŋgwɛ Lɔti nɛ! 
Shesheŋoŋ ŋa a tāʼa nu ŋkwe chɔmbhi yi nɛ shi nshiɛŋ chɔmbhi yi ghɔ, ndɔ ti ŋoŋ yɛ ŋa a mīʼaŋ chɔmbhi yi nɛ shi ŋkwe chɔmbhi yi ghɔ. 
Ǹshwei vəɨ, a lɛ ŋga mbɔ ni tuʼu ghɔ, paa ŋgwa nūaŋ kúoŋ, pi lɔ̄gɔ taʼa yi, vichəɨ kɨna. 
Paa piŋgɛ lɛ nthɔ ŋgūʼɔ shíe kaʼa, pi lɔ̄gɔ taʼa yi, taʼa yi kɨna. 
“Paa pimbia shi mbɔ moŋ nyìeŋ, pi lɔ̄gɔ taʼa yi, taʼa yi kɨna.” 
Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi pie vi ŋa, “Ɔ shi mbɨnɨ pi hɨŋ, Taathɔ?” Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Lɨʼɨ ŋa khu miyaoŋ pɔ nɛ, pa mishi pɛ ŋa pugu gha ŋkru khu miyaoŋ nɛ shi ŋkɨrɨ fɔ.” 
﻿Luka.
18.
Jishɔ ni nshwei ghaŋ younjiŋ pi ni yei luʼɔ chrà nɔ tɨgɨ nu vugu ŋa pugu fāʼo nɔ luoŋ nu Minnwi ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ghao ki lɔ mfāʼo lɨʼənoŋ. 
A ni nchhu ŋa, “Laʼataoŋ chəɨ, ŋgaŋ shaʼa sháʼa chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mbɔgɔ Minnwi ndɔ paʼa ndɔ fāʼo ndɨɨ ŋoŋmishua. 
Miŋgwɛ ŋkugu chəɨ ni mbɔ laʼataoŋ ghɔ ŋa a ni ŋguʼɔ nthɔ ŋgana ŋgaŋ shaʼa sháʼa ghɔ ghana, nchhu nu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ghɛ̄rɛ a nshaʼa sháʼa yigi mbɨ̌na a yei moŋ ndɨndɨ.’ 
Ŋgaŋ shaʼa sháʼa vei ni ndāa nɔ kuo ndɨɨ. A ni ndugwi nchhu ni noŋ yi ŋa, ‘Njiʼi nthɛ pi ndɔ haʼaŋ ǹdɔ mbɔgɔ Minnwi ki mfāʼo ndɨɨ ŋoŋmishua nɛ, 
ndɔ ti nthɛ fɨʼɨ ghaghana ŋa miŋgwɛ ŋkugu vei fɛ nu vəɨ nɛ, ǹshi nshaʼa sháʼa yi moŋ ndɨndɨ, kiɛŋ nɛnnɛ, kaŋ a shi nshiɛŋ a moŋ thɔ nu ŋgana a ŋguoŋ ndɨɨ ghao.’ ” 
Taathɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nchhu ŋa, “Pəɨ yaʼo nnu haʼaŋ ŋgaŋ shaʼa sháʼa ni mbe chhu njaʼo. 
Mbaʼa Minnwi shaʼa sháʼa ŋgwa pi ŋa a tɛrɛ nɛ moŋ ndɨndɨ, ŋgwa haʼaŋ pugu yūa ghɔ moŋ tuʼu pugu pa naoŋchɨ nɛ? Pəɨ pīʼi ŋa a shi ŋguʼɔ nchhɔ njīri nu nɔ ntaaŋ ndɨɨ? 
Ǹshwei vəɨ ŋa Minnwi shi nshaʼa sháʼa yugu moŋ ndɨndɨ pi ni tei. Mbapa nɛnnɛ, ndɨɨ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua shi nthɔ nɛ, pəɨ pīʼi ŋa a shi ma njəɨ ŋgwa ŋkuoŋ mbhi pugu fāʼo piŋ?” 
Jishɔ chhu yei luʼɔ chrà ni pichəɨ ŋgwa ŋa pugu ni mbīʼi ŋa pugu pɔ shiʼi shhɨ Minnwi, ndɔ nchɨ̄ʼə pichəɨ ŋgwa nɛ. 
“Paa ŋgwa pichəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ ŋgə̄ɨ Nda Minnwi lɨʼɨ luoŋ Minnwi. Taʼa yi ni mbɔ ŋoŋ Farashi, vichəɨ pɔ ŋgaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi. 
Ŋoŋ Farashi ghɔ thi təʼɨ vi nduoŋ ŋa, ‘Ǹtōo ghɔ, ma Minnwi, ŋa ǹdɔ mbɔ ŋoŋ mbembe nɔ pichəɨ ŋgwa. Ǹshiʼa nchīgi ŋoŋ, paʼa ndɔ mbɔ ŋgaŋ mbe, ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mbɔ ŋkwoshuoŋ, ki mbɔ nɔ ŋgwɛ̄iŋ taashi yini hini nɛ. 
Ŋga njī ŋkhǐ paa ŋgɛ́ moŋ taʼa taŋ, mfɛ shwéi ŋguoŋ yaoŋ ŋa ŋga mfāʼo nɛ ghao.’ 
“Ŋgaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi thi fie hini, paʼa ndɔ mbɨʼɨ ligi yi ndīi po, mbɔ ni tuʼuthɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Minnwi, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu, nchwīe phɨ.’ ” 
Jishɔ chhu ŋa, “Ǹshwei ghɔ, ŋoŋ vei ni mbɔ shiʼi shhɨ Minnwi nchaa ŋoŋ Farashi. Nthɛ ŋa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a kə̄rə noŋ yi nɛ, pi shi nshwiʼi vi shhɛ, ŋoŋ ŋa a shwiʼi noŋ yi shhɛ nɛ, pi kə̄rə vi.” 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa ni nthɔ ni pa puoŋ prɔ njəɨ Jishɔ nɔ ghɔ ŋa a nūʼɔŋ mbhɔ yi thɔ pugu nɔ fɛ nu mbɔrɔ ni pugu. Pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi gha njəɨ, mbɨ̄ga ŋgwa pighɔ. 
Jishɔ mɛ̄iŋ puoŋ pighɔ pugu thɔ yəɨ yu, a chhu nu ŋa, “P̂əɨ mieŋ puoŋ prɔ thɔ njəɨ a, kiʼi pəɨ pɔ kɨʼɨŋgɨnɨ ni pugu nthɛ ŋa Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi pɔ pi ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu pɔ nɔ puoŋ prɔ nɛ. 
Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, mbaʼa shesheŋoŋ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mbiŋ Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi nɔ muuŋ mbrɔ nɛ, yiʼi nii moŋ ghɔ.” 
Yichəɨ nthishɨ pa Juu pie ŋa, “Ŋkiɛŋ masha, mimfɛ ǹchwīe pi nɛiŋ mfāʼo chɔmbhi ki mmɛ?” 
Jishɔ pie ŋa, “Ɔ mɛ̄iŋ a ni ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ nthɛ khɔ? A wuʼɔ Minnwi mbɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ. 
Ɔ ji yaoŋ ŋa pa kɨ̀na chhu nɛ: ‘Kiʼi ŋgaŋ láŋ kwoshuoŋ, kiʼi njwi ŋoŋ, kiʼi njōo, kiʼi ŋkwe ntie ŋoŋ ni mbe, yaʼo nchò tǎa ghɔ pugu muuŋ ghɔ.’ ” 
A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ŋguoŋ kɨ̀na pei ŋ̀kwo nūʼɔŋ llɔ ndɨɨ ŋa mi ni mbɔ maʼaŋ mikhwa nɛ.” 
Jishɔ gha njaʼo nnu yei, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Ɔ wuʼɔ mbɨnɨ mbou yichəɨ taʼa nnu. Fīni ŋguoŋ maoŋ pɔ ghao ŋgrā ni ghaŋ pou, kaŋ fàʼo yɔ shi mbɔ po, nnɛ nthɔ njōu njiŋ a.” 
A ni ŋga njaʼo nnu yei noŋ yi shwiʼi nthɛ ŋa a ni mfāʼo ŋgaʼa. 
Jishɔ pɛʼi vi ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ noŋ yi shwiʼi nɛ, nchhu ŋa, “A ya ŋgaʼa ni ghaŋ fàʼo nɔ mieŋ nu Minnwi shaʼa fùoŋ yi moŋ chɔmbhi yugu. 
A yīʼɛ ni minyieŋləɨ nɔ tɔgɔ nu moŋ mbo mitaʼa nchaa ŋgaŋ fàʼo nɔ mieŋ nu Minnwi shaʼa fùoŋ yi moŋ chɔmbhi yi.” 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njaʼo nnu yei ŋa Jishɔ ni nchhu nɛ chhu ŋa, “Ti ŋoŋ ŋa mimfɛ a lūgu nɛ pɔ pi gɔ̌?” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Nnu ŋa mbaʼa ŋoŋmishua chwīe nɛ yīʼɛ ni Minnwi.” 
Pita chhu ŋa, “Līi njəɨ! Pigi mieŋ pa laʼa miŋi nthɔ njōu njiŋ yɔ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ni pugu ŋa, “Shishini, ǹshwei vəɨ, yichəɨ kaŋ taʼa ŋoŋ lɔ mbɔ ŋa a mieŋ nda yi, ki ŋgwɛ vi, ki ndǐŋ vi, ki tǎa vi pugu mǔuŋ vi, ki puoŋ, nthɛ pi Shaʼafuoŋ Minnwi nɛ, 
ŋa a shi mieŋ ki fāʼo ntou yi moŋ yei chɔmbhi ndɔ shi mfāʼo chɔmbhi ki mmɛ ndɨɨ ŋa ǹshi ndɛ mbɨnɨ nthɔ nɛ.” 
A mɛ̄iŋ paanchrɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, nchhu ni pugu ŋa, “Pəɨ līi njəɨ, pia kuʼɔ nu Jerushalɛiŋ, ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa pa njəɨlɨʼɨ Minnwi ni nāʼaŋ thɛ Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua nɛ lɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ. 
Pichəɨ ŋgwa shi nchaʼa vi mfɛ mbhɔ ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu lɔ njiʼi mbɔ ŋgwa Juu, pi māʼaŋ vi ni kwə̀ɨŋ, ŋgwɛʼi vi, nthu thwɛ mbɨŋ yu. 
Pi shi ŋgwie vi ni ŋgwàŋ, njwi vi, a gha ndaʼa trɛi llɛ́, a pɨnɨ ŋkuʼɔ.” 
Thɔ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi shi ki lɔ njiʼi nshie ni nnu pei, pi ni ndə̄ɨŋ vugu ni njiŋ nnu pighɔ, paʼa pugu lɔ nji nnu ŋa a ni nchhu nu nɛ. 
A ni ŋga nyīeŋ mbara Jeriko, nchriligi chəɨ chhɔ ŋkɨŋ shɛndaoŋ nduoŋ nu. 
Nchriligi ghɔ gha njaʼo yú ŋgwa tɔgɔ nu, a pie ŋa, “A lɔ̄gɔ khɔ ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ?” 
Pi shwei vi ŋa, “A Jishɔ llɔ Nasharɛ ntɔgɔ nu.” 
A mɛ̄iŋ ni njɨ ŋa, “Jishɔ! Muuŋ Devi! Fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu!” 
Ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni mbɔ shhɨ nɛ pɨ̄ga vi, nchhu ghɔ ŋa, “Lɛrɛ laŋ!” A pɨnɨ mɛ̄iŋ pi ni njɨ ŋa, “Muuŋ Devi, fāʼo kwoshɨnɨ mbɨŋ mu!” 
Jishɔ tithi, mfɛ gɨ́ ŋa pi thɔ ni ju. A gha nthɔ mbara yəɨ yu, a pie vi ŋa, 
“Ɔ tāʼa nu ŋa ǹchwīe pi nɛiŋ vɛ?” A khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Taathɔ, ǹtāʼa nu mbɨnɨ njəɨ lɨʼɨ!” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Pɨnɨ nɛ njəɨ lɨʼɨ! Piŋ yɔ chwīe ghɨ̌nɔ yɔ tɔgɔ.” 
Wuʼɔ chomilaoŋ ghɔ, ligi yi chuʼɔ a yōu njiŋ Jishɔ, nchhɔ ŋgaʼo Minnwi. Yú ŋgwa pighɔ fɔ nɛ gha njəɨ, mfɛ ndighaʼo ni Minnwi. 
﻿Luka.
19.
Jishɔ nii ntiri nu moŋ Jeriko. 
Ŋoŋ chəɨ ni mbɔ fɔ, ligi yi pɔ Shakio, mbɔ mmɛŋoŋ pa ghaŋ wɛ̄iŋ taashi, mbɔ ŋgaŋ fàʼo. 
A ni mbaʼo nu nɔ yəɨ nu ŋoŋ ŋa Jishɔ yie nɛ, nthɛ ŋa ŋgwa ni njiɛŋ fɔ nɛ, paʼa a lɔ njiʼɛ ghɔ nthɛ ŋa a ni mbɔ ŋoŋ kwikwiʼi. 
Nthɛ yie ghɔ, a tei ŋgə̄ɨ shhɨ ŋkuʼɔ ŋkuoŋ thɨ shikamoo nnɛ ŋa a yəɨ Jishɔ, nthɛ ŋa Jishɔ shi ntɔgɔ pi ŋgei ghɔ. 
Jishɔ gha nthɔ nchəɨŋ nɔ lɨʼɨ ghɔ, ndīi tɔthɨ nchhu ŋa, “Shakio, kɔnɔ nshwiʼi shhɛ, nthɛ ŋa a yiʼi ŋa ndaʼa nda ghɔ shiʼa.” 
A kɔnɔ nshwiʼi shhɛ, mbɔ ni pwanjuʼɔ nɔ chhu nu ghɔ ŋa a thɔ a pwa. 
Ŋguoŋ pa ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni njəɨ nɛ jɛ̄ luo nu, nchhu nu ŋa, “Ŋoŋ yei ghə̄ɨ nu mbɔ ŋgaŋ kra nda nchwīe phɨ.” 
Shakio tithi tɔthɨ nchhu ni Taathɔ ŋa, “Līi njəɨ, Taathɔ, ǹshi mfɛ ghrà ndɨndɨ maoŋ paŋ ni ghaŋ pou, ti shesheŋoŋ ŋa mi ni nchīgi vi nɛ, ǹshi nduʼu ghɔ khwɛ lɨʼɨ.” 
Jishɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, “Shiʼa, lūgu nu thɔ nda hɛiŋ nthɛ ŋa ŋoŋ vei ŋkaa yu muuŋ Abrahaŋ. 
Nthɛ ŋa Muuŋ Ŋoŋmishua ni nthɔ nɔ tāʼa nu ndɔ ŋkwe ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu phɛ nɛ.” 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nthɔ njwɛrɛ chrà yei nɛ, Jishɔ ghə̄ɨ shhɨ nɔ chhu nu luʼɔ chrà ni pugu. Nthɛ ŋa a ni ŋkwo para Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ, pugu pa ŋa ŋgwa pighɔ ni mbiʼi ŋa Minnwi shi nshaʼa nɔ fùoŋ chomilaoŋ ghɔ nɛ 
a chhu kiʼɛ ŋa, “Ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ chəɨ ni ŋgə̄ɨ fie laʼataoŋ chəɨ, ŋgə̄ɨ njɨ lə̌ɨ fùoŋ ŋkwəɨ shaʼa laʼa yugu. 
Ŋkaoŋ a ni maa ŋgə̄ɨ, a mɛ̄iŋ wuŋ puoŋ fàʼa pi, mfɛ ŋkiɛŋ ntou mbɨŋ ni pugu nchhu ni pugu ŋa, ‘Pəɨ tiʼi nthɔ mbiʼɛ taŋ nɔ ghɔ ti ǹshi nuʼuŋ ŋkwəɨ.’ 
Ndɔ ŋgwa pi pɨ̄na vi pɨ̄na. Nthɛ yie ghɔ, pugu taoŋ ghaŋ ntaoŋ njiŋ yu ŋa pugu ghə̄ɨ nchhu ŋa, ‘Pigi lɔ njiʼi ntāʼa nu ŋa ŋoŋ vei pɔ fùoŋ vigi.’ 
“Ndɔ pi wuʼɔ nchərə vi chərə nɔ fùoŋ. A gha mbɨ̄nɨ, ŋgɛ̄ puoŋ fàʼa pi pɛ ŋa a ni mfɛ mbɨŋ ni pugu ŋa pugu piʼɛ taŋ nɔ nɛ, nnɛ ŋa a nthɛ a ji fɨʼɨ shéi yɛ ŋa pugu fāʼo nɛ. 
Fǔoŋ muuŋ fàʼa thɔ nchhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, mbɨŋ yɛ ŋa ɔ ni mfɛ vəɨ nɛ shei wuŋ lɨʼɨ.’ 
Ŋoŋ ndiɛŋ ghɔ chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Ɔ ya mfāʼa, ma muuŋ fàʼa a yi shishiʼi, nthɛ ŋa ɔ tɔgɔ ndaoŋ ntou moŋ puoŋ mi nnu nɛ, m̀fɛ ghrɨ́ vɛ ŋa ɔ shaʼa wuŋ laʼataoŋ a.’ 
“Mbra yi thɔ nchhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, mbɨŋ yɛ ŋa ɔ ni mfɛ vəɨ nɛ shei tiɛŋ lɨʼɨ.’ 
Taathɔ vi ghɔ khwɛ̄ ghɔ ŋa, ‘Kwe tiɛŋ laʼataoŋ nshaʼa nu.’ 
“Nɛnnɛ, yichəɨ muuŋ fàʼa thɔ, nchhu nu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, mbɨŋ yɔ pɔ nɛiŋ, ŋki krao moŋ pra ndhwí nūʼɔŋ, 
nthɛ ŋa ŋki pɔgɔ, nthɛ ŋa ɔ ŋkiɛŋ ŋoŋ tɨtɨnɨ. Ɔ ghà ndɔ̄gɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa ɔ shi ki lɔ nūʼɔŋ, ŋkwōo lɨʼɨ ŋa ɔ shi ki lɔ mbhi.’ 
“Taathɔ vi chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Muuŋ fàʼa mbɨmbhɨ vei! Ǹshi ndɔ̄gɔ chrà yɔ ŋkrao ghɔ nɔ ghɔ! Ɔ ya nji ŋa mi ŋoŋ tɨtɨnɨ, ŋkwe yaoŋ ŋa a lɔ mbɔ nyaŋ nɛ, ŋkwōo lɨʼɨ ŋa ǹshi ki lɔ mbhī nɛ. 
A ni nchwīe khɔ kiʼɛ paʼa ɔ lɔ niʼiŋ mbɨŋ a moŋ bəɨŋ? Nji ŋa ǹshi ŋga ŋkwəɨ, ŋ̀kwe pugu pa thɔ yi?’ 
Nɛnnɛ nchhu ni ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthi fɔ nɛ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ kwe mbɨŋ ghɔ mbhɔ yu, mfɛ ni muuŋ fàʼa yɛ ŋa a ni nshei wuŋ lɨʼɨ nɛ.’ 
“Ndɔ pugu chhu ghɔ ŋa, ‘Taathɔ, kwaʼa a kwo shei wuŋ lɨʼɨ?’ 
“Fùoŋ ghɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, ‘Ǹshwei vəɨ, shesheŋoŋ ŋa a kwo fāʼo nɛ, pi shi mbīgi ntou yi ghɔ, ndɔ ti ni ŋoŋ yɛ ŋa a lɔ njiʼi mfāʼo nɛ pi shi ŋkwe shɨgɛi yɛ ŋa a fāʼo nɛ mbhɔ yu. 
Ndɔ ndwɛ pa mbɨ̌na paŋ pɛ ŋa pugu shini ndɔ ntāʼa nu ŋa m̀bɔ fùoŋ vugu nɛ, pəɨ wɛ̄iŋ vugu nthɔ nsho vugu ligi mu.’ ” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nchhu yei nnu ti mīʼɛŋ, ŋgwɛ̄iŋ ndaoŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu shhɨ, ŋkuʼɔ nu Jerushalɛiŋ. 
A ni ŋga nyīeŋ ti mbara Bɛfɛgɛ pugu Betani ŋkuoŋ mbra ŋa pi mɛ̄iŋ ni Olive nɛ, ntaoŋ paa ghaŋ younjiŋ pi, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Pəɨ ghə̄ɨ moŋ muuŋ laʼataoŋ yini shhɨ pəɨ nɛ, pəɨ shi njəɨ muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ ŋa ŋoŋ lɔ naa ma ŋkuʼɔ nɛ, pi chu fɔ, pəɨ kɨ̄gɛi nthɔ nɔ hɛiŋ. 
S̈hesheŋoŋ mbie vəɨ ŋa, ‘Pəɨ kɨ̄gɛi nu ŋa?’ pəɨ chhu ŋa, ‘Taathɔ fāʼo fàʼa nɔ ghɔ.’ ” 
Nɛnnɛ ŋgwa pighɔ ŋa a ni ntaoŋ vugu nɛ ghə̄ɨ ŋguʼɔ njəɨ ŋguoŋ nnu pi ŋkwaŋ haʼaŋ a ni nshwei vugu nɛ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ pugu ni nthɔ mfēi muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ ghɔ nɛ, ŋgwa pɛ ŋa minyieŋ ghɔ ni mbɔ yugu nɛ pie ŋa, “Pəɨ fēi nu ŋa?” 
Pugu khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Taathɔ fāʼo fàʼa nɔ ghɔ.” 
Pugu lɔ̄gɔ muuŋ ŋkwɛ́iŋ ghɔ ŋgə̄ɨ fɛ ni Jishɔ, ŋga nshɛ̄iŋ ndhwí pugu ŋkuoŋ ghɔ, ŋgɛ̄rɛ Jishɔ a kuʼɔ nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ. 
Nɔ haʼaŋ a ni nchhɔ ŋkuoŋ ghɔ nyīeŋ ŋgə̄ɨ nu nɛ, pa ŋgwa shɛ̄iŋ pa mɛmmɛ ndhwí pugu shɛndaoŋ. 
Ndɨɨ ŋa a ni nyīeŋ mbara Jerushalɛiŋ nɛ, nɔ lɨʼɨ ŋa shɛndaoŋ shwiʼi laʼo Mbra pa Thɨ Olive nɛ, mmɛ kɨrɨ ghaŋ younjiŋ pi jɛ̄ nthɔ ntōo Minnwi ni njɨ moŋ pwanjuʼɔ nthɛ ŋguoŋ pa nnu ghraoghrao ŋa pugu ni njəɨ nɛ, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Mbɔrɔ pɔ ni Fùoŋ ŋa a thɔ nɔ ligi Taathɔ nɛ, Ghɨghrɨ pɔ po, ndighaʼo pɔ ni Minnwi ti ŋgə̄ɨ nchəɨŋ fie moŋ ndugwi po!” 
Pichəɨ pa ŋgwa Farashi moŋ yú ŋgwa pighɔ chhu ni Jishɔ ŋa, “Masha, pɨ̄ga pa ghaŋ younjiŋ pɔ ŋa pugu lɛrɛ laŋ.” 
Jishɔ khwɛ̄ ŋa, “Ǹshwei vəɨ, ŋgwa pei ndɛrɛ laŋ, kaŋ pa ŋgùʼɔ shi nchrā ni njɨ!” 
Jishɔ ni ŋga nyīeŋ mbara ti njəɨ moŋ Jerushalɛiŋ ghɔ, ŋkə̄ɨ nthɛ vi, 
nchhu nu ŋa, “Ǹjūa ŋa ɔ kaŋ ni nji shiʼa yaoŋ ŋa a ghà nthɔ ni ghɨghrɨ nɛ, ndɔ ndwɛ, Minnwi chwīe ŋa kiʼi ɔ yəɨ, 
nthɛ ŋa yichəɨ ndɨɨ thɔ nthɔ nu ŋa pa mbɨ̌na pɔ shi ŋgɨ̄ŋ ghɔ ni ŋkaʼa mbāoŋ, nshwiʼi mbɨŋ ghɔ moŋ ŋguoŋ ŋgei ghao. 
Pugu shi nshiʼi ghɔ pəɨ pa mbaanda yɔ. Mbaʼa kaŋ taʼa yaoŋ yiʼi mbɨgəɨ mbhɔ ghɔ, nthɛ ŋa ɔ shini ndɔ nji ndɨɨ ŋa Minnwi ni nthɔ nɔ kwe nu ghɔ nɛ.” 
Jishɔ nii Nda Minnwi, njɛ̄ yōu nu ŋgwa pɛ ŋa pugu ni nthɔ mfīni yaoŋ fɔ nɛ, 
nchhu nu ni pugu ŋa, “Pi nāʼaŋ moŋ Ŋwaʼaŋlɨ Minnwi ŋa, ‘Nda a shi mbɔ pi nda luoŋ Minnwi,’ ndɔ pəɨ kara a gū pùo pa ŋgɨna.” 
Ŋguoŋ llɛ́ ghao Jishɔ thɔ njɛʼi ŋgwa Nda Minnwi. Pa thishɨ ghaŋ fɛʼiŋgiɛŋ pugu pa ghaŋ yɛʼi gɨ́ Mushi pugu pa pichəɨ thishɨ taʼa shɛndaoŋ nɔ jwi nu vi. 
Ndɔ paʼa ndɔ mfāʼo shɛndaoŋ, nthɛ ŋa pa ŋgwa ni mfɛ ŋguoŋ tə́nə yugu nthɔ njaʼo ŋguoŋ nnu ŋa a ni nchhu nu nɛ. 
